Authors
Kevin Patterson
Number of Reviews
94

Title
Review for Slacker (1991)
Richard Linklater's "Slacker," made in 1991 for a budget of only $23,000,
immerses itself in the twentysomething,  college-town culture of Austin,
Texas. Most of these characters are either unemployed or work jobs that are
apparently too menial to be worth mentioning. Their lifestyle is a sort of
passive resistance to the idea that people should go out and actively pursue a
career after graduation; they seem content to sit around spouting off about
the inadequacy of American democracy, the pervasiveness of slave morality, the
subtle messages in pop culture, and such. Ask them what they've been doing
lately, and they'll more likely than not reply, "Oh, you know, just hanging
out." Linklater uses an interesting technique to examine these characters: the
camera follows one person for a few minutes, then someone else walks by and
the camera follows that person, who walks into a diner just as another person
is walking out the door . . . . 
It's certainly a lot of fun listening to these characters talk: some of them
are clearly very intelligent and have some genuinely insightful ideas, some of
them are just plain weird, and some of them think their ideas are a lot more
profound than they really are. The opening monologue, delivered by Linklater
himself to a taxi driver, tosses around ideas about alternate realities that
nicely set up the meandering structure of the film. Other characters along the
way offer observations about everything from dating relationships to the
history of anarchist philosophy, while groups of pseudo-intellectuals kick
around ideas about the nobility of sitting around and doing nothing or the
subtle bribery-based morality in "Scooby-Doo." 
For the most part, however, the best moments are the ones involving the
slightly unhinged types. Near the beginning, a paranoid man follows a
pedestrian for several blocks, warning him about government conspiracies
involving everything from global warming to secret colonization of Mars.
Another man seems to be collecting televisions, keeping at least fifteen sets
running at the same time and playing tapes of a graduate student who recorded
himself having a nervous breakdown and destroying the camera. And in a scene
that drew a big laugh from everyone present when I saw the film, a man tries
to achieve closure after a failed relationship by reciting poetry on a bridge
and then throwing a typewriter into the creek below. 
The only problem with "Slacker" is that it starts to run out of steam towards
the end. Since Linklater only spends a few minutes with each character, the
introduction of the new characters gets repetitive after a while. There are
only so many times you can hear, "Hey, what's going on?" "Not much, what are
you up to?" "Nothing really, just hanging around," before it gets on your
nerves; the film might well have benefited from a slightly slower pace and a
little bit more characterization. And the dialogue in the second half of the
film is by and large not quite as interesting as that in the first half; a JFK
buff, for example, seems like a pale imitation of the previous conspiracy
theorist, and many of the characters just generally aren't as weird or unique.
Instead of depicting a city populated by mostly normal people and then showing
us the strangeness that we might not have noticed at first, Linklater shows us
the oddballs first, then stops and reminds us that ordinary people live there
too. 
"Slacker" is a good film and a wonderfully offbeat and entertaining comedy,
whatever its flaws, and its status as a cult classic is well-deserved. I just
can't help but think it might have been even better if Linklater had slowed
down a little bit and filmed these scenes in reverse order. 

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
WAKING NED DEVINE is the kind of film that you mostly enjoy while you're
watching it, but there's nothing to leave much of an impression on the
audience. If the projector had broken in the middle of this film, I would
not have been particularly upset, and I don't know that I'd have come back
for another showing to see the rest of it. It has a lot of little amusing
moments, very little plot or character development, and absolutely no
suspense or tension.
The premise: One morning in the small Irish village of Tullymore, Jackie
O'Shea (Ian Bannen) tells his friend Michael O'Sullivan (David Kelly) that
the newspaper reported that someone in their town has won the national
lottery. There are only 53 people living in the village, so it doesn't take
them too long to discover that the winner is one Ned Devine, who
unfortunately died from the shock of discovering that he'd won. The two of
them hatch a scheme to have Michael impersonate Ned Devine so that they can
claim the money, and realize that they need to enlist the other villagers'
help (and therefore share the money with them) in order to fool an
investigator from the lottery commission. "And?" you may be asking.
Well...that's about it, actually.
Writer/director Kirk Jones clearly sees the plot as nothing more than a
reason to get the eccentric villagers interacting with each other. Now,
normally I'm a sucker for movies that just let their characters talk and
behave without insisting on a new plot twist every three minutes. But I
guess I never really got the feeling that Jones really cared about his
characters or even believed in them as real people: they're just there to
spout mildly amusing lines. That's not to say that WAKING NED DEVINE isn't,
in fact, amusing, which is good, because otherwise the characters would
just seem kind of materialistic and shallow. Among the best comic scenes
are the villagers' initial sly attempts to figure out who had the winning
ticket, Jackie pretending he's won just to get his wife Annie (Fionnula
Flanagan) to bring him his dinner, and Michael on a desperate cross-country
naked motorcycle ride.
Unfortunately, Jones misses the best opportunities to create some sort of
narrative hook (the lottery inspector catches them at Ned Devine's funeral,
for example, but it's explained away in maybe two or three lines of
dialogue). As a result, he tries to contrive other forms of tension, none
of which are particularly successful. For example, a pig farmer named Finn
(James Nesbitt) wants to marry Maggie (Susan Lynch), and she says she will
if he agrees to give up pig farming. (True love right there, folks.) A
crotchety old woman threatens to blow the whistle on them, but I never
believed for a second that WAKING NED DEVINE would end with the entire
village going to jail, and Jones gives her a particularly nasty,
mean-spirited sendoff that seems way out of place in an otherwise
light-hearted film.
A lot of movies suffer from trying to do too much, but WAKING NED DEVINE
suffers from trying to do too little. Another reviewer called the film
"effortless": he meant it as praise for the film's light tone, but I think
it's true in a less positive way as well. Jones doesn't seem to have put
much effort into constructing this story, and as a result his characters
don't have to put much effort into making their way through it. The result
is occasionally charming, but ultimately forgettable.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY
Rating: **1/2 (out of four)
R, 1998
Directors: Peter & Bobby Farrelly
Screenplay: Ed Decter, John J. Straus, Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly
Starring Cast: Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller
I didn't expect this to happen, but I finally saw THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY and I really don't have too much to say about it. I figured that
either I would be extremely grossed out and offended, or I would find it
hysterically funny, or both. Instead, I found myself feeling strangely
indifferent to the whole thing. Yes, it's gross, and yes, it's funny, but
it's nothing to write home about on either count.
This may be partly a result of the fact that others had told me about the
most, uh, unusual jokes before I saw the movie, and therefore the shock
factor was diluted. The movie is, in fact, a lot more explicit with vulgar
sight gags than most comedies. But since I had been told, for example, that
Ben Stiller would have a slight...mishap, shall we say, when zipping up his
pants, I pretty much knew what was going to happen as soon as he walked
into the bathroom. The same goes for another disgusting scene in which
Cameron Diaz's character rubs some gel in her hair that, well, isn't
actually gel: I knew the joke was coming a good three minutes ahead of time.
A lot of the jokes are equally tasteless. Some of them, particularly those
involving a dog on speed, are pretty funny, some of them start to make the
audience uncomfortable with such questionable tactics as making fun of the
mentally and physically handicapped (though this wasn't played nearly as
offensively as I was afraid it might be), and some, such as a guy who walks
around with a grotesque skin condition the whole time, are just dumb and
pointless. By and large, the funniest jokes are the ones that just aim for
plain weirdness without worrying about being gross, such as when a
hitchhiker explains that he plans to make money by producing a seven minute
abs training video (thereby cutting into the "Eight-Minute Abs" video
market).
Surprisingly enough, one of the strengths of THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY is that the story, in which Ted (Ben Stiller) tries to ingratiate
himself to Mary (Cameron Diaz), for whom he has carried a torch for
thirteen years, is handled reasonably well and actually has us rooting for
Ted and Mary by the end. Among the obstacles are four other men, (including
a P.I. Ted had originally hired to find her, since they'd lost touch after
high school), and all of whom go to ridiculous lengths of deception to
impress Mary. It's fairly easy to understand why, as Mary spends much of
her time caring for her handicapped brother and generally seems to be most
good-natured person on the face of the planet. There's a fairly complex web
of lies and fake identities involved in all this, and I was pleasantly
surprised at how well the Farrellys kept it all together and the clever,
composed manner in which it all becomes clear.
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY has been hyped largely as a gross-out comedy
in the tradition of John Waters, but to me it seemed more like a romantic
comedy, only with gags that are much more low-brow and bizarre than what
you'd normally see. As such, it's reasonably entertaining, but it's not the
love-it-or-hate-it spectacle that I had expected, and in the end it's
actually one of my more forgettable cinematic experiences of the year.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Visit my Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Se7en (1995)
I'm going to begin this review by explaining that when I saw SE7EN on
video, I watched about the first 30 minutes, was interrupted for about
another 30 minutes, then resumed and watched the remaining hour and a half.
Why, you may wonder, am I telling you this? Well, because it's put me in a
bit of a pickle: I found much to admire about the film, and looking back on
it, I can see how all the different scenes fit together into a coherent
whole. My gut reaction, however, was that it still felt  kind of
disjointed. One side of me says I should go with my gut reaction. The other
side says, "Well of course it felt disjointed, you quit watching the thing
for half an hour in the middle!" As you've probably guessed from the
rating, I've decided to give SE7EN the benefit of the doubt, so I'll spend
most of the review explaining why I think it's actually a better film than
it seemed to be while I was watching it.
SE7EN tells the story of David Mills (Brad Pitt), a young homicide
detective working his first case in a new precinct under the tutelage of
retiring veteran William Sommerset (Morgan Freeman). The case is a
particularly horrifying set of serial killings, each murder meant to punish
someone for one of the seven deadly sins. The murderer is clearly
intelligent and deliberate, killing each victim in a way that symbolizes
his or her sin. An obese man is punished for Gluttony by death through
force-feeding, a drug dealer is punished for Sloth by being tied to a bed
and left to waste away, a model is punished for Pride by the disfigurement
of her face, and a prostitute is punished for Lust by . . . well, on second
thought, I don't really want to talk about that one. Suffice it to say that
all of these scenes are shocking and gruesome, some a little too much so:
while a certain amount of this is necessary if one is to take this subject
matter seriously, there are a couple of scenes in which director David
Fincher really shows us more than we need to see.
At the core of SE7EN is the relationship between the two detectives. Mills
is a cool, arrogant young cop who's comfortable investigating horrifying
murders during the day and still cheerfully going home to his wife (Gwyneth
Paltrow) and roughhousing on the floor with his hyperactive dogs. Somerset,
we sense, lets these things get to him: his manner is usually very somber
and morose, and from what we can tell, he lives a solitary and subdued home
life. Mills writes off the killer, whom we only ever know as "John Doe," as
a simple lunatic, while Somerset warns that this is a dangerous
underestimation and instead tries to understand how the killer's mind
works. And when it becomes clear what exactly the killer is up to, Somerset
goes to the library and reads Paradise Lost  and The Divine Comedy. Mills,
on the other hand, settles for the Cliff's Notes. Slowly but surely, SE7EN
emerges as a compelling argument for Somerset's approach, suggesting that
one must accept the horror for what it is before one can really defend
oneself against it. The two detectives are put through a gut-wrenching
moral test at the end, and we find that it is Somerset who keeps his cool
and Mills who discovers that he's a little closer to the "lunatic" than he
ever would have imagined.
The only noticeable flaw in SE7EN aside from the occasionally excessive
gore is that the screenplay by Andrew Kevin Walker doesn't quite have a
handle on the killer. He's obviously a religious fanatic of sorts, and he
seems to believe his fire-and-brimstone sermons about sin and corruption.
On the other hand, the games he plays with Mills and Somerset seems to
indicate that he subscribes to the idea of "the devil is inside all of us,"
which is a strange ideology for someone who issues such venomous
condemnations of others. I also found it a little odd that someone with his
personality would even indulge in the stereotypical serial killer routine
of taunting the authorities. The character is certifiably 100% insane, of
course, so it may be a mistake to insist on too much logic in his behavior,
and I must admit that I am probably fairly picky when it comes to serial
killer stories, having watched Fox's "Millennium" and NBC's "Profiler" for
the past three years. Still, it might not have hurt to make the method to
his madness a little more consistent and focused.
David Fincher does an excellent job holding all this together, instilling
SE7EN with a consistent feeling of dread to accompany the disturbing story.
His moody visual style, which he would later put to use in THE GAME, is a
large part of what makes SE7EN work, and his direction is remarkably
effective and sure-handed, especially considering that his only previous
experience had been on the reportedly chaotic production of Alien 3. While
I must admit to being somewhat puzzled as to the masterpiece status this
film has been accorded on numerous Internet web sites, it's a very
successful film that tackles challenging subject matter without flinching
and yet still manages to be human.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
After GODZILLA disappointed, both critically and commercially, and DEEP
IMPACT turned out not to be an action movie in the strict sense, July of
1998 has rolled around without an action blockbuster having hit the
theaters. Expectations have accordingly been high for ARMAGEDDON, in which
a team of roughnecks led by Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis) are sent into
outer space for the purpose of drilling a hole inside an asteroid on a
collision course with Earth and then blowing it up from the inside. It
certainly seems to have all the right ingredients: it has Bruce Willis in
the lead, it has a premise ripe with potential for big explosions and
stunts (along with a bit of flag-waving), and the producer/director team of
Jerry Bruckheimer and Michael Bay had been responsible for the 1996 action
hit THE ROCK.
Unfortunately, that's really about all it has. Don't misunderstand:
ARMAGEDDON entertains. But aside from the few real moments of heroism at
the end, I liked it mostly for the same reasons that Beavis and Butt-head
would probably like it: because a lot of stuff got blown up, and that was
cool. Since its plot (Our Heroes vs. Big Inanimate Object) is about as thin
as they come, it has to keep moving mostly on the basis of Murphy's Law: a
fuel tank explodes during an intermediate stop at a space station, one of
the two shuttles is damaged by debris from the asteroid, the nuclear bomb
intended to destroy the asteroid is about to go off early, the drills keep
breaking, a character comes down with "space dementia," and finally the
bomb mechanism is broken and someone has to stay behind and detonate the
bomb manually.
I won't waste time pointing out how the storyline is implausible (which it
is), since these kinds of movies do not sink or swim with their scientific
credibility. I will point out, however, that it's kind of sloppy. The
screenplay reportedly passed through the word processors of nine different
writers, and it shows in places. There are a few characters introduced
towards the beginning, such as a goofy astronomer with a nagging wife and a
few New York City tourists who get scared up by a meteor shower, who then
disappear with no indication of why they were in the script in the first
place. Steve Buscemi's character, Rockhound, apparently got his Ph.D at age
22, yet he later makes an asinine comment about how NASA's proposed flight
plan resembles a failed stunt from a Road Runner cartoon that would insult
the intelligence of most high school physics students. There's also some
hokey dialogue that I would have thought at least one of the nine writers
ought to have edited. (Note to whoever was responsible for the scene where
the bomb is about to go off: it's fine to write a scene that turns into a
surrealistic nightmare, but actually having a character announce "This has
turned into a surrealistic nightmare!" doesn't come off too well.)
Characters in these kinds of action movies don't have to be well-developed,
but they at least ought to be animated and fun to watch. Aside from Harry
Stamper and Rockhound, most of them are pretty bland: the rest of Stamper's
squad consist of pretty much stock macho characters. Their tough-guy antics
in front of the NASA training team and sarcastic one-liners are mildly
amusing, but the only time I really laughed out loud was when Buscemi
started trying to replicate a scene from DR. STRANGELOVE. For a movie that
barely comes in under the 150-minute mark, some of this seems like dead
weight (not to mention that it completely undermines any sense that the
world might really be about to end, but I'm not even going to get started
on that). There's also a romance between A.J. (Ben Affleck) and Harry's
daughter Grace (Liv Tyler) that doesn't add a whole lot to the story.
Director Michael Bay keeps the action going pretty much non-stop for the
final half of the movie. While it certainly serves to keep the audience's
adrenaline rushing, some of it unfolds in a rather confusing way. I'm still
not sure exactly what went wrong on board the space station: all I know was
that there were some sparks flying, some incomprehensible shouting from a
Russian cosmonaut (Peter Stormare), and then a Narrow Escape and a Big
Explosion. There's nothing visually distinct about ARMAGEDDON except for a
few surface shots of the asteroid: at one point, the flying rock, the
shouting, and the camera-shaking went on for so long that I actually caught
myself starting to tune out for about a minute, and that's one thing that
shouldn't happen in an action movie.
ARMAGEDDON turns up the action meter in a way few movies often do, but its
coherence meter is somewhere near the bottom. It's good entertainment, and
it meets the minimum requirements for a summer blockbuster. Still, I'd be
surprised if I remember much of it a year from now. Except, of course, that
a lot of stuff got blown up. And that was cool.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Several months after THE TRUMAN SHOW impressed critics and audiences, we
now get PLEASANTVILLE, the second of 1998's "protagonist trapped in a
television show" films. This one is written and directed by Gary Ross,
previously known as the screenwriter of BIG, in which a machine at a
carnival transplanted a 12-year-old into the body of an adult, and DAVE, in
which a mild-mannered nice guy successfully impersonated the President of
the United States for several years. There is some of the same whimsical
charm in PLEASANTVILLE, in which squabbling 1990s siblings David (Tobey
Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), find themselves transported into
an old "Leave It To Beaver"-style '50s black-and-white sitcom called, you
guessed it, "Pleasantville," where they assume the identities of two of the
series's main characters.
There's a catch. No one in PLEASANTVILLE knows anything beyond what they
need to function as TV characters. David's boss at the soda shop, Mr.
Johnson, doesn't know how to keep the shop running if David's not there to
set up the counter after he finishes wiping it off; one day David arrives
late to find Mr. Johnson standing there in confusion as he explains, "You
weren't here, so I just . . . kept wiping." No one actually learns anything
in school, since very few scenes actually take place there. The bathrooms
don't have any stalls (when was the last time you saw anybody relieving
themselves on network TV?). The firemen only know how to rescue cats from
trees and are totally perplexed as to what the hoses in the back of the
fire engine do.
For a while, it seems as if PLEASANTVILLE might turn into an amusing but
immature satire of the "family values" crowd. As David and Jennifer
introduce the citizens of Pleasantville to knowledge of the outside world,
their black-and-white existence literally starts to give way to color. Ross
makes a poor choice, however, by starting this off with Jennifer having sex
with her character's boyfriend. This isn't handled particularly well, and
it risks making an already bizarre story downright laughable. The movie
reaches what has to be its lowest point when a woman's sexual
experimentation apparently causes a tree in the back yard to burst into
flames; at this stage, I was beginning to wonder if "Gary Ross" was
actually a pseudonym for "Woody Allen on speed." (The scene does, at least,
lead to perhaps the funniest comic payoff, in which David has to summon the
clueless firemen by telling them there's a cat in a tree, grabs the hose
from their fire truck, and puts the fire out himself while one of them
looks around bewildered and asks, "Where's the cat?")
Fortunately, PLEASANTVILLE finds its feet soon after these initial
stumbles. The only other obvious political swipe is a more sophisticated
and relevant one, as the citizens who have remained black-and-white try to
keep their multichromatic neighbors away with "No Coloreds Allowed" signs
in the windows. And for the most part, Ross wisely chooses to downplay the
political in the latter half of the film, focusing instead on more basic
aspects of human experience. With the arrival of color comes the loss of
the town's idyllic existence. It clouds over and rains once in a while
instead of being sunny all the time, and the high school basketball team is
no longer invincible. The town's leaders think that the solution is punish
the "coloreds" and restrict things like painting in color, but in the end,
even they aren't impervious to the new knowledge and experience introduced
by David and Jennifer and find themselves becoming "colored" as well.
By the end of PLEASANTVILLE, I was, pardon the pun, pleasantly surprised to
see what had started off as a bizarre and occasionally sloppy comedy turn
into a rousing call to rise above complacency and self-satisfaction, as
Ross makes the case that short-term pain and confusion is often worth the
long-term benefits of change. It's not quite as polished and coherent as
THE TRUMAN SHOW, which dealt with similar themes, but it nevertheless
overcomes its lesser moments and still emerges in the end as one of the
best films of the year.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page: http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
THE THIN RED LINE
Rating: *** (out of four)
R, 1998
Director: Terrence Malick
Producers: Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill, John Roberdeau
Screenplay: Terrence Malick
Starring Cast: Sean Penn, Nick Nolte, Elias Koteas, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin
THE THIN RED LINE is a sort of grand gesture by director Terrence Malick.
It's a reach for the transcendent arising out of the most horrible
circumstances, namely the brutal fight for Guadalcanal between the
Americans and Japanese in World War II. And this description encapsulates
why THE THIN RED LINE is a good film and also why it's a flawed film. Few
films today, after all, have the courage to reach for the transcendent. Yet
the problem is that it is, indeed, Malick's reach for the transcendent, and
not that of his characters.
Among those characters are Capt. James Staros (Elias Koteas), Private Witt
(James Caviezel), and Private Bell (Ben Chaplin). The latter two probably
receive the most screen time of any of the characters. Witt is a dreamer, a
soldier who has gone AWOL several times, but not, we sense, because he is
afraid of battle so much as he is repulsed by it and is trying to find
something more rewarding in himself and in nature. When a commanding
officer (Sean Penn) lectures him prior to putting him on a squadron headed
for Guadalcanal, he tells him that he'd better straighten up and learn to
live with his situation because "this world is all there is." "I've seen a
different world," Witt replies, and we believe him: the film opens with a
scene of the AWOL Witt living a peaceful life with a tribe of Pacific
Islands natives. Bell has some of Witt's innocence about him as well,
though his personal philosophy is not quite as esoteric. He keeps himself
sane with memories of his loving wife from home, and longs to complete his
military duty and return to her.
THE THIN RED LINE features several battle sequences, all of which are
generally effective in terms of suspense and drama, but what is most
noticeable is the attention devoted to the physical setting of the
battles.. Often, Malick's camera is aimed towards a tribal native walking
past the soldiers as they march to their next assignment, or an animal, or
a wide landscape. The central question of THE THIN RED LINE, often hinted
at in numerous voiceovers, seems to be whether nature is inherently
beautiful or ugly. The answer that Malick seems to come up with is that
it's both, and that while warfare represents the ugly side, those who
engage in it still have the potential to strive for the higher elements.
Malick makes a pariticularly interesting choice by shooting the battle for
Guadalcanal in bright sunlight, with numerous shots of the open hillside.
Rather than stressing the ugly (as in, for example, the D-Day sequence in
Saving Private Ryan, which was shot in a foggy, nebulous gloom), Malick
juxtaposes the beautiful and the ugly, suggesting that they are both parts
of the same larger picture and that they need not be mutually exclusive for
the soldiers.
The problem with THE THIN RED LINE is that it is only coherent if
considered in light of the fact that it is Malick constructing this
picture, over and above the thoughts and observations of the individual
characters. Expressing an abstract idea is a tricky endeavor in the medium
of cinema, which is at its strongest when it captures a human experience in
some way. That doesn't mean that it it's impossible: this summer's PI, for
example, dealt with very esoteric concepts of mathematics and theology, but
it was a more successful film than THE THIN RED LINE because it managed to
pull the audience into its lead character's possibly groundbreaking and
possibly insane quest for knowledge. Whose experience is captured in THE
THIN RED LINE? Mostly that of an outside observer, someone watching but not
participating: this is a film based on a novel, but it feels more like it
was based on a philosophy dissertation. I suppose that the sensibilities of
Private Witt are somewhat in tune with Malick's ideas about humanity and
nature, but even then, it could be argued that Witt does not know how to
deal with the "ugly" side of nature, which is perhaps the reason that he
runs away from it by going AWOL.
That's not to say that Malick treats his characters coldly or
mean-spiritedly, just that he doesn't seem particularly interested in them
as three-dimensional human beings. They're on screen whenever they're
saying or thinking something that is relevant to whatever point he is
trying to make, and then it's on to the next voiceover or the next close-up
on an animal on the ground. It takes a while for the viewer to get all the
characters straight in his or her head, as several of them look alike and
the voiceovers often begin without making it clear whose voice it is. And
while most of the narration and dialogue does seem to fit into Malick's
meditations on human nature, some of it is just puzzling and underrealized.
Captain Staros, for example, isn't developed beyond the fact that he's a
kind-hearted person who genuinely cares about those under his command, and
when his character exits the story, he's given a voiceover about how his
men will "live on inside him" that really has nothing to do with anything
else in the film.
The THE THIN RED LINE is a mild disappointment considering the hype (this
is Malick's first film in twenty years), but it is still a film worth
seeing. The cinematography is nothing short of excellent, and the story and
its thematic elements certainly will not leave the audience bored or
uninterested. Even if this reach for the transcendent doesn't quite achieve
the necessary coherence, I can't help but admire Malick for trying.

Title
Review for Player, The (1992)
THE PLAYER is one of those rare films that succeeds brilliantly despite the
fact that the audience and the filmmakers probably hate most of the
characters. A clever, sometimes humorous, and probably all too realistic
satire of the movie industry, the film follows the ups and downs of studio
executive Griffin Mill (Tim Robbins), an aloof businessman who cynically
manipulates the filmmaking process to serve his own interests and undercut
those of his rival Larry Levy (Peter Gallagher). The extent of his coldness
is revealed when he accidentally kills a disgruntled writer whom he
believed was sending him death threats and smoothly manages to cover up the
death. Everything from the selfish arrogance of the executives to their
retuning of a movie for mass consumption to the pretensions of a
self-important "message film" is skewered on the satirical sword of
director Robert Altman and screenwriter Michael Tolkin. If you ever want to
try to talk someone out of getting into the movie business, show them THE
PLAYER.

Title
Review for Eraserhead (1977)
David Lynch's debut film "Eraserhead" is without a doubt one of the most
bizarre films I have ever seen. There isn't really much of a plot, other than
the fact that the main character, Henry Spencer (Jack Nance), is having a
difficult time caring for his deformed illegitimate child and generally has an
unpleasant life. "Eraserhead" could probably be best described as an abstract
character study: the character of Henry Spencer is revealed through a series
of loosely connected images and scenes. 
To describe "Eraserhead" as "surreal" would be an understatement: most of what
happens in this film does not seem to be bound by any semblance of realism.
The film's best-known scene is a dream sequence (I guess) in which Henry's
disembodied head suddenly falls out of a window, is discovered by a young boy,
and taken to a nearby factory where it is made into pencil erasers (hence the
film's title). And the metaphysical distortions don't stop there. The
enigmatic "Man in the Planet" character appears occasionally and seems to be
controlling Henry's bizarre experiences somehow. Henry has recurring visions
of the "Lady in the Radiator" who performs a song for him, promising that "In
Heaven, Everything Is Fine" until she is interrupted by worms falling from the
sky. In a scene that is at once hilarious and unsettling, two chicken legs
somehow come alive on Henry's dinner plate and do a little dance as static
electricity buzzes ominously in the background. In fact, the entire film is
scored by a "white noise" that is a kind of mix of wind gusts and electric
humming. 
Surprisingly enough, "Eraserhead" actually works as a surreal psychodrama that
takes place in a world shaped around Henry's fears and obsessions. This
material probably would have collapsed into an Ed Wood-style
"so-bad-it's-funny" mess in the hands of most directors, but somehow Lynch
actually gets the audience to take all this cinematic lunacy seriously.
"Eraserhead" is visceral and disturbing where, with only a tiny misstep, it
could easily have become ludicrously incoherent. Lynch has admitted that the
atmosphere of tension and fear that dominates "Eraserhead" grew largely out of
his own experience living in a dangerous area of downtown Philadelphia and
trying to care for his daughter Jennifer, who herself was born with clubbed
feet and had a very difficult childhood. This personal attachment of the
director to his material is probably what makes "Eraserhead" work: Lynch
clearly cares about Henry, and by the end of the film, so do we. 
I am awarding "Eraserhead" three and a half stars, but I will stop short of
recommending it firmly because most people I know would probably hate it. I'll
put it this way: If you enjoy unconventional films, or if you want to see the
on-screen exorcism of David Lynch's personal demons, then by all means make
"Eraserhead" your next rental from the video store. If not, you should
probably stay away. 

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
"5 billion people will die from a deadly virus in 1997. The survivors will
abandon the surface of the planet. Once again the animals will rule the world
. . ."
-Excerpts from interview with clinically diagnosed paranoid schizophrenic,
April 12, 1990 - Baltimore County Hospital 
With this caption begins TWELVE MONKEYS, the most recent of director Terry
Gilliam's many excursions into the realm where reality and fantasy often seem
to intersect, overlap, and sometimes collide head-first. This time, the
vehicle for his protagonist's confusion is time travel. The year is 2035 and
the last of the human race have been driven underground by a dangerous plague
unleashed, apparently, by a terrorist group known as the Army of the Twelve
Monkeys. Seeking to develop an inoculation and reclaim the surface, a group of
scientists decide to send a prisoner named James Cole (Bruce Willis) back to
the year 1996 in order to collect samples of the virus in its original,
un-mutated form from before it was released on the population. 
The script was penned by David Peoples (of BLADE RUNNER fame) and his wife
Janet, and with the help of Gilliam (BRAZIL, THE FISHER KING), one of the most
accomplished fantasy directors in modern cinema, they take the issue of time
travel and explore it, far-fetched as it may seem, in an intelligent and
thoughtful manner. One avenue that the script takes is to examine the
practical uses of time travel and the problems that time travelers might
encounter. The famous physicist Stephen Hawking once commented that time
travel will probably never be invented for the reason that we, in the present
day, are not being visited by time travelers from the future. After seeing
TWELVE MONKEYS, I found myself speculating that if we were, they might all be
locked away in mental institutions, for this is Cole's fate on his first
journey to the past. TWELVE MONKEYS also follows a different route than the
usual return-to-the-past-to-change-the-present routine that is common to
science fiction movies (and often results in a story riddled with paradoxes).
Cole is not trying to avert the spread of the virus, and he even says as much
when he confronts the man who he believes is responsible for its release: all
he is trying to find is a sample. 
TWELVE MONKEYS is divided neatly into three acts. In the first, Cole is
mistakenly sent to Baltimore in 1990 instead of 1996, where he is immediately
taken into police custody and diagnosed as delusional by Dr. Katherine Railly
(Madeline Stowe). The resulting scenes at the mental institution, in which a
hyperactive patient named Jeffrey Goines (Brad Pitt) constantly stirs up
trouble and seems to allude vaguely to the impending disaster, are at once
amusing and eerie, capturing Cole's strange experience of being immersed in
human civilization at a time that he knows is only six years before its
destruction. 
He is subsequently recalled to 2035, where he explains the malfunction to the
scientists, who, this time, manage to send him to 1996 as planned. Desperate
to complete his mission, he seeks help from Dr. Railly, who now works in
Philadelphia; although she is frightened by him at first and tries to convince
him that he is still "mentally divergent," she gradually begins to trust him
after some of his predictions about the future seem to come true. These scenes
are marked by a sort of innocent abandon on the part of Cole, who, for the
first time since his childhood, finds himself able to enjoy things like music,
open air, and streams in the forest. 
In the final act, after another recall to the future, Cole returns once again
to 1996 Philadelphia, this time only three weeks before the unleashing of the
virus. Once again, he seeks out Railly, who is now beginning to believe his
story (just as he himself is beginning to think that he may be delusional
after all), as the two of them realize the trust and attraction that had been
growing between them and begin to wonder if the disaster really is just around
the corner and whether or not the Army of the Twelve Monkeys are the real
culprits. Meanwhile, Cole ponders the meaning of a recurring dream which
echoes an experience from his childhood, in which he sees a man shot by an
airport security guard as a woman calls after him. It's never clear exactly
what is coming next in TWELVE MONKEYS, but the twists in
plot and character, however intricate and complex, never seem contrived or
phony: the script flows naturally, especially for a fantasy film, and the way
in which Cole's dream finally fits into the big picture is both logical and
quite poignant. 
Gilliam's vision of both present and future is about as bleak as they come.
What we see of human society in 2035 seems devoid of any vitality and is
instead surviving by nothing more than a sort of plodding inertia under a
vaguely authoritarian structure (the scientists "volunteer" Cole for their
experiments against his will, and among his criminal charges are violations of
the "Permanent Emergency Code"). The present doesn't fare much better, from
the dilapidated, chaotic Baltimore mental hospital to urban Philadelphia,
where Cole and Railly encounter violent thugs in abandoned buildings,
countless homeless people inhabiting the run-down streets, walls covered with
graffiti, and a strange man who assaults them and claims that their hotel room
is his "territory." One gets the feeling that, had a lethal virus not been
unleashed into this society three weeks later, it might have eaten itself
alive in a few more years anyway. 
Still, TWELVE MONKEYS does not insist on fear and despair to the exclusion of
everything else: even in the face of the present and future (or, from his
view, past and present) horrors he has witnessed, Cole's enjoyment of the
simple things like the open air or a pleasant song on the radio is honest and
genuinely innocent. One of the best scenes comes near the end, when, for a
reason I won't reveal here, a group of wild animals escape the zoo and run
across buildings and freeways: it's sort of like the last gasp of humor and
amusement before the impending onslaught of the virus. Aside from general fear
and confusion, this is probably the most pervasive emotional motif in the
film: the beauty of these simple things, even in the face of pervasive
insanity and destruction. Perhaps the strongest testimony to this is that
towards the end, Cole actually begins to hope that he is delusional, because
he and Railly might have a future together in this world and in the absence of
the virus. 
If there's anything wrong with TWELVE MONKEYS, it's that it tries to do a few
too many things at once. The question of how society decides someone is insane
is raised several times, but Gilliam and the screenwriters seem to have
forgotten about it by the end: nowhere in the last half hour or so is it even
acknowledged. Similarly, the way the script leaves it ambiguous as to whether
or not the film's events are real or are taking place in Cole's imagination
amounts to little more than a distraction. The film would have worked
perfectly well as a drama with a science fiction backdrop without introducing
the possibility of an unreliable first-person viewpoint. Gilliam is a talented
director, but even he seems to find his hands full when trying to do science
fiction, drama, mystery, romance, and satire all at once. 
Whatever its minor flaws, the film is sophisticated and poignant and surely
deserves to be remembered as a science fiction classic - no less than what one
would expect when the creative minds behind BRAZIL and BLADE RUNNER join
forces. I can't quite give it four stars, but I can say this: TWELVE MONKEYS
is probably the best 3-1/2 star film I have ever seen. 

Title
Review for Shallow Grave (1994)
Shallow Grave  *** (out of four)
R, 1995
Directed by Danny Boyle. Written by John Hodge.
Starring Ewan McGregor, Kerry Fox, Christopher Eccleston.
While watching "Shallow Grave," I found myself periodically noticing thematic
similarities to the Coens' "Blood Simple." Both are good films in which
several characters, none of whom are the most conscientious to have walked the
earth but still are not really evil, indulge in an act of deception that soon
necessitates more serious crimes. The body count rises, and before long
seemingly normal people have blood on their hands.
Both films are also flawed, but for different reasons. "Blood Simple" is
unrelentingly dark and moody, but its characterizations were a little hollow.
"Shallow Grave," on the other hand, is nearly flawless for an hour and twenty
minutes, and then the filmmakers throw away much of what they'd accomplished
for a more standard, audience-pleasing ending. The events of the film were
sufficiently intense and disturbing that I honestly felt quite troubled by
what I was witnessing on screen most of the time, yet there was a slight grin
on my face at the end.
As the film begins, we are introduced to Alex (Ewan McGregor), Juliet (Kerry
Fox), and David (Christopher Eccleston), a Scottish trio living in an
apartment in Glasgow. They are all sarcastic and occasionally obnoxious, but
other than that they seem like a fairly normal bunch. A man named Hugo moves
into the apartment's remaining vacancy, and the next morning he is found dead
of a drug overdose. Juliet is about to call the police when Alex discovers
that Hugo had brought with him a suitcase filled to the brim with cash
(presumably from criminal activities).
The three eventually decide to keep the money and cover up the death; after a
drawing of straws, the particularly unenviable task of mutilating the body so
as to make it unidentifiable and burying it falls to David, who had been the
most reluctant to partake in the scheme from the beginning. All of this
transpires in the first twenty minutes or so of the film, and part of what
makes "Shallow Grave" so brilliant for a while is that I honestly had no idea
what was coming next. Other than the obvious question of why they don't report
the death and simply hide the cash, which is not addressed, the plotting and
characterization, while sometimes predictable, worked in a way that kept my
attention and, on more than one occasion, gave me chills.
I will, therefore, attempt to continue this review in a way that doesn't give
away too much of the plot. Broadly, the trio are in danger due to Hugo's
underworld connections, as two goons search for the money and kill several
people in the process. A police inspector (Ken Stott) is clearly suspicious
and visits the apartment, asking pointed questions and trying to unnerve the
three suspects by exchanging banal and weirdly humorous bits of dialogue with
a junior detective. David, meanwhile, becomes increasingly paranoid, moves
into the attic, and develops an affinity for sharp objects. Director Danny
Boyle effectively creates an atmosphere of mounting tension and suspicion in
the apartment, and finally the three seem ready to turn against each other.
While I do not consider myself the "happy endings are automatically stupid"
type, I thought that "Shallow Grave" really should have ended in tragedy - a
realistic analysis of the story up to the last ten minutes of the film would
indicate that all three characters were probably about to end up in prison, in
the mental hospital, or in the morgue. This could have been accomplished,
quite credibly, but then Boyle and screenwriter John Hodge seem to flinch and
opt for a more conventional "caper" ending in which we get a kick out of
seeing who outsmarted whom, and nothing more. Granted, this isn't really a
"happy" ending, but it's still pretty light-hearted compared to what preceded
it. I really shouldn't say anything more about the ending as far as details
go, but let me add that it seemed not only shallow and lazy but also
inconsistent with the rest of the film and not very believable.
Yes, this ending made me crack a smile for a couple of minutes, but ultimately
it left me feeling as if I'd been cheated. Still, "Shallow Grave" was
brilliant most of the way through, and it does at least meet the minimum
requirements for an entertaining thriller, and I am therefore awarding it
three stars. I guess I just can't help but think about that fourth star that
Boyle and Hodge let slip away.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Dune (1984)
Dune (PG-13, 1984)
Written and directed by David Lynch. Based on the novel by Frank Herbert.
Starring Kyle MacLachlan.
        Whatever you want to say about Dune,  you can't say that the story
didn't have potential. At first glance, it might seem like the typical
science-fiction epic: the population of a desert planet known as Arrakis, or
Dune, rises up to fight the exploitation of their most valuable resource, a
certain type of spice, by a dictatorial emperor and his evil allies. Like Luke
Skywalker of the Star Wars  trilogy, the hero Paul Atreides (Kyle MacLachlan)
possesses supernatural powers that enable him to lead this revolution.
        Unlike in Star Wars,  however, the mythology behind this character and
his role in fulfilling an ancient prophecy are developed in considerable
detail. In fact, one might say that the primary plotline of Dune  is
Atreides's gradual realization that he is the long-awaited messiah and his
difficulties and trials in living up to these expectations rather than the
good-vs.-evil political conflict, although the film certainly does not shy
away from showing the evil-doers in all their revolting ugliness. Dune  thus
takes on a much darker and more mysterious tone, and gives us a more
sophisticated story, than most sci-fi epic adventures.
        Now for the bad news. First of all, the original cut of the film was
sliced up by the production company, who feared it would be too long. Instead,
they give us a film that just has too many loose ends; one of the story's
strengths-its attention to detail-also becomes a weakness as too many plot
points and characters are introduced but never fully explained. I can't speak
for everyone, but I personally would rather watch a long movie and come away
from it understanding these points than watch a shorter movie and leave
thinking that I was supposed to get more out of it than I did.
        David Lynch puts his directing skills to good use, especially when the
material allows him to exercise his talent for dark, surreal imagery. Paul
Atreides's mysterious visions can stand alongside any Lynch-directed dream
sequence, and the unnerving horror of the scenes with the sadistic Baron
Harkonnen is enough to make him a classic Lynch villain. Unfortunately, I
can't sing the same praises for Lynch's screenplay. There are a few things
that just probably aren't going to work in a movie, regardless of how
interesting the story is or how competent the acting and directing. One is
dubbed voice-overs of the characters' thoughts. Another is a duel between the
hero and a rather insignificant sleazebag thug at the end-after  the
climactic, effects-intensive, epic battle between "good" and "evil." Dune, 
alas, has both of these.
        What we have in Dune, then, is a great idea that is only partially
realized. It could have been a remarkably sophisticated and engaging hybrid of
supernatural drama and science fiction epic. But between the studio's
slicing-and-dicing of the original cut and Lynch's small but noticeable
tactical mistakes in narrative structure, it ultimately falls short of its
full potential.

Title
Review for Paris, Texas (1984)
Paris, Texas  * * * * (out of four)
R, 1984
Directed by Wim Wenders. Written by Sam Shepard.
Starring Harry Dean Stanton, Dean Stockwell, Natassja Kinski. 
When I had finished watching Wim Wenders's "Paris, Texas", I knew I had just
seen an excellent film, though I find it difficult to articulate exactly why
it works so well. I think its greatest virtue is its low-key tone; this is by
far the best personal drama I have seen in a long time, yet it is almost
entirely lacking in what one would normally consider "dramatic tension." It is
more powerful and poignant than most films, yet there are few tears shed and
almost no harsh words or raised voices. 
"Paris, Texas" opens with the very simple image of a man (Harry Dean Stanton)
walking through a barren landscape by himself along the Texas/Mexico border.
He eventually wanders into the office of a local physician, but literally
refuses to speak. Eventually he is identified; his name is Travis, and he has
a brother named Walt (Dean Stockwell) who lives in Los Angeles. Walt, who has
not seen or heard from Travis in four years, drives across the country to pick
him up, only to find that Travis either cannot remember where he has been or
simply isn't telling. To complicate matters, Travis's wife has also been
missing for the last four years, and Walt and his wife have been caring for
their son ever since. 
>From then on, "Paris, Texas" proceeds as a recounting of how Travis's family
fell apart and an examination of his attempt to forge a new connection with
his son and put right what has gone terribly wrong. Travis gradually emerges
as a man who seems to crave the solitude of the open road; he seems most at
home during his cross-country driving trips with Walt and later with his son.
Wenders makes use of many exterior shots during these segments, which, along
with the folk-guitar score, infuse the story with a sense of melancholy and
longing. Wenders and screenwriter Sam Shepard appropriately manage both to
romanticize Travis's loner tendencies and to point out the shortcomings of
such an approach to life - there are many moments, such as when Travis stops
to give a pat on the back to one of Los Angeles's many roadside prophets, that
are touching and make us admire Travis as a human being, yet in no way does
the film excuse his role in his family's breakup. 
The development of Travis as a somewhat flawed but sympathetic character who
wants to make amends is one of the film's strongest points, but what makes it
most exceptional is its style. It tells a simple, straightforward story in a
way that is quite unconventional at least by movie standards. Rather than
apologizing for its simplicity by heaping up melodramatic outbursts,
gratuitous sex scenes, and the like, it wears it as a badge of honor and
focuses sharply on the characters. It's a shame that more filmmakers don't
realize that their characters and stories are strong enough to carry a movie
and as a result go for flashy sensationalism to cover their backs. But, until
that happens, "Paris, Texas" holds its own as a refreshing reminder that there
are still at least a few exceptions to the rule in the film industry. 
NOTE: The 'R' rating for this film is, in my opinion, quite inappropriate, as
there is literally no violence or nudity, only one use of the "f-word," and
only one instance of implied sexual content. A 'PG-13' rating would have
sufficed. 
Visit my Film Reviews Page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Blood Simple (1984)
Blood Simple  *** (out of four)
R, 1984
Directed by Joel Coen. Written by Joel and Ethan Coen.
Starring John Getz, Frances McDormand, Dan Hedaya, M. Emmet Walsh.
It might surprise some to know that Joel and Ethan Coen, who have brought such
unabated lunacy to our movie screens as "Raising Arizona"  and "The Hudsucker
Proxy," made their feature film debut with "Blood Simple," a grim and often
gruesome tale of revenge, murder, and literally fatal misconceptions in rural
Texas. It bears some resemblance, story-wise, to the Coens' recent "Fargo,"
but even the darkly satirical humor and the enjoyably quirky characterizations
that characterized that film are scarce here; "Blood Simple" is pretty much
cold and brutal from beginning to end.
The premise of "Blood Simple" is really just a slight variation on the
standard love-triangle/revenge scheme: sleazy bar owner Julian Marty (Dan
Hedaya) hires a shifty private detective (M. Emmet Walsh) to kill his wife
Abby (Frances McDormand) and her illicit lover Ray (John Getz). Things start
to go haywire when Walsh decides instead to fake the murder with photographic
trickery but, upon collecting the money, becomes uncertain as to whether or
not Marty is capable of keeping his mouth shut about the scheme.
To reveal any more details of the story would be to give away too much, but
what ensues is a series of bloody (and I do mean bloody) confrontations, each
triggered by one or more characters misunderstanding what is actually
happening. Every act of violence or deception in this film makes sense when
seen through the perpetrator's eyes, but we, the audience, are made privy to
the "big picture" and thus can recognize that each misdeed is somehow either
unnecessary or directed at the wrong person. This aspect of the story, along
with the intense atmosphere of repulsion and brutality - one gets the sense
that if guns and, in one case, shovels, were not available, some of these
characters would claw each other to death - are the most effective components
of the film. The Coens might have done well to title the film "Fear and
Loathing in Texas."
Some have labeled "Blood Simple  as a modern-day noir, but, while I am not an
expert on either genre, it seems more like a horror movie than anything else.
The Coens seem much more interested in the plot twists and the atmosphere of
confusion and paranoia than they do in the characters, and the final sequence
is nothing more than a showdown between the one (relatively) innocent
character and the only one of the murderers left alive. That said, "Blood
Simple" is a very good horror movie; the fear and suspense here are genuine.
The Coens also add plenty of quirky touches that nudge the weirdness meter
upwards, such as when a character enters an empty room and accidentally steps
on a gun, discharging it as it skitters across the floor, or when a murder
attempt unfolds in a way such that Abby mistakes her attacker for another
character who has in fact been killed earlier in the film.
That said, "Blood Simple" is not exactly flawless. For one thing, the
motivations for the killings are still a little thin at times; I can
understand that the characters had tracks to cover (or at least thought they
did), but I found it a little hard to accept that all of them would so quickly
resort to murder. And although they at least didnt have anyone get hacked to
death with a knife, the Coens also aren't quite immune to horror cliches; they
indulge in a prolonged
dead-guy-seems-to-have-come-back-to-life-but-then-we-find-out-it's-only-a-dream
scene that had me rolling my eyes. The film also ends so quickly after the
final confrontation that I found myself wondering if they had simply run out
of film.
"Blood Simple" is not quite the masterpiece of neo-noir that many seem to
think it is, but it's a decent movie and it showcases the Coens' ability to
handle suspense and violence in a visceral but non-exploitative manner. I
would firmly recommend it to all "Coen-heads" as well as anyone looking for
something original in a thriller.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Having been an avowed X-Phile for several years, I wasn't sure how best to
approach the task of reviewing this X-FILES feature film. I had thought
that I should try to write the review as objectively as possible and
distance myself from my fandom, but I realized that this would probably be
a dubious endeavor on my part, to say the least. And since most of the
other reviews I've read have been written by those who do not watch the
show, I've decided to throw objectivity to the wind and offer the
perspective of an admitted die-hard fan.
Whether you watch the show or not, you probably know that it involves the
efforts of FBI Agents Fox Mulder (David Duchovny) and Dana Scully (Gillian
Anderson) to investigate paranormal phenomena. Over the show's five
seasons, this assignment has led them into the increasingly dangerous
depths of an international government conspiracy to conceal the truth about
the existence of alien life. As the film begins, the X-Files have been
closed and Mulder and Scully have been given a routine assignment
investigating a bomb threat. Unfortunately, the assignment doesn't turn out
to be quite so routine: the agents barely escape with their lives as the
bomb levels a building in what appears to be a cover-up of several bizarre
deaths in Northern Texas. Before long, the eccentric Dr. Alvin Kurtzweil
(Martin Landau) contacts Mulder, claiming to have inside information which
indicates that the bomb may have been the doing of the sinister
conspirators that have frustrated Mulder and Scully for so long.
THE X-FILES has been promoted as an action movie, but it's really more of a
hi-tech political thriller with a science fiction backdrop. There are
several big action set pieces, particularly a riveting sequence towards the
end in Antarctica, but like the TV series, this movie is more about
intrigue, paranoia, and searching for the truth than chases and explosions.
It sets up the mystery effectively in the first half hour or so,
alternating back and forth between the two agents' situation and the
efforts of a shady government organization to conceal the existence of a
seemingly alien-originated virus. While Mulder and Scully try to gather
evidence of the mysterious circumstances surrounding the initial bombing,
the conspirators, among them the Cigarette-Smoking Man (William B. Davis),
the Well-Manicured Man (John Neville), and a German named Strughold (Armin
Mueller-Stahl), scramble to protect their long-held plans for the future of
the planet.
Since part of the fun of political thrillers in general and of the ongoing
storyline of the "X-Files" TV series is following the plot developments, I
won't give away any more actual story elements. I can say, however, that
the move to the big screen does seem worthwhile: the two agents'
investigations have a much larger scope than they previously have, and the
movie also injects a new dose of horror into the alien conspiracy thread.
The ending, as one might expect, is somewhat open-ended: series creator
Chris Carter, who wrote the screenplay, provides an effective temporary
resolution while leaving the door open for further mysteries in coming TV
episodes. And yes, fellow X-Philes, we do in fact get some of the
long-awaited answers about the elusive conspiracy.
As is the case in the show, the story is given an extra little spark by the
Mulder and Scully characters, who have an interesting believer/skeptic
dynamic (though Scully's skepticism is understandably waning at this point
in the story) and who must have one of the most enigmatic relationships in
Hollywood history. They clearly care for each other very deeply and depend
on one another for support, yet they are almost obsessively dedicated to
their work (particularly Mulder, who believes his sister was abducted by
aliens) and are careful to avoid any overtly romantic gestures. This film
finds them addressing what their quest for the truth means to them and what
they mean to each other more openly than they ever have on the TV show,
while managing to preserve some of the enigma and ultimately revitalizing
the two characters. I especially liked the scenes in which each of them
worries that he or she is somehow weighing down the other, that the quest
has become too personal and their work too marginal to be worthwhile. It's
interesting to see that they're thoughtful enough to consider this, even
though Carter's screenplay rightly posits that their worries are unfounded:
whether they realize it or not, Mulder and Scully are true crusaders for
justice.
The missteps in THE X-FILES are for the most part minor and scattered. The
screenplay gets a little overdramatic at times, such as when a government
agent worries that the "impossible scenario we never had a plan for" is now
developing, or when the two agents shout "Mulder!" and "Scully!" almost a
dozen times during a chase scene. Director Rob Bowman executes most of the
action sequences perfectly, but he cuts from scene to scene extremely
quickly in a few places; in one scene, for example, Mulder thinks he is
being followed and ducks around a corner, and in the very next shot he's
walking in his apartment door. There are also a few plot holes, most
notably the fact that the conspirators don't seem to guard their secrets
too carefully (though the TV series has gotten away with this conceit for a
long time as well).
The screenplay does manage to bring new viewers up to speed pretty quickly
without indulging in overly awkward exposition: it should work as an
entertaining, intelligent thriller even for those who haven't followed the
show. The main disadvantage for non-X-Philes, I think, is that they might
not have quite the same sense of the extent of the conspiracy and the
ordeal that Mulder and Scully have endured in trying to expose it; for
these viewers, a *** rating might be more appropriate. If you really want
an objective analysis, however, I'd have to advise you to go read some
other review. From my own hopelessly biased perspective, I'd say that it's
about as good as I had hoped: it's essential to the "X-Files" storyline,
it's worth seeing on the big screen, the characters make some important
decisions, and yet enough of the mystery is preserved. The truth is still
out there, and it's just as intriguing as ever.

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
If I had skipped the Farrelly brothers' THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, I
think I could comfortably say that HOME FRIES is the strangest romantic
comedy I have ever seen. As it is, it can't quite match the gross-out gags
of MARY on the weirdness meter, but's actually a slightly better movie, if
nothing else because its mix of light-hearted romance and dark humor never
seems forced.
As HOME FRIES begins, Henry (Robin Williams) stops by the drive-in at
Burger-Matic and speaks to Sally (Drew Barrymore), who is eight months
pregnant with Henry's illegitimate child. On his way home, Henry is
suddenly intercepted by a black helicopter that descends from the sky,
chases him, and frightens him so much that he dies of a heart attack. Soon
after, we learn that the helicopter was piloted by Henry's stepsons Dorian
(Luke Wilson) and Angus (Jake Busey), whose mother (Catherine O'Hara)
suggested the stunt when she learned of Henry's infidelity.
While piloting the helicopter, Dorian and Angus had crossed frequencies
with the employee headsets at Burger-Matic, which means that Sally and some
of the other employees may have overheard their conversation. Angus, who is
extremely paranoid and fiercely loyal to his mother, prods Dorian, who had
been reluctant to participate in the scheme in the first place, into taking
a job at Burger-Matic in order to find out how much anyone there knows.
There he falls in love with Sally, which is also a problem, seeing as Angus
and his mother plan to kill her as well once they find out about her
involvement with Henry. (Believe me, all of this makes much more sense on
screen than it does on paper.)
>From this point on, director Dean Parisot and screenwriter Vince Gilligan
use this setup for a number of bizarre confrontations and situations--some
of them hilarious, some of them disturbing, and some of them both--while
crafting the oddball romance between Dorian and Sally, who emerge as
genuinely likable and believable. Aside from the romance angle, the
characterizations are certainly interesting, though a bit puzzling at time.
Dorian is somewhat of a dim bulb, but he turns out to be good-natured nice
guy, so much so that one can scarcely believe he took part in the
helicopter scheme (though it does seem that he may have thought the plan
was only to scare Henry, not kill him). His mother is by far the most
frightening and manipulative of anyone in the film, though she too is a
little awkward in places: there's a scene at Henry's funeral in which she
completely overdoes her fake grief, and I'm not sure whether she was
supposed to seem hateful and nasty here or just kind of dumb and pathetic.
Still, even the more uncertain scenes do not seriously disrupt the story,
and they seem to flow naturally even if their purpose is unclear.
With its mix of humor both light and dark and its rural setting, HOME
FRIES bears some resemblance to the Coen Brothers' RAISING ARIZONA, and in
fact I wouldn't be surprised if that film was a direct influence: Gilligan,
an admitted Coen-head, reportedly wrote this script back in 1989, only two
years after RAISING ARIZONA was released. It's a tough act to follow, and
Parisot and Gilligan certainly don't match the Coens' comic genius, but
they have created some hilarious scenes here. The best is probably Dorian's
first day at work at Burger-Matic, which is a laugh a second for anyone
who's ever labored in fast food hell. He gets rapid-fire,
impossible-to-follow directions on how to prepare people's orders ("This
ain't a pickle burger!" another employee scolds him when he puts too many
pickles on a hamburger), tries to change into the costume of the
restaurant's mascot in the freezer, and finally beats the jammed freezer
door open with a slab of meat, only to find that someone is now holding up
the restaurant with a shotgun.
It's tough to say whether or not HOME FRIES is entirely successful, since I
often wasn't sure whether it was supposed to be funny or just plain weird.
But I was rooting for Dorian and Sally by the end, and I was certainly
never bored or irritated with the film, and that ought to count for
something.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews archived at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Glen or Glenda (1953)
Glen or Glenda? (NR, 1953) Directed, written by Ed Wood. Starring Ed Wood,
Bela Lugosi.
        Certainly no one would rent Ed Wood's Glen or Glenda?  expecting to
see a good movie, but this screwy discourse about transvestitism betrays a
level of incompetence that I didn't know was possible. In fact, Wood's
infamous Plan 9 From Outer Space  actually seems pretty tame by comparison.
Watching Glen or Glenda?  I found myself occasionally wondering if Wood had
originally made two or three separate movies and accidentally edited them
together; as a result, it is actually quite entertaining in that it is
unintentionally hilarious.
        The movie starts out as what mostly seems like a bad documentary, with
endless, repetitive narration about transvestites, how difficult it is for a
transvestite to look at his girlfriend's clothes without being able to wear
them, how transvestites are not necessarily homosexuals, and how the main
character, Glen/Glenda is (as it reminds us probably half a dozen times) "not
half man and half woman, but man and woman at the same time." The camera work
is terrible-occasionally the camera lingers on, say, a closed door while the
characters talk off-screen, or inexplicably zooms in on someone's ear or nose.
Wood also makes copious use of mostly irrelevant stock footage, which leads to
voiced-over non-sequiturs like, "Yes, our world is a busy and frightening
place, with so many people driving their automobiles." Finally, there is
occasional commentary from Bela Lugosi as a sort of omniscient being who seems
to inhabit a Frankenstein-style laboratory, delivering pointless lines such
as, "People . . . all with their own thoughts . . . their own ideas . . . ."
while lightning crackles quasi-ominously overhead.
        Had Wood continued in this vein, Glen or Glenda?  probably would have
been remembered as nothing more than a poorly done documentary with the
occasional inappropriate horror-movie touch. Unfortunately, he then wanders so
far off into left field that you have to wonder if he had been eating some
funny mushrooms when he wrote the script. "Pull the string! Pull the string!"
announces an alarmed Lugosi as stock footage of buffalo appears. There is
another crash of lightning before Lugosi returns, this time warning us,
"Beware . . . beware the big green dragon that lurks outside your door! . . .
It eats little boys . . . and puppy dogs' tails . . . and big fat snails!" A
bizarre nightmare sequence, which is probably meant to be symbolic but instead
is just incredibly stupid, ensues, during which Glen/Glenda finds his fiance
trapped under a fallen tree-in the living room. Someone who is apparently
intended to be the sinister "green dragon" (but looks more like a Klingon from
the original Star Trek  series) appears to be orchestrating all this, though
the film is far from clear on this point (to put it kindly). Near the end of
this scene-and here I must confess that Wood lost me completely-is a violent
sexual encounter on a couch that features two characters who do not even
appear in the rest of the movie and is scored by goofily upbeat folk music.
        After this scene ends (not a moment too soon), Glen or Glenda?  
returns to its documentary style, but at that point any lingering sense that
Wood had the slightest idea what he was doing is pretty much gone. The film
wanders to a dumb happy ending that also seems to abandon much of what it was
trying to say about transvestitism, but at that point it didn't matter much
what happened. As soon as the aforementioned sex scene was over, Glen or
Glenda?  had pretty much cemented its place in my mind as the most incoherent
film I had ever seen. I honestly think that if I picked up my camcorder and
deliberately tried to make the worst movie I possibly could, it still might
not match Glen or Glenda?  for sheer cinematic disaster. I am giving this
movie an F, but I'm not sure that quite does it justice.
Grade: F

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
I'm not quite sure how best to go about writing this review. I must admit that
I was a little disappointed by Barry Levinson's political satire "Wag The
Dog," but in retrospect, this has less to do with the film itself than with
false expectations I had going into it. Quite a few of the reviews I have read
led me to believe that this film was absolutely hilarious and would make me
laugh out loud the whole way through, and it didn't do that. They also led me
to believe that it would deliver a vicious and all-too-true attack on the way
the American political media works, and it didn't quite do that either. A few
of them even suggested that it would prove a worthy successor to Stanley
Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove" in the tradition of political black comedy, and it
most definitely didn't do that. 
That said, "Wag The Dog" is actually a very clever satire on the shady
manipulations of political figures and those who assist them. The story
revolves around the attempts of political spin doctor Conread Brean (Robert
DeNiro) to distract the American public from the accusations that the
President, who is up for re-election in two weeks, sexually harassed a young
girl in the Oval Office. The accusations, the script suggests, are probably
untrue, but as Brean so pointedly puts it, that isn't particularly relevant:
the scandal is likely to derail the President's campaign regardless of its
truth or falsehood. Brean, along with his assistant (Anne Heche), decide to
contact Hollywood producer Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman) to enlist his help
in concocting enough propaganda and special-effects trickery to make it appear
that the U.S. is going to war with Albanian terrorists and thus propel the
President to victory on a wave of patriotic fervor. 
As I said, "Wag The Dog" is not quite as laugh-out-loud hilarious as I had
expected, but there are some genuinely funny moments to be found here, such as
when, in an echo of a familiar movie clich, the camera pans out over an urban
sunset to the strains of uplifting, inspirational music, then cuts to a studio
to reveal that the singing is coming from a group of musicians whom Motss has
assembled to perform "We Have The Right To Fight For Democracy." Another scene
shows us how, with modern editing equipment, an actress running across a sound
stage with a bag of potato chips can be turned into a frightened young girl
and her kitten fleeing a terrorist attack on her village. The most
consistently effective gag revolves around the propaganda team's attempt to
forge a fictional war hero out of Sgt. William "Old Shoe" Schumann (Woody
Harrelson), an ex-military officer who turns out to be a first-class psycho. 
Of course, not everything goes as planned; the CIA, for example, realizes
what's going on and strikes a deal with the President's electoral opponent to
report to the media that the "fighting" has ended, forcing Motss and Brean to
come up with a new angle on the supposed Albanian crisis. Still, even with the
CIA's involvement, the film falls a little short in terms of making this
scenario believable. Regardless of the official word from the President or the
CIA, wouldn't the major media outlets have Eastern European correspondents who
could verify that there is, in fact, no fighting going on in Albania? The film
never addresses this question, nor does it show the reactions of the American
public to the news of the apparent war except for a few scenes which border on
the farcical, such as when basketball fans litter the court with shoes in
support of the aforementioned Sgt. Schumann; we are apparently meant to assume
that everyone is buying it. There was also an instance, towards the end of the
film, in which one of Motss's forced reinventions of the story seems to
contradict what he and Brean had been selling to the public thus far and could
conceivably have given the game away. 
With these plot holes, "Wag The Dog" doesn't quite work as a satire of
American politics, but it does send up the mentality that might lead to these
kinds of machinations in the first place. Brean and his advisors never seem
concerned that what they are doing is unethical; rather, they worry about how
convincing it will be and whether or not they have enough money to pull it
off. The film takes a decidely dark turn towards the end, as we learn how far
they are willing to go in order to keep the propaganda campaign a secret.
Motss and his Hollywood buddies, meanwhile, seem completely out of touch with
the rest of the world and just see this undertaking as another creative
project. In fact, one of the sources of conflict in the film is Motss's
increasing restlessness with the idea of not being able to take credit for
producing the fake war; in his mind, it is the greatest work of art he has
ever created. 
I think it's fair to say that "Wag The Dog" underachieves a little bit: more
attention to the public reaction and tighter plotting might have made this
into a four-star film and a classic satire. Still, the issue of an American
President using war and patriotism to distract from scandals or domestic
unpopularity is a very real one. Wag The Dog takes the issue one step further
and asks, what if the war wasn't even real? With this premise and the talented
cast, the film still delivers more consistently than most, whatever its flaws. 

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Since Hollywood has gone through tornadoes, volcanoes, sinking ships, and
exploding buses in recent years, I suppose it was only natural that the realm
of disaster movies would extend into the realm of destruction by space garbage
before too long. Accordingly, this summer we get DEEP IMPACT, in which a 7-1/
2-mile wide comet is on a collision course with Earth, and ARMAGEDDON, in
which an asteroid the size of Texas is, well, on a collision course with
Earth. The creative forces behind DEEP IMPACThave stressed that theirs is a
film about how human relationships and decisions are affected by the possibly
impending disaster, as opposed to the apparently more action-driven
ARMAGEDDON.
They are partly right. A team of astronauts, led by Capt. Sturgeon Tanner
(Robert Duvall) is dispatched to destroy the comet, but I'd say that at least
70% of the movie takes place on Earth, where the President (Morgan Freeman) is
trying to develop contingency plans in case the disaster can't be averted,
among them a national lottery in which 1 million Americans are chosen to live
underground for two years while the dust will settle. Meanwhile, we follow
several other characters as they try to deal with the possibly impending
destruction, such as the star reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), who is still
constantly struggling to get along with her father, and two teenage
sweethearts, one of whom has been chosen in the lottery and the other who has
not. The astronauts manage to break the comet into two pieces, leaving several
possibilities: (a) no disaster will strike at all, if land-based missile
defense systems can deflect the comet pieces; (b) the smaller piece will land
in the ocean, causing 100-foot tidal waves to destroy shoreline areas but
allowing most of the planet to survive; (c) both pieces hit the earth, wiping
out all plant, animal, and human life. (Hint: which do you think would allow
for both a happy ending and an extended special-effects destruction sequence?)
The problem is that the more action/disaster-oriented sequences are actually
the ones that are the most effective. The astronauts' tense and ultimately
botched comet-walk and the tidal wave's decapitation of the Statue of Liberty
as it topples New York City skyscrapers pointedly illustrate the fragile
nature of human existence, and the astronauts' painful goodbyes to their
families via NASA satellite when they decide to make a last-ditch suicide run
at the larger comet piece is heroic enough to jerk a few tears from the
audience. But the only scene involving the drama unfolding on Earth that can
match any of those mentioned above is the one in which armed military vehicles
pour through suburban streets to escort one of the "chosen" families to the
underground caves. The "impact" of the other moments of human dramais, I'm
afraid to say, rather shallow.
Part of the reason for this is that there just a few too many things going on
at once in DEEP IMPACT. Towards the beginning, it almost seems like it's going
to turn into a black-comic media satire. When the President first breaks the
news about the comet, for example, we see a TV newsroom where reporters are
scrambling and shouting things like, "Where the hell is the Science Division?"
and "Does anyone know how big the one was that killed the dinosaurs?"
Meanwhile, one of the two teenagers, who helped to discover the comet, is
encouraged by a classmate, "You're going to have a lot more sex now that
you're famous. That's the best reason to be famous, you know."
This angle soon fades into the background, however, and once the inital comet-
walk is over, the screenplay's focus shifts to the quandaries of the various
characters. Unfortunately, the film doesn't spend enough time to develop them
in much depth and just skips to the crying scenes. We appreciate these scenes
intellectually, but we don't really feel for the characters because we don't
know them very well. James Cameron, in writing and directing TITANIC, knew
that the audience needed to get to know his characters as normal people before
he sent them running down corridors filled with freezing water. In DEEP
IMPACT, we see the teenagers discovering the comet and pondering their future
in light of the lottery, and we see Leoni, who has also been selected, trying
one last time to reconcile with her possibly doomed father and delivering news
reports about the comet, but we never see how they would behave in everyday
situations.
The plot, meanwhile, is a bit skimpy, and as a result it has holes big enough
for a 7-1/2-mile wide comet to fly through. I'm still not sure what was the
point of a car accident which occurred at the start of the movie: we are led
to believe that important information about the comet was lost in the crash,
but later we learn that it was recovered completely intact. Also, why wouldn't
the world's governments build more than one spaceship in case the first crew's
mission failed? I realize it's expensive, but even Washington budget-cutters
could probably be convinced to spare a few bucks for averting the end of the
world. And why didn't the astronauts land on the comet more than an hour
before sunrise would turn the thing into an outer-space mine field? The script
also leaves some plot points unclear, such as what exactly is the problem with
the missile defense, and whether or not the President had intended to take a
spot in the underground bunkers.
Perhaps the biggest sin of DEEP IMPACT, however, is that it pulls some of its
punches. There are reports of street fighting in Russia, and it looks towards
the end as if a neighborhood has been looted, but we never actually see any of
this happen. At the end, the President tells us that "millions have been
lost," but rather than show us the aftermath of the devastation, Leder decides
to give us some applause and flag-waving at the President's promise of
rebuilding and renewal. I had hoped the film might examine some of these
issues more directly, particularly given the screenplay credit to Michael
Tolkin, who showed in his 1991 film THE RAPTUREthat he has a pretty good idea
how crazy some people can get when they think the end of the world is right
around the corner. DEEP IMPACT, however, seems content to show us news reports
of pre-apocalyptic hysteria rather than the real thing.
DEEP IMPACTmakes a noble effort at telling a more human story than most big-
budget Hollywood disaster flicks, and for that it is to be commended. What it
would be like if a comet really was about to hit the earth, however, remains
to be seen. Or filmed, as the case may be.
Send comments and suggestions to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page: http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Most films about slavery address the subject by immersing themselves in the
America of the early to late 1800s, showing us first-hand the cruelty of
the system and the cold-hearted selfishness of those who perpetuated its
existence. While there's nothing wrong with this, it's always nice to see a
fresh approach to the topic, and Jonathan Demme delivers that with his new
film BELOVED, based (very faithfully, I'm told) on the Toni Morrison novel
of the same name.
BELOVED stays away from Southern slave plantations for the most part,
instead focusing on an African-American family living in rural Ohio in the
1870s. The mother Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) is an ex-slave who lives with her
daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise), her two sons having left the house in
fear eight years earlier. The house is haunted by the spirit of Sethe's
youngest daughter, who apparently died as an infant. Into this setting
wanders Paul D (Danny Glover), an old friend from the slave plantation who
soon becomes Sethe's lover and who can help her fill in at least one
important blank from her past. Adding to an already bizarre situation is
the sudden appearance of Beloved (Thandie Newton), an apparently sick and
traumatized young girl who mysteriously shows up in Sethe's backyard one
afternoon and who seems to have lost her memory.
There isn't much of a plot per se in BELOVED. The film instead concentrates
on the interactions between Sethe, Paul D, Beloved, and Denver. The
screenwriters make a wise choice in withholding the whole picture from the
audience, thus ensuring the viewers' interest as the characters are
sketched out on-screen. Gradually, our questions are answered as to why
Sethe's neighbors scorn her when the family goes to the local carnival, how
the ghostly first daughter died, and how Sethe originally escaped from
slavery, and why her husband isn't with her. The biggest engima is Beloved
herself, who sometimes seems to be a pleasant-spirited, innocent young
girl, but also sometimes manipulates the situation so as to undermine the
relationships between Sethe, Paul D, and Denver. She clearly has a
connection to the family, but neither the other characters nor the audience
know what it is at first.
The pains and tribulations of the characters' pasts are revealed both
through flashbacks and through their present-day emotions and choices, as
Demme handles the slavery aspect delicately without indulging in obvious
manipulation or sentimentality. BELOVED doesn't seek to portray slavery
itself, but its after-effects on those who survived it. The use of the
supernatural might seem out of place at first, but it actually functions
very well as a metaphorical device. A horrifying secret about Sethe's past
is soon to be revealed, and the supernatural aspect helps to show us a
woman who is quite literally haunted by the past. If BELOVED is "about"
anything other than its characters and their interactions, it's about the
urge to look to the future, even when the past is so unforgettably
horrible. And yet Sethe is not made to look foolish or obsessed: we
understand why she behaves the way she does. Denver is more of a "good
example" in that she wants to get away from their isolated country house
and find work in the city, but then again, she never had to live through
slavery, since she was born while Sethe was on the run. BELOVED manages to
have a "message" and still be compassionate and sympathetic to those who
don't catch onto it at first.
BELOVED may move a little slowly in a few places, but whatever its minor
weaknesses, they are more than compensated for by Demme's skillful
direction, the imaginative style of storytelling, and the outstanding
performances, particularly from Winfrey and from Newton, whose awkward
speech and motion is eerily effective. A well-constructed and deeply honest
film, BELOVED is easily one of the best of the year.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page: http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Fisher King, The (1991)
I really wish they would make more films like THE FISHER KING. Movies these
days seem to have lost sight of one of the most unique aspects of visual
storytelling: its capacity to portray dreams and fantasy. That's not to say
that movies don't ever stretch the boundaries of reality any more, but they
do so cynically and cheaply, littering the screenplay with enough
tongue-in-cheek one-liners so everyone can just relax. "Of course we don't
*really* want you to think that a giant asteroid is going to hit the
earth," filmmakers seem to be saying, "but it sure is fun to watch, isn't
it?" Even Steven Spielberg, who brought such extraordinary stories as CLOSE
ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND and E.T. to our screens, has now tuned his
sensibilities either to fantasies that are essentially negative and
destructive, as in THE LOST WORLD, in which dinosaurs are brought to life
only so they can chase people around and kill them, or to big-budget
historical re-creations (not to take anything away from SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN, of course, but the point's the same).
The preceding paragraph might give readers the mistaken impression that THE
FISHER KING is a fantasy film. It isn't, really: in fact, it takes place in
'90s New York City. The genius of THE FISHER KING is that rather than
simply being an escapist fantasy, it argues for the place of escapist
fantasies in the real world. Director Terry Gilliam is on familiar turf
here, but never before has he given the opposition so much screen time: the
"realists" in his films have previously been either obviously corrupt and
evil (the totalitarian regime in BRAZIL) or almost cartoonishly dull and
crotchety (the parents in TIME BANDITS and the medieval town leader in THE
ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN).
In THE FISHER KING, protagonist Jack Lucas (Jeff Bridges) is a bona fide
'90s cynic if there ever was one. When we first meet him, he's a Howard
Stern-style radio host who makes a living spouting off and insulting his
callers. One night, after making an off-hand comment about "stopping the
impending yuppie takeover," he turns on the TV to find that one of his
listeners apparently took him seriously and shot up a posh restaurant.
Three years later, having quit his showbiz job and freeloading off of his
girlfriend Anne (Mercedes Ruehl), he's depressed and on the verge of
suicide when he's attacked by a pair of muggers, only to be rescued by a
homeless man named Parry (Robin Williams) who believes he's a medieval
knight on a quest for the Holy Grail. He knows where it is, too, and
explains this to Jack, who quickly realizes that Parry's actually talking
about a sports trophy in a wealthy New Yorker's home collection.
Parry's wife, as it turns out, was killed in the restaurant shooting three
years ago, and the personal tragedy is what has spawned his delusions. Jack
understandably feels partly responsible, and decides to try to help Parry,
which can be a rather exasperating task at times: Parry is often distracted
by a "Red Knight" that he believes is chasing him, and talks to "Little
People" who come to visit him occasionally. He's also fallen in love with a
lonely woman (Amanda Plummer) that he sees pass through the train station
every day. Jack and Anne determine to set the two of them up, and Gilliam
handles the goofball romance that develops particularly well, letting them
stay true to their quirky personalities without mocking them or allowing
their scenes to degenerate into farce. Meanwhile, Jack and Anne start to
rediscover some of the magic in their own relationship, which had been
going slowly downhill due to his depression and aimlessness.
In the hands of someone other than Gilliam and screenwriter Richard
LaGravenese, the story might easily have ended here: Jack makes his act of
redemption, Parry is "cured" of his fantasies, and the two couples live
happily ever after. Not in THE FISHER KING. Parry has a relapse, slipping
away into a coma and leaving Jack bewildered. Eventually, he realizes that
the only way to bring Parry out of it is to find his Holy Grail for him.
This is the film's grand gesture: it requires Jack to join Parry in his
fantasy before the two of them can really finish what they started. THE
FISHER KING is a long, hard-fought , and ultimately well-deserved victory
for romanticism and imagination over today's cynical brand of pragmatism.
That's not to say that THE FISHER KING is perfect. It starts to get a
little unwieldy towards the end of its 137-minute running time, as another
crisis for Jack and Anne is unconvincingly introduced. This seemed like a
waste of screen time, and it really wasn't necessary to make Jack rehash
all  his previous conflicts in the final half hour; the unfinished business
with Parry would have been enough. For the most part, however, Gilliam
keeps the story on track, mixing in the right amounts of doubt and
disappointment so that the film's essentially optimistic viewpoint comes
through without seeming sappy or undeveloped. Too many films nowadays stage
an uplifting finish without the story or characters to back it up. THE
FISHER KING is one movie that earns its happy ending.
SEnd comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Scream 2  ***1/2 (out of four)
Directed by Wes Craven. Written by Kevin Williamson.
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette.
Only a year after the initial release of "Scream," the horror send-up from
veteran horror director Wes Craven and screenwriter Kevin Williamson that
seemed to breathe new life into the slasher genre, the inevitable sequel
"Scream 2" has arrived in our theaters. While the tongue-in-cheek, parodic
element is still noticeable in this film, it's really a sideshow to a broader
commentary on violence and the media and a more conventional horror story. The
first film, while often violent and gruesome, was mostly lacking in genuine
scares because almost every scene was played for camp value and the discussion
of the quirks and cliches of horror movies was nearly constant.
The premise of "Scream 2" is that a series of copycat killings begin when a
movie called "Stab," based on a book written by opportunistic reporter Gail
Weathers (Courtney Cox) about the events in "Scream," is released and two
audience members are killed during the opening screening. I had heard about
this scene before I went to see the film and was surprised to find this
sequence largely lacking in camp comedy. Its conclusion, in which a bleeding,
wounded woman stumbles in front of the screen and dies in front of an audience
that cheers on because they think it's a publicity stunt, is more surreal and
disturbing than anything else.
The satire in "Scream 2" thus takes on a broad focus and gradually evolves
into an exploration of media perceptions in general. Although resident horror
film geek Randy (Jamie Kennedy) is back with fresh dialogue about sequels
(and, interestingly enough, how they are usually inferior to their
predecessors), the characters in this movie are drawing from other entries in
the pop culture encyclopedia as well. Everything from "Friends" and "Saved by
the Bell" to "Showgirls" and "Terminator 2" is referenced here; horror is only
one of many genres available for lampooning, and there aren't any "Wes
Carpenter" jokes this time.
More importantly, this film portrays characters willing to go to disturbing
lengths for media attention as well as characters whose perceptions have
clearly been warped by what they have seen on TV and film. The killings are
clearly an imitation of the previous murders from "Scream" (in fact, the
culprit even plans to use the influence of horror movies as a courtroom
defense), Weathers exploits the situation for her own notoriety, and one man
seems willing to save the heroine's life only if it will earn him an interview
on the Today Show. Understandably, "Scream 2" does not go so far as to
actually blame the movies, but rather shows that those who do imitate horror
movies are already sick and twisted.
Couple that with the fact that several of the characters, most notably the
lead character Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell), are fairly well-developed and
that there are some genuine moments of spine-chilling suspense, and what we
have is a pretty darned good horror movie in its own right. We don't just get
the horror of scary masks and graphic gore - we also get the horror of
sympathetic characters who seem helpless as their friends are slaughtered
(and, in one case, a significant character who was an audience favorite even
bites the dust) and whose lives have been reduced to constant fear of a crazed
murderer lurking around the corner. While I have not seen any of his other
work, it's easy to see why Craven is generally touted as the most
sophisticated "slasher film" director, as he clearly cares about something
more than just the actual acts of slashing.
Unfortunately, "Scream 2" occasionally reverts to the time-honored horror
tradition of throwing logic out the window. For example, several characters
seem quite clearly dead and inexplicably turn up alive later - there has been
a running gag in both movies about the villain being able to pull off this
particular trick, but it also happens with other characters and in an even
less believable fashion. There are also a few scenes in which the killer
suddenly appears behind the next victim in a situation such that (s)he clearly
would have been seen moving in that direction.
As for the question of whether or not "Scream 2" is yet another sequel not as
good as its predecessor . . . well, it's hard to say. I gave the first
"Scream" 3 1/2 stars as well because it worked pretty consistently as a
light-hearted send-up. "Scream 2" bounces all over the place stylistically,
but it does a better job delivering the genuine scares and asking the
questions about media violence that were only hinted at in the first
installment. I'm not sure which is the better movie, but I did leave the
theater convinced of one thing: sequels, however much Randy might argue, do
not necessarily suck.

Title
Review for Barton Fink (1991)
Barton Fink (R, 1991)
Directed by Joel Coen. Written by Joel and Ethan Coen.
Starring John Turturro, John Goodman.
        The Coen brothers have made a name for themselves largely through
their wacky tales of crime gone wrong, such as Fargo  and Raising Arizona.  In
Barton Fink,  however, they craft what is probably their best and most
personal work to date by tackling a different subject: the arts and
entertainment business.
On one end of the spectrum are the movie moguls, such as the studio
executive who hires the film's protagonist, a young New York playwright named
Barton Fink (John Turturro), to write a B-grade wrestling movie and warns him
against "fruity" stories. On the other end is Barton himself, a pretentious
writer who aspires to "art" at the same time that he claims to be writing for
the "common man." Indeed, this claim seems a little shallow when Barton
actually encounters a "common man" such as his neighbor Charlie (John
Goodman); he welcomes Charlie's company, but he also occasionally insults him
without seeming to realize it and doesn't seem all that interested in his
lifestyle and tastes.
Flawed though he may be, Barton is not wholly unlikeable; there is a
sense that he means well and that he at least has an artistic vision to which
he wants to remain honest, even if he is naive about its supposed social
relevance. The film follows Barton as he is gradually made aware of two
unpleasant truths-that the Hollywood establishment is cynical and cheap, and
that he needs to be more sensitive to those for whom he claims to be writing.
For example, when he meets W.P. Mayhew, a screenwriter whom he has always
admired, he discovers that the man is an alcoholic and that his secretary
wrote most of his scripts and novels. Meanwhile, through his relationship with
Charlie, he slowly begins to realize what it really means to respect the
common man and repents of his earlier condescending attitude.
What really makes the film so special, however, is the vivid yet
surreal manner in which the story develops. The satire of Hollywood is
achieved partly through more traditional comedy, such as when the goofy
executive fires his assistant for failing to kiss Barton's feet, but there is
a much more subtle and disturbing aspect of the film as well. That is, Barton
is nervous and uncomfortable just about everywhere he goes, especially in his
hotel room where he sits for hours on end in front of the typewriter,
afflicted by a bad case of writer's bock. Through the Coens' visual mastery
and attention to odd details, such as a peeling piece of wallpaper, a
strangely distracting painting, and bizarre sounds that echo through the long
hallways, as well as Turturro's outstanding performance as Barton Fink, we get
the sense that Barton is simply out of his element and should not be in Hollywood.
The surrealism is heightened in the second half of the film, when
Barton awakes one morning to find a bloody corpse in his bed and begins to
think Charlie may have been responsible after he is questioned and harassed by
two anti-Semitic cops. The story grows increasingly bizarre-at one point
Barton and Charlie are seen talking in Barton's hotel room, seemingly
unalarmed by the fact that the hotel is burning down around them-to the point
that we start to think that this can't possibly be "real" and that Barton is
having some sort of nervous breakdown. What "really happens," however, is not
nearly as important as the truths that are revealed to Barton, about himself
and about the dangers of selling out, through these sequences. Barton Fink  is
a classic-and outstandingly successful-example of a story that is told through
abstract, symbolic images rather than through carefully defined plot developments.
Like most of the Coens' efforts, then, Barton Fink  is clever and at
times uproariously funny, but it makes the final leap from good to excellent
because of its character-oriented focus and its note of personal tragedy in
Barton's descent into sell-out hell. I was not there myself, of course, but I
would be willing to bet that Barton Fink  deserved the three awards it won at
the Cannes Film Festival in 1991, and as of now it stands as the Coens' one
unqualified masterpiece.
Grade: A+

Title
Review for Rapture, The (1991)
        Few films can be said to be as bold and unwavering as Michael Tolkin's
The Rapture.  Not only does it deal with issues of religion and spirituality
that are usually ignored by popular culture, but it takes its story to
extremes rarely seen outside of films such as, say, Stanley Kubrick's A
Clockwork Orange.  It asks questions many of us would rather not think about:
What if the doomsday cults have got it right? What if the end really is
coming? And what does this mean for our eternal souls?
Tolkin explores these issues through the story of Sharon (Mimi
Rogers), a woman stuck with an arduously boring job as a telemarketer.
Desperate for some sort of novelty in her life, she turns to wild group sex at
night, and when she recognizes it as empty and unrewarding, she turns to
alcohol. Confused and nearly suicidal, she takes an interest in members of a
cult-like fundamentalist Christian religion who answer to a child "prophet"
and have been sharing a vision of a shining pearl as an indication that
Armageddon (hence "The Rapture") is soon to come. When Sharon herself has this
vision, she joins the group, eventually convincing her lover Randy (David
Duchovny) to convert as well. Later, after Randy is killed by one of his
disgruntled employees, she has a vision of him summoning her to a remote
desert location where she and her daughter are to wait for the Rapture.
Had Tolkin stopped there, the film would have been an interesting
story with some mild insight into opposite extremes of society, but then he
takes it even further. Sharon does not lose her faith, but she begins to feel,
after another tragedy, that God is asking too much. She still believes, but
the belief is not enough; it begins to seem as unrewarding as her previous
life. In a captivating sequence, the Rapture comes as promised, but Sharon is
so depressed and bitter that she now stands in defiance of God.
Obviously any film that deals with such riveting subject matter and
goes so far as to have the "crazies" be right all along is so provocative that
it is easy to overlook its flaws, and there are a few. One is that Tolkin
treats the characters mostly as devices to explore these themes. Sharon's
initial conversion, for example, is presented rather matter-of-factly; one
minute she is going about her usual decadence and hopelessness, the next
minute she is kicking her lover out of bed and declaring herself "clean."
Furthermore, the fact that Tolkin refuses to hold the viewer's hand,
taking his film to overwhelming extremes without missing a step, ultimately
becomes a bit of a problem because it is not quite clear by the end what he is
trying to say. If he is simply satirizing fundamentalism and trying to show
how a blind, thoughtless faith might not provide any better spiritual guidance
than self-abandonment and empty pleasure, then he succeeds. If he is trying to
set Sharon up as an anti-religion heroine, then he doesn't quite pull it off.
The tone of harsh realism leaves it up for debate whether or not the real
"error" is God expecting too much or Sharon misinterpreting what God wants,
and in any case the film's theology is far too simplistic to represent
religion in all its forms and variations. On the other hand, perhaps Tolkin
does not intend to push any particular message; perhaps he is simply asking
the "big questions" and leaving them for his audience to answer.
As a religious person myself, I of course find it difficult to be
objective in evaluating this film since it touches on some pretty sensitive
subjects. I can say this, however: The Rapture  put images and ideas in my
head which I will not soon forget. If you have ever thought about issues of
faith and spirituality, this film at the very least brings into focus some of
the questions you have probably always had. If you have never thought about
these issues, then you will after seeing this film. Decide for yourself the
answers, but at the very least follow in Tolkin's footsteps part of the way
and don't duck the questions. Films as bold and thought-provoking as this do
not come along often: don't miss it.
Grade: A

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
It has been my impression that most war movies fall into one of two
categories: overtly anti-war pictures, be they the grim seriousness of FULL
METAL JACKET or the pointed satire of GOOD MORNING VIETNAM, or
action/adventure stories with a bit of flag-waving, melodramatic fluff.
Steven Spielberg's SAVING PRIVATE RYAN wisely positions itself somewhere in
between: it neither protests World War II nor glorifies it. Instead,
Spielberg portrays the war as an ugly necessity, asking the audience to
recognize the tremendous human cost of fighting Nazism, paid both by those
who were killed in battle and by those who survived it.
The opening sequence, which depicts the D-Day invasion at Omaha Beach with
unflinching realism, has been called the best battle scene ever filmed by
some critics. I haven't seen enough war films to make that call, but in any
case this extensive set piece touches upon an important observation: that
survival in war is often more a product of dumb luck than of fighting
skill. Hundreds of Americans pour onto the beach, hundreds of Germans are
there waiting for them, and they shoot at each other until one side comes
out ahead. The death scenes are often gruesome, as well they should be. As
Spielberg has said in interviews, being killed in war is not necessarily
quick and painless, and certainly does not occur in slow-motion with a
swell of strings in the background.
Among the survivors are a company led by Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks),
whose squadron is then assigned to locate a Private James Ryan (Matt
Damon), who lost two brothers at D-Day and another in Africa, and bring him
back home. Many war films might have played this out as a simple
action/adventure yarn, but SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is smart enough to
acknowledge that this is a questionable undertaking. Is this a public
relations stunt designed to make the military look good, or is it a mission
of compassion to Ryan's family? And even if the commanders' hearts are in
the right place, can they justify asking eight men to risk their lives for
one?
The aspect of SAVING PRIVATE RYAN that everyone will remember, I think, is
its disturbing examination of the savage chaos of battle and how supposedly
good people can get caught up in the frenzy of violence and anger at seeing
their friends die. Spielberg does not romanticize the American "freedom
fighters," as several of them shoot German soldiers who have already
surrendered, seemingly for the sake of revenge. The one character who seems
to stay in touch with his conscience all the way through is Miller, who
exudes the air of a tough, no-nonsense commanding officer, not because it's
his nature but because he knows that's what his men need. He even refuses
to discuss his job and family life from back home, then finally reveals
himself at the moment when the rest of the squadron most needs to hear it.
The most accessible window into all of this may be the character of
Corporal Upham (Jeremy Davies), a young officer who's never been in battle
before and is selected for the mission because he can translate German and
French. He finds himself scared senseless when the rest of the squadron
engages in battle with the Germans, unable to act partly out of fear of his
own death and, it seems, partly because he doesn't want to take a human
life. Spielberg plays his scenes in a way that makes his reaction
understandable, rather than making him into a simple coward and an object
for the audience's scorn, yet by the end even he turns out not to be immune
to the oppressive atmosphere of violence and rage.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is not at all "entertaining" in the usual sense of the
word: it is difficult to watch and will leave most viewers feeling
exhausted and wrung out when it ends. Which, considering its subject
matter, means that it has done its job very well: as I said, this is not a
film about patriotism or glory but about the ordeal endured by World War II
soldiers. I cannot, however, imagine anyone regretting having seen it: it
is a story that deserved to be told and is sure to be remembered as a
classic piece of filmmaking.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
THE HOUSE OF YES is a vicious but hilarious black-comic satire of the
American upper class, introducing us to a bizarre family whose isolation
and obsession with the Kennedys has led to murder and an incestuous
brother-sister relationship (the two of them seem to flirt by re-enacting
JFK's death, complete with ketchup and macaroni to simulate blood and
brains). Their snobbery and detachment is revealed by the appearance of
Leslie (Tori Spelling), the fiance of the elder son in the family, who is
ridiculed by the daughter for being from Pennsylvania. All of this is
pretty absurd, but the dialogue, adapted by Mark Waters from a play by
Wendy MacLeod, is clever enough to disturb the audience and make them laugh
at the same time. Make no mistake about it: THE HOUSE OF YES is
cold-hearted, mean-spirited, and perverse. But as someone who normally
despises all three of those qualities in a film, I found myself curiously
entertained by all this.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
Steven Spielberg's "Amistad," which is based on the true story of a group of
Africans who revolted on board a slave ship, then were captured and taken to
America where a legal dispute ensued over who "owned" them, is concerned with
several different aspects of this story. First, the film addresses the issue
of the inherent evils of slavery. Second, it deals with the historical
involvement of several American politicians in the case, including President
Martin Van Buren and former President John Quincy Adams (Anthony Hopkins).
Last, and most importantly, it examines the cultural confusion experienced by
the Africans who were forced into slavery and the damage done to their native
culture in Africa by the slave trade. 
"Amistad" succeeds at least partly with all three of these elements. I have to
admit that I was a little skeptical as to how much I could really get out of
another "anti-slavery" movie. Having seen several other movies and
documentaries about slavery, I doubted that there was much I didn't already
know about it. Fortunately, I turned out to be wrong. For one thing,
Spielberg's camera never once gets near a Southern plantation and instead
sticks to the slave ships and the slave traders' operations in Africa, so
"Amistad" was dealing with a different part of the history of slavery from the
very beginning. And some of the images here are, in fact, much more harrowing
than what we usually see in movies about slavery. One scene in the middle, in
which the crew of a slave ship dispose of some of their "excess" slaves by
throwing them overboard to drown, has to be one of the most disturbing film
images of the year. Spielberg digs farther into the evils of slavery than I
was expecting he would, and in fact he probably goes about as far as a movie
director can without getting an NC-17 rating. 
The stark suffering of the Africans is contrasted sharply with the shallow
luxury of the politicians, such as President Van Buren and Queen Isabella of
Spain, whose naval officers were involved in the legal dispute and who was
only a small child at the time. Exposing politicians as narrow-minded,
opportunistic hypocrites is fairly standard stuff, of course, but Spielberg
and writer David Franzoni do it well enough that it still comes off as
something more than just a simple exercise in audience manipulation. The film
also examines the contentious nature of the slavery issue at the time, such
that John Quincy Adams (and probably other politicians like him), who clearly
disapproved of the practice, was reluctant to get involved in the case until
it was appealed all the way to the Supreme Court. 
The biggest success of "Amistad" is probably the characterization of Cinque
(Djimon Hounsou), who emerges as the de facto leader of the kidnapped Africans
and struggles to communicate with Baldwin (Matthew McConaughey), the lawyer
who represents them in court. Through Cinque, we are given a window into the
native culture, as he and the displaced Africans try to explain to the prison
guards what they need for a proper burial of a dead tribe member, or find an
illustrated version of the Bible and try to understand the story of Jesus
Christ. Cinque sees the dispute with a clarity and simplicity that, again,
contrasts with the technicalities and mechanics of the legal process and of
the political squabbles. "What kind of country is this, where laws 'almost'
work?" he asks Baldwin in bewilderment, when he learns that the case must be
re-tried before the Supreme Court. 
Spielberg's direction tends a little bit towards the manipulative side at
times, such as when he adds a heavy orchestral swell to Cinque's angry
outburst in the court room. Still, there isn't enough of this for it to be a
serious problem. The main flaw in this film, which prevents it from earning
four stars, is that it seems like Spielberg and Franzoni can't quite handle
all of these issues at the same time, so instead they settle for addressing
each one separately and simply editing the results into the same movie. This
summer's Contact, for example, dealt with several issues at once, but each of
them was somehow present in almost every scene and, most importantly, all of
them were resolved at once. "Amistad" tries to pull it all together in the end
with a speech from Adams, but it somehow feels a little forced, and in any
case the speech itself, which lasts almost fifteen minutes, wears out its
welcome about halfway through. 
Perhaps the best way to describe it is this: "Amistad" is three four star
films edited into one. Almost every individual scene works, but the final
product is lacking the necessary focus and coherence, and thus is less than
the sum of its parts. However, I can't honestly say how it could have been
done differently, and in any case the story comes through with enough raw
emotional power that it is still a very good film, and thus I recommend it to
anyone who can handle the disturbing imagery. 
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
I suppose I never had a particularly strong belief in the integrity Corporate
America, but I don't know if I ever imagined the amount of backstabbing,
double-cross, and ultimately murderous greed that seems to permeate David
Mamet's THE SPANISH PRISONER. The film is centered around Joe Ross (Campbell
Scott), who has just come up with a new invention that looks to make a fortune
for his company. But as soon as he starts demanding his fair share, he finds
himself caught up in a conspiracy devised by someone who is evidently looking
to steal his idea and frame him for several crimes, thus putting him safely
out of the way.
Mamet builds up to this with a fairly long setup that is almost dreamlike in
its stiff, idiosyncratic dialogue and exposition. Many details are withheld,
such as what exactly Joe has invented, what his job is, what company he works
for, and exactly how much money they look to rake in (it's written on a
blackboard off-screen). A fair amount of the dialogue is concerned with issues
of finances or legal procedures, but the characters talk in a very detached
and precise manner regardless of the subject matter. When Susan Ricci (Rebecca
Pidgeon), a secretary from work, decides to pursue a romance with Joe, she
dispenses with most of the subtlety fairly quickly, stating what she wants
very clearly and directly, as if drawing up a business contract. And then
there's the occasional line that just comes out of nowhere, such as when
aristocrat Jimmy Dell (Steve Martin) offers to buy Joe's camera for a thousand
dollars with the same matter-of-fact, straightforward delivery one would
expect of someone asking to borrow a pencil.
Martin's performance is probably the strongest of any in the film. His offer
for the camera marks his first appearance, so we know there's something funny
about him from the very beginning. He doesn't let us forget it from then on,
developing an eerie presence that leads the viewer to question his motives,
but without coming right out and declaring, "Hey, I'm a bad guy!" Jimmy Dell
is hardly the only eerie element in this film, however: Joe and his employers
are so concerned about keeping his invention a secret from competitors that
they all start to seem a little bit paranoid after a while, especially when we
see the quasi-ominous poster hanging in the company hallways featuring a
pointing finger with the caption, "Somebody Talked!" Clearly, someone is going
to try to cheat Joe out of his fair share; we just don't know who or when.
Unfortunately, the stiffness that works so well for the first half of the film
starts to work against it once the double-cross is set in motion. In a series
of plot twists similar to (but somewhat more believable than) those found in
THE GAME, all traces of Joe's invention and past acquaintances suddenly start
disappearing, while at the same time he is framed for tax fraud and murder.
Mamet consistently keeps us guessing about the other characters' real motives
and about what will happen next, so I won't give away any more plot details.
The downside is that that's about all he does. Because of the precise but
emotionally distant way in which the characters behave, we never really
understand Joe as anything more than just a normal guy who's driven and
ambitious but still honest. Mamet seems to be pushing some sort of lesson
about greed and dishonesty, but it's difficult to appreciate it at any level
other than the strictly intellectual since Joe isn't quite three-dimensional
enough to act as a ciphen for Mamet's ideas to the audience.
The numerous deceptions do manage to tie together by the end without any
especially noticeable plot holes, and the script incorporates a number of what
seemed at first to be minor (but still noticeable) details into the overall
scheme. More than anything, THE SPANISH PRISONERreally just runs into the
age-old problem of having created an intriguing mystery but then being obliged
to solve it by the time the credits roll. Still, it could have been somewhat
more successful had Mamet found a way to deliver the idiosyncratic and
enticing setup and make Joe a little more human at the same time. With the
stale characterizations, THE SPANISH PRISONER is not really much more than a
standard paranoid thriller, but it is certainly a very carefully crafted and
well-written one.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is a story built out of one of those "what-if"
scenarios. In this case, it's "What if William Shakespeare had a romantic
relationship that came to an unfortunate ending around the time he was
writing 'Romeo and Juliet'?" Joseph Fiennes and Gwyneth Paltrow star
respectively as The Bard and Viola De Lesseps, an upper-class woman doomed
to a marriage she despises. Screenwriters Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard
deftly weave elements of Shakespeare's style, such as disguises, mistaken
identities, and mistakenly attributed guilt, into this story, creating what
was probably the favorite film of all English professors across the
country. "Cute," "clever," "funny," and "charming" are all words I would
use to describe this entertaining trip through 16th-century England as
Shakespeare probably knew it. Words I would not  use to describe it,
however, are "best film of the year" or "worthy of thirteen Oscar
nominations." Yes, it's a lot of fun, and yes, it's intelligently written,
but I'm afraid I don't see much more to it than that: the story is
essentially a prolonged gimmick, and some of the most poignant dialogue is
not the screenwriters' but Shakespeare's, when Fiennes and Paltrow end up
playing the parts of Romeo and Juliet on the afternoon of the play's
premiere. Still, I was never bored for a second, and SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is
refreshingly devoid of the clichs and melodrama that plague many a
romantic comedy.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Stranger Than Paradise (1984)
Jim Jarmusch has been quoted as defending his often meandering films on the
grounds that since life has no plot, there is no reason that film or
fiction should either. He's got a point, and I suppose it would be easy to
see his 1984 film STRANGER THAN PARADISE simply as an expression of this
idea, in that it follows a trio of characters who never really do much of
anything.
I've seen three Jarmusch films now (the other two being NIGHT ON EARTH and
DEAD MAN), and I think that, aside from his knack for dropping in on
characters at uneventful moments of their lives, he also has a talent for
writing dialogue between characters who aren't quite communicating. NIGHT
ON EARTH was an episodic collection of cab rides in which the driver and
passenger(s) were on separate wavelengths in one way or another, and DEAD
MAN followed a mild-mannered accountant and a nomadic tribesman who were
brought together by a bizarre and dangerous turn of events and who didn't
quite know what to make of each other. Characters who would normally nod
politely at each other and pass are, in Jarmusch films, forced into
extended contact with each other, with the result being an interesting and
sometimes amusing form of subtle conflict.
In STRANGER THAN PARADISE, those characters are Willie (John Lurie), a
Hungarian immigrant who has lived in New York City for the past ten years;
his friend Eddie (Richard Edson); and his cousin Eva (Eszter Balint), who
has just recently left Hungary and is on her way to Cleveland to live with
her Aunt Lottie (Cecilia Stark). Because her aunt is in the hospital when
she arrives, she needs a place to stay for ten days, and ends up at
Willie's apartment. Willie is mostly annoyed by her presence, and when they
do talk, it's about things like how American football is played and why a
TV dinner is called a TV dinner. Eddie shows up and seems to like Eva, but
nothing really develops, and then she heads off to Cleveland as planned.
The film jumps ahead to a year later, and Willie and Eddie are bored with
their life in New York City. They go to Cleveland on vacation, but spend
most of their time doing inconsequential things like playing cards with
Aunt Lottie or going to the movies with Eva and her friend from work. They
decide to take Eva to with them to Florida, where they almost run out of
money from betting on dog races (though Willie wasn't too keen on this in
the first place--"I just, uh, don't like the idea of...dog races," he
objects at one point). Fortunately Eva comes up with some money at the last
minute through an amusing coincidence.
Of course, if I took this premise to a Hollywood producer and pitched it as
a script, (s)he would probably look it me as if I'd lost my mind. But what
Jarmusch has discovered is that these odd little moments in the lives of
ordinary people can be just as entertaining as murder mysteries or alien
invasions. The subtle conflicts and personality differences between the
three characters, which never even develop into a full-scale argument, are
strangely engaging and never boring or repetitive.
Willie and Eddie get along, for example, but their friendship is still
pretty shallow, and when they spend hours on end in a car together, it
results in humorous moments of conversation like, "Willie, you never told
me you were from Hungary." "Yeah, so what?" "Well, I thought you were an
American...say, you think Cleveland will look anything like Budapest?" At
one point Jarmusch keeps his camera on them for several minutes straight
while they do nothing but drink beer and stare at the floor. Eva, whose
arrival in the United States is probably the catalyst of this film if it
can be said to have one, is also interesting for her calm yet blunt
honesty. When Willie tries to get her to watch football, she says it's a
stupid game, and when he buys her a dress she doesn't like, she tells him
straightforward, "I think this dress is kind of ugly."
It would be wrong to say that STRANGER THAN PARADISE succeeds despite its
lack of a plot and its deadpan characters. It succeeds *because* of them,
turning what would normally be narrative weaknesses into virtues and
showing us that three people sitting around not doing much of anything can
be just as much fun to watch as James Bond infiltrating a mountaintop
fortress to save the world. It's certainly not overwhelming (nor should it
be), but I can think of few other films in which a director managed to get
so much out of so little. I can imagine a sequel twenty years in the
future, in which Willie, Eddie, and Eva are still just sitting around
playing cards, watching TV and generally killing time. And I can also
imagine myself first in line to see it.

Title
Review for Full Metal Jacket (1987)
Full Metal Jacket (R, 1986)
Directed by Stanley Kubrick. Written by Kubrick, Michael Kerr, and Gustav
Hasford. Starring Matthew Modine, Vincent D'Onofrio, Lee Ermey.
        Stanley Kubrick's Full Metal Jacket  is a bit disconnected at times,
but its investigation into the training and battle experience of American
soldiers sent to Vietnam is so unrelentingly dark and intense that it still
makes for a noteworthy "Vietnam movie." It begins as a group of Marine
recruits report to training camp, where they are subjected to all manners of
humiliation by a drill sergeant (Lee Ermey) who tells them, in ridiculous
macho lectures that are funny to everyone except himself, that "Marines are
not allowed to die without permission!" and that God likes Marines, "because
we kill every man we see - it keeps heaven well-stocked!"
        But Full Metal Jacket  is hardly a retread of Kubrick's previous
black-comic military satire, Dr. Strangelove;  it soon takes on a very bleak,
tragic tone as one recruit, Private "Gomer Pyle" (Vincent D'Onofrio) becomes
the target of Ermey's most vicious abuse. Mentally and physically incompetent,
Pyle fails at almost every test and constantly makes dumb mistakes. The
sergeant decides that the other recruits will be punished every time Pyle
flubs up, and soon comes the inevitable incident in which the other recruits
awake in the middle of the night and beat the helpless Pyle with rolled-up
socks. The training is dehumanizing at every turn; the sergeant, when not
forcing his trainees to recite vulgar adolescent chants about Eskimo women and
such, often announces proudly and repeatedly that these soldiers will soon be
"in a world of shit" when they go to Vietnam and that his intention is to make
them into killers.
        After this story reaches a harrowing conclusion in which Pyle finally
cracks, the film then follows another of the recruits, Private Joker (Matthew
Modine), on his tour of duty in Vietnam as he works first as a military
journalist and then joins a combat unit. The journalism segment is a little
slow and not particularly enlightening at first. When Joker goes to cover some
actual fighting and later joins up with a unit, however, the film's powerful
and unsettling portrait of cruelty and corruption returns in full force. Most
of the soldiers either seem to have sunk into unashamed disrespect for human
life (one of them wonders what they will do when the war is over since they
"won't have gooks to shoot" any more) or simply aren't intelligent enough to
grasp the implications of what they are doing (another, when asked to comment
on the war, says in all earnestness, "They don't even have horses in Vietnam.
I mean, how f***ed up is that?").
        Joker, by contrast, seems to be perceptive enough to realize what is
happening to him and his colleagues, but he is mostly powerless to do anything
about it. Instead, he is reduced to making cheap, cynical remarks, most of
which fly over everyone else's head, such as when he states, "I came to
Vietnam to interact with different people from an exotic culture, and kill
them." And the battle scene at the end, in which Joker and some other Marines
are forced to sit by helplessly as a sniper inflicts a slow and painful death
by repeated shooting on two of their fellow soldiers, is one of the most
tragic moments of cinema I have seen in recent memory.  When they finally
catch up with (and shoot) the sniper, they are confronted with the choice of
letting the sniper die that same slow and painful death or administering a
mercy killing; nowhere else in the film is the contrast between Joker's
lingering humanity and the cold brutality of the other soldiers better portrayed.
        Full Metal Jacket  would have been perfectly effective, then, as an
appropriately loosely structured "slice of life" from the Vietnam War, but
unfortunately Kubrick doesn't choose to end it that way. Instead, he ends with
a voiceover narration from Joker with some observations about violence and
survival. It's as if, after two perfectly crafted hours of unrelentingly dark
psychology, the film decided it had a "point" to make after all; this sudden
change of direction is enough to bounce the film down from what would have
been an A or even an A+ in my book to an A-. It seems unfair to downgrade it
so much for one flawed minute of film, but when it's the last minute, it does
make a difference. Other than that misstep, however, Full Metal Jacket  is a
remarkable piece of cinema that deserves a place with the other classic
"Vietnam movies."

Title
Review for Bis ans Ende der Welt (1991)
Wim Wenders's UNTIL THE END OF THE WORLD may be the first 2-1/2 hour film
that I thought moved too quickly almost every step of the way. It's about
so many different things at once that it ends up having time for none of
them: there's a cross-continental spy chase, a romantic triangle, a
possible nuclear disaster, and a meditation on technology and human
consciousness. I have heard that Wenders originally hoped to make a five-
or six-hour film, and it shows: there are traces of choppy editing,
characters disappear from the story for half an hour at a time, and
important plot and character points are merely glossed over in narration.
Conversations barely have time to start in this film: the characters get a
few lines, and then it's time to cut to the next scene.
The first hour of the film, for example, follows Claire Tourneur (Solveig
Dommartin) as she pursues Sam Farber (William Hurt), whom she met in an
airport, to various cities all over the world. There is clearly some
attraction between them, but he still seems wary of her presence and fears
that she might make things more dangerous, as he is clearly fleeing someone
important, and ditches her on more than one occasion. Still she continues,
undiscouraged. Perhaps Wenders wanted this to be some sort of great
odyssey, but all we ever see is a series of scenes in airports and hotels.
There's no time for the relationship between the two to develop, or for
Claire to consider why she keeps following him, because Wenders has to send
them gallavanting across the globe again before too long.
Aside from being rather unsuspenseful and repetitive, this portion of the
movie doesn't help us to relate to or understand the characters, because it
makes Sam seem very self-centered and unlikeable and makes Claire look like
a bit of an airhead at the very least. Adding to the muddle is Claire's
boyfriend (?) Gene (Sam Neill), who shows up to help her, apparently
unfazed that she's trying to run off with another man. I could understand
that perhaps he really loves her and figures this is what will make her
happy, but there seems to be absolutely *no* tension between the two of
them over this. "I don't think you quite understand the nature of our
relationship," Gene says to a puzzled private detective at one point; I
imagine the detective could keep company with most of the audience on that
one.
UNTIL THE END OF THE WORLD does eventually take a turn for the better.
Claire has caught up with Sam (again), and he reveals to her that he has
been on the run from the U.S. government, trying to keep them from getting
hold of his new invention: a camera which records another person's visual
sense-data in a way that it can be transmitted to his blind mother. Claire
joins him on his flight from the authorities as the two continue to travel
the world, taking turns recording sights for his mother. Finally they wind
up in a remote area of Australia when several nuclear satellites
accidentally explode, rendering all communications dead and leaving them to
wonder if anyone else is left alive.
Eventually they make their way to a desert shelter, where they are joined
by Gene and a bounty hunter, both of whom had been on Sam's trail. There
they also find Sam's family, and an old conflict reignites between Sam and
his father, whom he thinks is ungrateful for all the effort he has made for
his mother. Meanwhile, the camera isn't the miracle Sam had hoped for. His
mother is mostly startled by how bleak and ugly the world seems compared to
when she had last been able to see, at age eight, and others, including
Claire, start using it to record their own dreams and soon become addicted
to watching their own mental images on-screen.
If this review seems to be jumping all over the place, that's partly
because the film does as well. But UNTIL THE END OF THE WORLD is hardly a
disaster. Wenders has a distinct, poetic style of direction, and the scenes
in which he captures the characters' isolation when they think the rest of
the human population may have been wiped out are outstanding. The
post-apocalyptic element and the issues raised by the invention of the
camera were both fascinating, and in fact each of them probably could have
made for an entire movie all by themselves. Unfortunately, the compressed
pace of the film still allows for only cursory examinations of each.
Given that he was apparently limited to a shorter release than he wanted,
Wenders might well have done better to focus on just one or two of these
story elements. The spy chase in particular feels like dead weight, though
perhaps it would have led into the rest of the film more easily in its
uncut version. I guess Wenders had an epic in mind, but at best he ends up
with an outline for an epic, full of underdeveloped ideas and characters.
Still, it seemed like an outline for a pretty good epic, and hopefully the
director's cut will eventually gain commercial release.

Title
Review for Wild at Heart (1990)
"Wild At Heart" is at its roots a pretty typical story of runaway lovers:
Sailor Ripley (Nicholas Cage), an ex-convict, and his girlfriend Lula (Laura
Dern) drive across the country trying to avoid Lula's cruel mother and the
hitmen she has sent after Sailor as well as Sailor's parole officers. Along
the way, they stop in the usual seedy backwater towns where they stay in the
usual flea-bag hotels and confront the usual perverted psychos. The premise
may not have been original, but it still could have made for a provocative
film if it had been executed properly.
Well, bad news: it wasn't, at least not consistently. Perhaps after the
success of "Blue Velvet," screenwriter and director David Lynch thought he
could make any story involving sex and violence into a compelling and powerful
film, and there are certainly plenty of both in this movie. But what made Blue
Velvet work so well was its mind's-eye view through its lead character
Jeffrey Beaumont, as he descends from quiet small-town innocence into a dark,
frightening world and ultimately fights his way back out. In "Wild At Heart,"
however, the characters of Sailor and Lula are not developed to that extent.
They just seem like two more crazies along the way, albeit likeable and
relatively benign crazies ("relatively benign" meaning "not twisted and
psychotic" in the context of this film). The story is presented as mostly a
curiosity, a far cry from the poignancy of "Blue Velvet." As a result, a few
of the more graphic scenes seem pretty gratuitous, as if Lynch were being
risque simply for the sake of being risque and not because the story was
driving him in any particular direction.
Furthermore, Lynch's talent for surreal moods and downright absurd behavior is
sometimes misused here, as much of the Lynchian weirdness operates at a
tangent to the main story rather than as part of it. It is as if, having shot
all the scenes most essential to the basic plot, someone told him he had
another thirty minutes of film left and he used it all on quirky but somewhat
irrelevant scenes like a delirious car accident victim looking for her keys
and purse as she bleeds to death. There is another scene in which the camera
lingers on some slowly undulating curtains on a balcony - a Lynch trademark -
but we never see what is going on behind those curtains, nor does it seem to
serve any purpose in setting the mood for what happens next. Watching "Wild At
Heart" is almost like watching a failed attempt to make a "David Lynch movie,"
as if a novice director set out to copy Lynch's imagery and then didn't know
what to do with it.
As a result, what we have in "Wild At Heart" is a film that, while somewhat
disappointing and a bit unfocused, is not without its merits - Sailor and Lula
certainly make for entertaining and sympathetic leads, and theirs is if
nothing else something of an uplifting love story in that they somehow manage
to make it through what can only be described as the road trip from hell. And,
however misguided Lynch's use of his usual absurdism here, it does lead to
some genuinely funny moments. In one sequence, Lula, disgusted by all the bad
news of murders and violence on the radio, stops the car, hysterically
demanding that Sailor put in a music cassette as the two of them break into a
goofy, chaotic dance routine on the side of the road. Lynch favorite Jack
Nance also makes an appearance, delivering a drawling, inane discourse on the
psychological nuances of talking about dogs ("Mentally, you picture my dog . .
. but, I have not told you the type dog which I have!").
Perhaps this movie is best viewed not as serious art, like most of Lynch's
other films, but as nothing more than a quirky and occasionally
stomach-churning adventure movie that, while not very sophisticated, is still
decent entertainment if you have nothing else to do for a couple of hours.
Visit my Film Reviews page at http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
The Sweet Hereafter  ****
R, 1997
Directed and written by Atom Egoyan. Based on a novel by Russell Banks.
Starring Ian Holm, Caerthan Banks, Sarah Polley.
Whoever saw to it that the story of "The Sweet Hereafter," in which a lawyer
wants to sue for negligence when over a dozen children are killed in a bus
accident in a small town in British Columbia, fell into the hands of
independent Canadian filmmaker Atom Egoyan has done a service to modern
cinema. I can imagine, quite clearly, how a Hollywood studio would have
handled this: first off, we would have seen a slow-motion shot of the bus
skidding off the road. Then the lawyer would arrive and discover that a Greedy
Corporation is to blame for not following safety standards. Then their morally
despicable executives would try, unsucessfully, to quell the lawsuit. Finally,
there would be a resounding courtroom victory with a swell of classical music
in the background.
None of that happens in "The Sweet Hereafter." Egoyan is less concerned with
the accident itself than he is with the townspeople, the lawyer Mitchell
Stephens (Ian Holm), and how they are affected in its aftermath. The story is
not told in linear order, and in fact it is not completely clear until the end
how it all fits together. But this is not simply artsiness for the sake of
artsiness; Egoyan uses this framework to show us more clearly how the
characters are changed by the accident. At the same time, the non-linear
structure works in exactly the opposite way in the examination of Holm's
character; no matter what day or even what year it is, he is always trying to
relate to his estranged drug-addict daughter who sporadically contacts him by
telephone. He is the one character who seems to be a constant, who is always
occupied by the same struggle, whether the film is in flashback, present-day,
or flash-forward.
When Stephens arrives, he is understandably met with skepticism from some of
the residents who think he is exploiting the situation. He certainly knows the
tricks of his trade very well; one of his top priorities is to make sure that
none of his clients or witnesses are in any way disreputable, so as to be sure
that their testimony will be taken seriously. Even when he delivers an
impassioned speech explaining that he seeks to punish whatever person or
corporate entity was responsible for the accident (presumably through
negligence), we still wonder if he is manipulating the grieving parents. It is
not until the situation with his daughter becomes clear that we see otherwise:
having failed to protect or rescue his own child from the dangers of society,
he seeks to protect others and, as he says himself, to give voice to the anger
over tragedies such as the bus accident.
Unfortunately, not everyone in town is quite on the same page, and no one is
perfect either. The couple who first contacted him are emotionally distant
from each other, and the wife (Alberta Watson) has been conducting an affair
with local widower Billy Ansel (Bruce Greenwood). Billy himself sees Stephens
as a threat to the community who is undermining the support that residents had
always provided for each other. One couple seems to share Stephens's desire to
punish those who may have been negligent, but another couple seems to be in it
for the money. The latter couple's daughter Nicole (Sarah Polley), who
survived the accident, begins to wonder if she is being used and starts to
resist, but in a very questionable way. And then there is Stephens himself,
who doesn't really seem to know where to direct the anger of which he speaks.
Never once is he able to explain exactly *who* was negligent in this case - he
is simply determined to sue *somebody*.
"The Sweet Hereafter" is not about who is "right" or "wrong" in this
situation, as most of those involved appear, at the very least, to be acting
out of good intentions. Rather, the film examines the fragility of human
relationships and how a group of people, all trying to do the right thing in
one way or another, end up at odds with each other. There is a certain
stillness and tranquility which Egoyan evokes through his exterior shots of
the rural, snow-bound town, but this sense of peace and acceptance lingers
throughout the film, even after Stephens's shaky alliance starts to crack and
members of the community start to divide against each other. It is as if the
failure of the characters to achieve reconciliation following the accident is
simply an inevitabilty.do the right thing in one way or another, end up at
odds with each other.
This may make the film sound unrelentingly grim, yet the tone of "The Sweet
Hereafter" is not one of nihilistic resignation, but merely one of regret that
only imperfect closure seems to be possible. Some character-centered films
focus on an obviously flawed protagonist and how the person eventually manages
to overcome a clearly negative aspect of his or her life or personality. For
the lead characters in "The Sweet Hereafter" - most notably Stephens, Nicole,
and Billy - the road is not quite so perilous, but none of them quite reach
the end either.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
The promotion for FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAShas made the film out to be a
comedy, and for about the first hour or so it seems like it might be one. It's
1971, and the hippie movement has left behind quite a few wash-outs, among
them journalist Raoul Duke (Johnny Depp) and his "attorney" Dr. Gonzo (Benito
Del Toro). These two spend most of the film in a drug-induced stupor, having
strange hallucinations, trashing their hotel rooms, and either annoying or
scaring almost everyone that crosses their path. Duke is first assigned to
cover an outdoor desert motorcycle race in Las Vegas, but gets lost in a blur
of drugs, beer, and flying dust, and ends up wandering around with no clue who
won. He leaves Vegas briefly before he is sent back, in what can only be
described as a strangely appropriate twist of fate, to cover a drug
enforcement conference.
FEAR AND LOATHING has been misinterpreted by some as glorifying the use of
drugs. It doesn't, even in the beginning--while the pair's antics are
sometimes amusing and relatively harmless at first, the humor here is still
fairly dark. Director Terry Gilliam views them with a rather satirical eye,
and even when we're laughing, we're laughing at them rather than with them.
They spend most of their time paranoid, angry, or just plain befuddled, which
is probably an understandable reaction to seeing the entire room suddenly fill
up with giant reptiles. The black comedy may be entertaining to watch
onscreen, but it's probably not something most other audience members would
want to experience first-hand.
All this aside, I was starting to grow a bit restless as the film drew near
its one-hour mark, thinking to myself that I wanted something more out of this
than just an off-kilter satire of drug culture. Thankfully, the script
delivers it before too long, as Duke, in a rare moment of lucidity, stops to
recall how he was once an enthusiastic hippie, "riding the wave" of something
that seemed special and important. Now it's six years later and the wave has
finally broken, as he puts it. Materialistic culture is still alive and well
and, for most of this film, right in his face in Las Vegas; the "American
Dream" of which Duke occasionally speaks is still just as shallow and phony as
ever. The social protesters have lost, and the more questionable aspects of
the movement have turned ugly and left casualties such as Duke to drift in a
sea of drugs and disillusionment.
In many ways, FEAR AND LOATHING is Gilliam's most reality-based film; all of
his others, with the exception of THE FISHER KING, have made use of some sort
of fantasy or science-fiction plot elements. Yet it is his off-the-wall
masterpiece BRAZILto which this film bears the most visual resemblance. The
protagonist of BRAZIL found himself alternately surrounded by a plastic,
soulless society and the constant chaos of totalitarian police inspections and
terrorist attacks, and similarly Duke's world is composed of the artificial,
empty glam of Las Vegas and the bizarre anarchy of his drug hallucinations.
Unlike the protagonist of BRAZIL, however, Duke is not a particularly
admirable figure, and neither is Gonzo. During the latter half of the film,
their trips turn nastier and the consequences worse, eventually building up to
an incident an a diner in which Gonzo crudely frightens and humiliates a
waitress, while Duke, though he doesn't seem to approve, doesn't do anything
to stop it either. By the time this scene takes place, they don't seem like
hippies or peaceniks or protesters or anything of the sort any more; they just
seem like a couple of stoned jerks in a diner. Duke seems to realize at some
level that he's become something he doesn't like, but he's either too
apathetic or too defeated to do anything to change.
This film has taken a critical drubbing from many who view it as an
essentially pointless film that simply throws one trip scene after another at
the audience. While Gilliam may have overdone it in a few places, I think he
and his co-writers deserve more credit than that. There's plenty of substance
here, particularly in the second half; its observations about the broken and
defeated rebels from the '60s and the objects of their rebellion just aren't
usually very pleasant. Unlike, say, BRAZILor THE FISHER KING, both of which
feature a character who dares to let himself dream in a repressive
environment, FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGASshows us someone who's given up on
his dreams and resorts to the quick fix of drugs. In its own psychedelic,
whacked-out way, it's sad and regretful, but I think it's also a bit of a kick
in the pants, a challenge to find an alternative between chemically-induced
withdrawal and the equally addictive drug of Vegas-style materialism. Indeed,
Duke himself admits at one point that he's never learned to accept that you
can get higher without drugs than with them. I'm not sure if he's any closer
to accepting it by the end or not, but I suspect the audience will get the
idea.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
A CIVIL ACTION turned out to be about as good as I had expected, but not in
the way I had expected. Based on the previews, what I thought we were going
to get was a nice character film about a lawyer who finds himself
personally affected by a case for the first time with a considerable amount
of courtroom melodrama. Instead, the character development turns out to be
kind of thin, but the legal procedure is actually portrayed fairly
realistically and without a tidy happy ending.
John Travolta is the star of the film (which is based on a true story) as
Jan Schlictmann, a personal injury lawyer While he's not a totally
heartless sleazeball, certainly knows the ins and outs of his profession
and isn't about to take on a case solely because it's a good cause. There
has to be a clear, concrete argument to make that won't cost millions of
dollars, and they have to be able to sue someone whose pockets are deep and
who will offer a juicy settlement. As we learn from Jan's narration, a
personal injury trial rarely comes to an actual verdict: 98.5% of them end
in an out-of-court settlement. All a settlement really means, of course, is
that the lawsuit is a sufficient inconvenience that the defendant will
throw out some money to make it go away, not that they actually admit any
wrongdoing.
The trouble is, Jan's latest clients, a group of parents from Woburn,
Massachussetts whose children all died due to ill health, want exactly
that: an apology. They believe that their children's sickness was a result
of improper waste disposal procedures by some local companies which
polluted the water supply. At first, Jan is reluctant to take their case,
but eventually he agrees and undertakes a costly investigation into the
companies' disposal procedures. The problem is that their wishes really
have no place in the American legal system, at least not without a much
more powerful financial force behind them than Jan's firm. To get an
admission of wrongdoing, that means that Jan must prove that the companies
were at fault in court, but as he says, this is not the way personal injury
trials function: they function by ending early in a settlement.
Writer/director Steven Zaillian wisely avoids getting too heavy-handed with
all this: rather than belaboring the obvious cold-heartedness of Jan's
opponents, he sends them up with a light, satirical touch. Robert Duvall
turns in a good performance as the eccentric and arrogant Jerome Facher,
the lawyer who defends one of the corporations. He's certainly cynical and
manipulative, yet not really "evil" per se. He's just a world-weary lawyer
who knows that a trial is really just about putting on a good show:
"justice" has long since ceased to have any real meaning for him. His best
scene occurs about halfway through, when Zaillian intercuts his lectures to
a law school class with shots of him acting out the strategies he describes
in the actual trial. For example, he explains that frequent objections
serve to break up the other side's rhythm, as he tells his students, "If
you ever catch yourself nodding off in court, the first word out of your
mouth when you wake up should be 'objection.'" Then we see Facher himself
asleep during the trial, waking suddenly and exclaiming, "Objection!"
The trial, to put it mildly, does not go well. The judge (John Lithgow)
nixes some of Jan's defense strategy, and it goes on long enough that he
and his partners are more or less run out of business by the legal costs.
They even go so far as to sell their own houses and many of their other
possessions in order to keep going, but finally they reach a point where
they simply cannot continue any longer. Zaillian clearly wants this to be a
sort of transformational journey for Jan, but unfortunately he and his
partners are not developed very well. His sudden conversion from cynical
ambulance-chaser to bona fide crusader for justice happens too quickly. It
seems to result from little more than a walk down the river, where he sees
that the pollution the parents described probably is taking place, and some
serious thought about what it must have been like to lose a child. But
didn't he ever give *any* of his other cases this kind of consideration
before? What's different about this one that causes him to change his
attitude?
A CIVIL ACTION finds only limited success as a character drama, but it
makes up for it with its realistic, intelligent plotting and its avoidance
of excessive melodrama or an easy ending. It probably isn't one of the best
films you'll see, but it's never boring, and you may actually learn a few
things about the mechanics of a civil lawsuit in the process.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
Lost Highway  * * * 1/2 (out of four)
R, 1997
Directed by David Lynch. Written by Lynch and Barry Gifford.
Starring Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Balthazar Getty.
When I left the theater after seeing David Lynch's "Lost Highway," I remarked
to a fellow movie-goer, "I feel like someone just sucked my brains out through
my nose and put them back in through my ears." In his first feature film in
five years, Lynch delivers a film second only to his debut picture
"Eraserhead" on the weirdness scale. You won't "know" what happened when it's
over, though there are certainly enough clues with which to make some
reasonable guesses.
It is difficult to describe the plot of this film, because it depends partly
on how you interpret it. I can, however, describe what we see on the screen:
L.A. jazz saxophonist Fred Madison (Bill Pullman) and his wife Renee (Patricia
Arquette), whom he clearly suspects of infidelity, receive a series of
videotapes apparently filmed inside their house while they were asleep. They
are, naturally enough, more than a little frightened and confused, and it
doesn't help matters any when "Mystery Man" (Robert Blake) approaches Fred at
a party and proceeds to call himself on the telephone at the Madisons' house
in a scene that is at once hilarious and unnerving. The next morning, Fred
finds another videotape which, to his (and our) surprise, shows him brutally
murdering Renee in their bedroom. He is convicted of her murder and sent to
death row, where he inexplicably disappears one night and is replaced by a
young mechanic named Pete Dayton (Balthazar Getty). The perplexed prison
officials release Dayton, whose life begins to intersect with Fred in a number
of ways - most notably his affair with Alice Wakefield (Arquette again), a
blonde who is otherwise Renee's spitting image, and another encounter with the
Mystery Man. I would be giving away a little too much to reveal any more, but
suffice it to say that Lynch doesn't offer any neat wrapups, nor does he put
a lid on the metaphysical confusion: the cinematic demons of "Lost Highway"
are out in full force from beginning to end. 
This description might make "Lost Highway" sound like a giddy exercise in
haywire surrealism, but in fact, while there are traces of Lynch's weird sense
of humor, this film is anything but giddy most of the time. On the contrary,
Lost Highway  is a dark and perplexing mystery that takes Lynch's previous
excursions into murder and intrigue one step farther. The film does not
revolve around a character investigating a mystery; rather, the character *is*
the mystery. There are recurring and at times deeply disturbing images of
suspicion, distrust, and infidelity thoughout the film that seem to indicate a
deluded, fractured psyche at the root of all the bizarre goings-on here. We,
the audience, are left to puzzle out whose psyche it is that is driving this
(probably Fred's, in my opinion) and what, in that case, the other characters
and events are meant to represent. 
All of this proceeds, appropriately, in Lynch's typically slow-paced,
idiosyncratic style. As is often the case, Lynch relies on sound, imagery, and
mood more than on dialogue and action to tell his story, and in "Lost Highway"
it works perfectly. There are scenes when the camera lingers on Fred's blank
expression as he drifts uncomfortably down a hallway, or on his pained face in
his prison cell while the haunting strains of This Mortal Coil's "Song to the
Siren" can be heard faintly in the background; nothing is technically
"happening" in these scenes, yet they present a vivid picture of a man losing
his grip just as effective as, if not more so than, the hysterical screaming
found in most movie presentations of insanity. Lynch's direction and Director
of Photography Pete Deming's darkly lit cinematography serve to create a
nearly suffocating atmosphere of tension and fear that are exactly what is
needed for this story. 
Well, most of the time, anyway - I have to admit that I was a bit bored at
times during the section of the film with Pete Dayton as the protgaonist,
which is less inherently interesting and mostly keeps the viewer's attention
because of its tie-ins to the original mystery. The   main characters in this
"reality" - Dayton (a well-meaning but none too intelligent 24-year-old), a
sleazy gangster (who for some reason has two names but otherwise is pretty
much a stock character), and his porn-star girlfriend (the blond Arquette) -
are nothing you couldn't find in any of the two dozen "Pulp Fiction" wannabes;
fortunately, the reappearance of the Mystery Man as well as some other
typically Lynchian elements, such as the strained, awkward conversations
between Pete and his parents, help to preserve the film's spooky, unnerving
tone during this stretch. Lynch's typically graphic and disturbing portrayals
of fringe sexuality, while relevant to the themes of jealousy and adultery,
are also somewhat overdone here. It's not exactly exploitative - like almost
everything else in this film, the sex is thoroughly weird and creepy and is
unlikely to provide any cheap lurid thrills - as much as it is unnecessary and
frankly kind of dumb by the seventh or eighth time Arquette takes her clothes off.
That said, these minor flaws don't prevent "Lost Highway" from attaining its
place as one of the darkest, most unsettling films to hit the screens in
recent years. It is a one-way ride down the lost highway of a disturbed mind,
and as such it is gripping, intense, and brilliantly effective. 
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
This review is being reposted due to formatting errors which caused some of
the text to be repeated in the original.
Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery  *** (out of four)
PG-13, 1997
Directed by Jay Roach. Written by Mike Myers.
Starring Mike Myers, Elizabeth Hurley.
Okay, so "Austin Powers" is not exactly a classic of modern cinema, but it
does provide some good laughs and a clever parody of James Bond-style spy
flicks. In fact, I would dare say that, while it seems a little unfocused at
times, it rates higher than  Tomorrow Never Dies, the newest Bond movie, for
simple entertainment. The script, written by Mike Myers, pits '60s secret
agent Austin Powers (Myers) against his arch-nemesis Dr. Evil (also Myers),
both of whom have been cryogenically frozen for the past 30 years and thus are
not up to date on developments such as the end of the Cold War and political correctness.
This fish-out-of-water premise could have easily grown tiresome, and indeed it
provides for what are by and large the weakest jokes. Fortunately, Myers adds
to this premise the fact that Austin Powers and Dr. Evil are not nearly as
competent as James Bond and his various adversaries. For example, in a chase
scene towards the end, Austin commandeers a large vehicle in trying to escape
Dr. Evil's fortress and proceeds to get it stuck in a narrow hallway. Dr.
Evil, meanwhile, is preoccupied with pathetically dumb attempts to relate to
his teenage son. His fortress isn't quite all it's cracked up to be either, as
some of the booby traps seem to be in need of repair.se the fact that Austin
Powers and Dr. Evil are not nearly as competent as James Bond and his various adversaries.
Some of the best scenes in the movie come when it extends the spoof by
allowing itself to be self-conscious. For example, after hijacking a nuclear
warhead and issuing their demands, Dr. Evil and his associates break into
typically campy sinister laughter. Instead of cutting away, director Jay Roach
lingers on the group as the laughter clearly begins to drag on, and finally
they are all left staring blankly at each other, not sure what is supposed to
come next. And when Dr. Evil captures Austin and Vanessa, he literally orders
them - and I am not making this up - to a "needlessly time-consuming and
easily escapable mode of execution." Three guesses whether they survive or
not, and the first two don't count.
Not all of the humor works; a running joke, in which Austin and/or Vanessa
seem to be about to appear nude but do not (due to camera angles or convenient
placement of props and furniture), not only recurs too many times for its own
good but also manages to drag on endlessly each time. And, as I said, most of
the fish-out-of-water jokes are only marginally funny (with a few exceptions);
by and large, it was much more amusing when, in the movie's opening scene, we
saw Austin and Dr. Evil *in* their original element as they confront each
other at the "Electric Psychedelic Swingers' Club."
As in Myers's work on "Saturday Night Live," there are just enough times where
the jokes fizzle to make "Austin Powers" somewhat less than overwhelming. But
it's good campy entertainment, and worth seeing for anyone who enjoys parodies
or even comedy in general.

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
RUN LOLA RUN should be required viewing for all Hollywood 
action-movie directors. Here is a film that is as fast-paced and 
exciting as anything I've seen the past couple of years, and not only 
does it establish its breakneck pace without blowing anything up or 
dropping giant pieces of CGI on the screen, but it even creates a 
couple of sympathetic characters and offers some clever bits of 
commentary and insight along the way.
The premise is about as simple as they come. Lola (Franka Potente), a 
young woman living with her parents, receives a frantic telephone 
call from her boyfriend Manni, who has misplaced 100,000 deutschmarks 
of drug money only twenty minutes before he was supposed to deliver 
it to a gangster. Certain that he will be killed if he shows up 
without the money, he plans to rob a grocery store. Lola begs him to 
wait and promises to come up with the money--somehow. Since her 
bicycle has been stolen, she has to run from one location to the next 
as she tries to come up with the cash.
All of this exposition occurs in the first ten or fifteen minutes. 
Following that, writer/director Tom Tykwer shows us three different 
scenarios for what will happen in the next twenty minutes. Suffice it 
to say that all of them involve Lola scrambling between several 
locations, and that in each case it goes right down to the wire 
before we see whether Lola and Manni will escape their predicament or 
not. I would estimate that at least five to seven minutes of each 
scenario are spent on Lola running through the streets, yet these 
scenes do not grow tiresome in the least. Tykwer has a particularly 
flamboyant visual style: his camera rarely sits still, and when it 
does, it's usually watching from an unusual angle. More often, it's 
following Lola on one of her mad dashes, circling rapidly around a 
character in crisis, or even taking a swooping dive
towards the scene. But his methods are varied enough to avoid 
overkill, and the combination of his hyperactive camera work and the 
film's energetic techno score make for a brand of frenetic action 
that is rare even in today's world of hi-tech filmmaking.
The most interesting aspect of RUN LOLA RUN is the way in which 
Tykwer uses the differing scenarios to reflect his ideas about fate 
and chance. In each, there are at first only minor variations, but 
they soon lead to larger ones. For example, in both the first and 
second scenarios, Lola goes to her father's bank to try to get the 
money, but in the second, someone trips her as she runs down the 
stairs. As a result, the timing of her later collision with a 
passerby varies by a second or two, and when she gets to the bank, 
she arrives at a somewhat more uncomfortable moment in her father's 
conversation with his illicit lover. Thus his reaction to her sudden 
appearance is much more immediately hostile, which dramatically 
alters everything that follows. Tykwer also employs a clever gimmick 
whereby he momentarily cuts away from Lola to someone whom she has 
just passed, then shows a quick series of photographs that detail the 
rest of the person's life. These are also sometimes dramatically 
different between scenarios, depending on what exactly happens when 
Lola passes the person.
I've grown somewhat tired of movies that establish their hip 
credentials by making criminals their protagonists, but RUN LOLA RUN 
gets away with it because it manages to portray its characters 
sympathetically without whitewashing their actions. It is when Lola 
and Manni abandon their criminal impulses that they are most 
successful in escaping their predicament, and in one case divine 
intervention even seems to play a role. Two wrongs don't make a right 
in this film, and when Lola or Manni starts threatening violence or 
attempting robbery, things tend to go even further awry as a result.
This is not to say that RUN LOLA RUN is some sort of philosophical 
masterpiece, just that it can lay claim to a certain amount of depth 
underneath its high style. It isn't the most intelligent film of the 
year, but it might be the most entertaining, and it reaches that 
plateau without falling into the category of a guilty pleasure.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
Film review (C) 1997 by Kevin Patterson
Contact (PG, 1997)
Directed by Robert Zemeckis. 
Starring Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey, Tom Skerritt.
        Contact  is a film that tries to do several different things. It is
intended to present a realistic picture of what alien contact might be like,
to restore a sense of wonder and mystery to the issue of extraterrestrial
life, to raise questions about science and faith and how they would be
relevant in such a situation, and to tell a personal story of a romance
between the astronomer Dr. Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster) and the religious
spokesman Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey).
The film succeeds wonderfully at its first two goals. The portrayal of
the communication from an alien world is much more reasonable (albeit less
immediately engaging) than, say, the cold-blooded destructiveness of the
invaders in Independence Day   or even the complex process of abductions and
genetic hybridization that forms the ongoing plot line of TV's The X-Files. 
The aliens in Contact  seem to be like us-they are more curious than anything
else. They know we exist, they want us to know that they exist, and they would
like to make the next step and communicate in person. The film wisely refrains
from showing us the aliens directly, and between the characters' ongoing
speculation about the extraterrestrials and the outstanding visuals in the
climactic yet enigmatic scene when Arroway arrives on the alien world, that
sense of wonder and mystery comes through with a force rarely seen since
Stanley Kubrick's 2001: A Space Odyssey. 
Most of the film, however, takes place on Earth, where there is an
extended public debate on how to respond to these aliens. Scientists are
enthusiastic, ultraconservative religious leaders are wary, and government
officials are caught somewhere in between. The debate is fueled largely by Dr.
Arroway's atheism; she seems the obvious choice to pilot the spacecraft for
which the aliens have provided blueprints, but many are wary of sending an
atheist as humankind's representative to another species. The film is partly
successful in raising and exploring these questions, especially when it
reaches a conclusion that suggests that the two approaches - science and faith
- could be viewed as complementary rather than diametrically opposed.
Still, the film falls a little short in its representation of this
conflict as it exists in American society. The two "sides" are represented
primarily by Arroway and by far-right fundamentalists, but in reality probably
80% of Americans are neither atheists nor far-right fundamentalists. Palmer
Joss occupies something of a middle ground, but he ultimately becomes
distracted by personal motives and comes across as a less-than-ideal spokesman
for any ideology. Then again, the film does concentrate mostly on public
debate, which does, after all, tend to be dominated by extremists, rather than
on dinner-table or college-dormitory discussions. Contact  is accurate in its
portrayal of these issues, then, but only within the narrow scope to which it
confines itself.
The film's one clear failure is in the portrayal of the romance
between Arroway and Joss. For one thing, it resorts to the tired movie clich*
that two attractive people will immediately fall in love as soon as they
appear on the screen together, as there does not seem to be any other reason
for their instant mutual attraction. The romance rarely, if ever, sheds any
light on the characters, although it occasionally tries and fails - Joss's
explanation that he quit the priesthood because of the celibacy requirement
("I guess you could say I'm a man of the cloth, but without the cloth"), for
example, is more like a punchline to a joke than character development.
Instead, the romance mostly seems to exist for the sake of later plot
developments. Granted, this is a plot- and idea-driven film and the characters
are secondary, but this just seemed like laziness on the writers' part more
than anything else.
The successes of Contact,  however, far outweigh its failures. Even if
the social commentary had fizzled altogether (which it didn't), the simple yet
mysterious story of alien communication still would have made it a memorable
film. Contact  doesn't quite cover all the bases, but it covers about as much
as one could hope for in a two-hour film, and its rejection of big-budget
theatrics for a more realistic story is certainly admirable. And I would not
be surprised if, ten years from now, Contact  is mentioned in the same breath
as 2001 and Blade Runner  as one of the finest examples of sophisticated and
intellectually relevant science fiction.
Grade: A

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
As we near the end of the millennium, one of the most popular topics in
modern narrative fiction has been how humankind's recent technological and
scientific advances might change certain things we take for granted about
life. Andrew Niccol, who has since gained notoriety for his screenplay of
THE TRUMAN SHOW, puts in his two cents on the subject with GATTACA, a
science-fiction film in which all procreation is artificial, genetically
engineered for the best possible results. Vincent (Ethan Hawke), the
protagonist of GATTACA, was conceived naturally, and has a heart condition
which the family's doctor predicted would kill him by the age of thirty.
Vincent, and others like him, are labeled "invalids." Discrimination
against them is not sanctioned by the law, but it goes on as a matter of
routine nonetheless. The only way that he can hope to succeed at his
lifelong dream of going on a mission into outer space is to assume the
identity of another valid who, for whatever reason, can no longer fulfill
his or her place in society. An underground figure helps him locate Jerome
Morrow (Jude Law), who has been paralyzed in an accident, and the two of
them come to an agreement. Jerome will supply Vincent with the necessary
genetic samples to make the impersonation hold up under investigative
scrutiny, and in return Vincent will continue to provide for his lavish
lifestyle through income from his new position at Gattaca, the future
equivalent of NASA.
Thematically, the most obvious note that GATTACA strikes is a cautionary
one about genetic engineering: Niccol seems to have been inspired at least
partly by the seminal BLADE RUNNER, in which scientists created quasi-human
"Replicants" who were then simply shut off or killed when they became
inconvenient. However, there's also a parallel between the world of GATTACA
and our own, in which discrimination is technically illegal but
nevertheless occurs on a regular basis. Vincent is surprised to discover,
when he applies at Gattaca, that his "interview" consists of a urine test,
and I would not be shocked to learn that interviews for some socially
marginalized groups last just about as long at certain American companies.
Niccol also does a good job handling the science fiction elements of the
story. The futuristic set design, with its cold, metallic interiors, is
impressive and conveys a sense of technological menace without being too
overdone or outlandish. The technology is also pretty believable: both
artificial fertilization and the genetic testing and cataloguing through
bodily samples are within the realm of today's science. GATTACA also
manages to recapture some of the wonder of space travel that has been
diluted in modern culture by all the bug-monster alien invasions and
"hyperspace jumps" that tend to dominate science fiction. It keeps the
science simple and believable (Vincent's mission is a trip to Mars), and
focuses on its human implications rather than on special effects.
GATTACA does unfold rather awkwardly at times. There's a long narration
from Vincent near the beginning that only serves to make brain-poundingly
obvious what would have eventually become evident anyway. A murder mystery
is introduced, apparently to provide Vincent with cause for fear of
discovery (since the detectives' DNA investigation could turn up evidence
of an "invalid" at Gattaca), but it fails to generate much tension: it's
just another expository device. There's also a sibling rivalry, which
occupies too many of the film's closing moments for a subplot that had
disappeared after the introductory narration, and a romance between Vincent
and a co-worker (Uma Thurman) that is fairly formulaic.
The triumphs of GATTACA are to be found mostly in the care with which
Niccol has designed his future world: the science is very plausible, the
visual design is outstanding, and the issues raised by the film are good
food for thought. It would have been better if he had found a more smoothly
flowing story to frame in this world, but his conception of it is still
enough to qualify GATTACA as one of the more interesting recent science
fiction films.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.

Title
Review for Exotica (1994)
Atom Egoyan's EXOTICA is a thoroughly peculiar film that finds success in
its complete lack of regard for traditional narrative structure. To say
that it focuses on character development rather than plot is an
understatement. This is a film that literally *is* character development:
it starts with what seem to be disconnected episodes in various peoples'
lives, then gradually reveals why all of them are doing what they are doing
and how it all fits together. (What little plot there is, incidentally,
revolves around a bird egg smuggling ring--now how's that  for something
you've never seen in a movie before?)
The character who receives the most screen time is Francis Brown (Bruce
Greenwood), who goes to a strip club called Exotica every other night to
see a dancer named Christina (Mia Kirshner), who comes to his table to
perform a private dance. There is a strange connection between the two of
them, one that is deeply melancholy and personal rather than sexual, and
his visits to the club seem to be their unique way of expressing this.
(Incidentally, the promotion for EXOTICA, which touts it as "the first in a
series of high-profile strip club movies," could not be more misleading. To
be fair, I've never actually seen SHOWGIRLS or STRIPTEASE or any other
"high-profile strip club movie," but my impression is that they share
little in common with this film, which is devoid of any sleazy exploitation
and keeps the nudity to a minimum.) Also falling under Egoyan's microscope
are Eric (Elias Koteas), the club DJ and Christina's ex; Thomas (Don
McKellar), a nervous pet store clerk who buys scalped tickets to the ballet
only so that he can scalp them himself; and Zoe (Arsinee Khanjian), the
club owner who inherited it from her mother.
Part of Egoyan's success with EXOTICA is that he manages to engage the
viewer in such a certifiably strange web of personalities and
relationships. Francis, for example, is not the kind of guy I'd want to
hang around with and is severely prone to escapist fantasies, yet I found
myself understanding his situation and caring about what happened to him
even in his most self-centered or obsessive moments. Even Eric, who seems
to be by far the most manipulative of the bunch, comes across as a real
person rather than a two-dimensional villain. Through Egoyan's unorthodox,
piecemeal method of revealing the characters, events are presented strictly
within context, and moments that would have been played for slick
sensationalism in other films come across as matter of fact, since they are
merely a part of everyday life for these people.
Egoyan is a little less successful, however, with Thomas, whom he sets up
as a parallel to Francis at first (both of them are caught up in a
compulsive nighttime ritual--Francis at the club, and Thomas at the ballet)
but later becomes a device to further the developing Francis/Eric/Christina
conflict. If someone had asked me an hour into the film who the second most
important character was, Thomas would have been my obvious choice, but he
eventually recedes into the background to make room for Eric and Christina.
A half-developed character as expository device is better than a completely
flat one, of course, but EXOTICA might have been a little more complete if
Egoyan had found a way to make Thomas a more integral part of the conflicts
and personalities that drive the film.
The most impressive aspect of EXOTICA, in any case, is the extent to which
the characters' lives are revealed to be intertwined. They aren't
completely aware of it, but they share a connection that is at once
coincidental yet monumental. When Egoyan does finally make it clear, it
comes across with genuine empathy and completes the puzzle that he has so
carefully constructed. It may not be perfect, but there can be no doubt by
the time EXOTICA concludes that it is truly the work of a skilled filmmaker.
Send comments and suggestions to ktpattersn@aol.com.

Title
Review for Playing God (1997)
PLAYING GOD would like to be a Serious Movie that explores Important
Questions, most notably whether or not it's ethical for a doctor to treat
seriously wounded criminals privately, rather than take them to a hospital
where they would almost certainly be arrested after recovering. These
questions are present in the screenplay, but most of the time they are
briefly mentioned in voiceover so that the filmmakers can get on to the
next bit of quirky dialogue or the next violent confrontation. It's another
Quentin Tarantino imitation that occasionally takes a stab at being a
character drama, but it doesn't succeed completely at being either of the
two.
As the film begins, we are introduced to Eugene Sands (David Duchovny), a
former doctor who has lost his license after losing a patient while high on
amphetamines. He now lives the lonely, aimless life of an addict, and when
he walks into a bar one night to buy drugs, two hit men suddenly burst in
and shoot another patron. Eugene reacts out of instinct and quickly acts to
save the man. Gangster Raymond Blossom (Timothy Hutton) soon hears about
the incident and wants to hire Eugene to work as his private doctor,
assisting in situations in which one of his men is critically wounded.
Eugene agrees, temporarily, but soon gets tired of being surrounded by
murderers and psychopaths and, having fallen for Raymond's girlfriend
Claire (Angelina Jolie) in the meantime, he starts looking for a way out
for both of them. A possibility is presented in the form of an FBI sting
operation, led by an agent who wants Eugene to be his man on the inside
when they bust Raymond.
I would have liked to have seen more of Eugene's internal moral conflict,
as well as his later struggle to kick his drug habit. Both, however, are
portrayed rather blandly and aren't given much screen time: his qualms
about working for Raymond are mostly confined to voiceover, and his
withdrawal period doesn't look like anything more than a guy having a bad
case of the flu. PLAYING GOD is only interested in its characters up to a
point: they're mostly devices to set the quirky crime caper in motion.
Duchovny does what he can with the material, portraying a basically good
person who's taken a couple of serious wrong turns and delivering cynical
one-liners with a dry tone that always manages to draw a laugh. Timothy
Hutton, who plays Raymond as an unstable, overconfident crime lord wannabe,
also turns in a good performance, alternating between maniacally over the
top and subtly weird and intimidating. Unfortunately, I can't sing the same
praises for the FBI agent who contacts Eugene: for some reason, the
filmmakers decided to play this guy as an obsessive, nervous mess who can't
sit still and who sometimes seems like he's an even bigger head case than
Raymond. Somehow I wasn't too surprised when his sting operation fell apart
at the end.
Still, PLAYING GOD is noteworthy on two counts. One is that Eugene Sands
never turns into a stereotypical action hero, even when the FBI operation
collapses and Eugene pursues Raymond and Claire on his own. I kept waiting
for him and Raymond to have some drawn-out fistfight or gun battle, but
thankfully, they never did. In fact, the final moments of the film are
about as far from two men trying to kill each other as can be. The
relationship between Eugene and Claire is also written pretty well: it's
not the first outlaw romance in Hollywood and it won't be the last, but it
is portrayed believably, finding the right mix of typical attraction and
intimacy and the distinct way of relating to each other that comes from
their experience on the wrong side of the law.
Other than that, however, PLAYING GOD is really just another attempt at an
off-beat crime caper, and a fairly average one at that. It has many of the
right ingredients, but somehow they don't really add up to much of
anything. There's an amusing scene towards the end, for example, in which
one of Raymond's thugs sheepishly admits to the other that he forgot the
ski mask he needed for their upcoming heist, but we barely know the pair,
and the scene doesn't really have anything to do with anything else in the
movie. Criminals sit around tossing expletives at each other, but it never
results in anything more than a momentary laugh. Duchovny's and Hutton's
performances are both good, but unlike the characters of, say, PULP
FICTION or THE USUAL SUSPECTS, they don't play off of each other in any
distinct way: they just sort of happen to be in the same movie.
I saw PLAYING GOD on video, and I think maybe that's the best way to see
it. It's not a very complete experience, nor is the script very thorough,
but as an amalgamation of moderately interesting bits and pieces (along
with a few exceptional moments), it's a decent way to pass an hour and a
half at home.

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
Film review (C) 1997 by Kevin Patterson
Batman and Robin (PG-13, 1997)
Directed by Joel Schumaker. Written by Akiva Goldsman.
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell.
        I think maybe it's time for the Batman  series to be put to rest. Not
only has the first two films' unsettling insight into what it would really
take for someone to make himself into a "superhero" been abandoned, but this
one throws any lingering realism out the window and goes for all-out camp with
few traces of the self-mocking restraint of the relatively light-hearted third
installment. Let me give you an example: In the first scene of the movie,
Batman (George Clooney) and Robin (Chris O'Donnell) are summoned to a museum
that has been literally turned to ice by Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger) in
an attempt to steal a diamond. Mr. Freeze's thugs are armed with none other
than hockey sticks, but this is no problem for our heroes: automatic skates
shoot out of their shoes, at which point Robin manages to get hold of a hockey
stick, grabs the diamond, and stick-handles it through the museum.
I might have expected this from an Airplane-style farce, but I don't
think that's what this movie is supposed to be. After all, the previous three
Batman movies were actually fairly realistic by the standards of the
superhero/action genre and kept the corny death-defying stunts to a minimum,
while playing the obligatory cheesiness with at least some amount of irony.
Not any more; the list goes on and on in this one. Robin holds onto the
outside of a flying rocket ship 30,000 feet high in the atmosphere, climbing
in the door to save Batman. Mr. Freeze and Poison Ivy (Uma Thurman) leap from
a skyscraper and survive by landing in a small pond. A World Dominating Mad
Scientist lives in a fortress that seems to have been stolen from the old
He-Man  cartoons. My very favorite example is the scene in which Batgirl
(Alicia Silverstone) gets in a race with motorcycle thugs, during which they
come up with the clever notion of dousing the road with gasoline and setting
it on fire to distract her. Not bad, but wouldn't the police (or maybe
Batman?) notice if the road was on fire? I knew Gotham City was this crazy
anarchic place, but . . . .
It also seems that the creators of the Batman movies are obeying some
unwritten rule that there have to be more main characters and plot lines in
each successive installment. As if three protagonists and two villains weren't
enough, Batman and Robin  further weighs itself down with an underdeveloped
side story of the failing health of Bruce Wayne's butler Alfred (Michael
Gough), which might have seemed poignant if it wasn't surrounded by so much
silliness, as well as several scenes with Elle MacPherson as Bruce's
girlfriend which serve no purpose other than to remind us that she is in the movie.
 All this might be semi-excusable if the story were interesting and
entertaining, but it isn't. In fact, it's kind of boring. Mr. Freeze and
Poison Ivy pale in comparison as villains to past baddies such as Jack
Nicholson's Joker and Danny DeVito's Penguin. Their evil plot is as
predictable (Schwarzenegger actually pronounces the words, "Today Gotham City,
tomorrow the world!") as it is lame-brained (didn't it ever occur to Poison
Ivy that freezing the entire world would kill her precious plants too?). And
Robin's constant challenging of Batman mostly just makes him look bull-headed
and stupid and makes us wonder why Batman ever would have taken him on as a
partner in the first place. Strip away the stars, the fancy set design, and
the status as a "Batman movie," and all you have here is another barely
passable summer action flick.
Grade: D+

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
This review is being reposted due to formatting errors which caused some of
the text to be repeated in the original.
Tomorrow Never Dies  **1/2 (out of four)
PG-13, 1997
Directed by Roger Spottiswoode. Written by Bruce Feirstein.
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Jonathan Pryce, Michelle Yeoh.
In a way I almost feel unqualified to write this review since I had never
actually seen an entire James Bond movie until now. Still, I had heard enough
about the series that I had a pretty good idea what to expect here - a suave
British secret agent, with the assistance of lots of high-tech gadgets, blows
away dozens of bad guys, pulls off numerous death-defying stunts, saves the
world, delivers sarcastic one-liners, still finds time to sleep with several
attractive women, and acts like he doesn't notice.
And for the most part, that's what I got when I went to see "Tomorrow Never
Dies." The gadgets and stunts are by and large the best aspects of the movie;
my personal favorite was the cellular phone which also served as a remote
control for Bond's car. This led to the most notable action sequence, in which
Bond manages to conduct a car chase from the floor of the back seat. Brosnan
appropriately manages to make the whole thing look like second nature, except
for one moment when he lets slip a childish grin, like a kid who is delighted
to be playing with his new toys.
The plot, if it matters, is this: media mogul Elliot Carver (Jonathan Pryce)
tries to provoke a war between Britain and China because it will make for
great headlines to coincide with the launching of his new international
satellite network. Both countries' governments sense that something is fishy,
and thus Bond and Chinese spy Wei Lin (Michelle Yeoh) are dispatched to
investigate. Carver, like every other evil genius who aspires to world
domination, has a personal security force the size of a small army and thus
proves to be a formidable adversary for both super-spies. Along the way there
are car chases, motorcycle chases, fights, shootouts, sky dives, etc.
The one problem I had with the movie is that it sometimes didn't push things
far enough. Most of the action sequences were suitably over-the-top, but a few
of them (most notably the final one) are really nothing different than what
you might find in any action movie. There are also too many instances in which
one of Carver's assistants could easily have killed Bond but, for some reason,
waited. Note that I don't object when the primary villain acts like this and
uses the moment to deliver a goofy "I shall rule the entire world!" speech
while the hero cooks up a scheme to escape - some cliches make for good campy
fun, but having a generic thug just stand there with a gun while staring
blankly isn't one of them.
I went to "Tomorrow Never Dies" expecting to see a light-hearted, funny, and
entertaining action movie and to give it three stars. Since some of the action
sequences turned out to be fairly mundane, and a number of the one-liners fell
flat, I have decided to give it two and a half. I wouldn't advise paying full
price for it in a theater, but at rush hour or on video, it's good for a
couple hours of mindless entertainment.

Title
Review for Drowning by Numbers (1988)
Drowning By Numbers (R, 1987)
Directed and written by Peter Greenaway. Starring Joan Plowright, Juliet
Stevenson, Joely Richardson, Bernard Hill, Jason Edwards.
        Peter Greenaway's Drowning By Numbers  is such an odd film that I am
not sure how to write a review for it. I can start, I guess, by describing the
film's basic storyline: three women, all named Cissy Colpitts (Joan Plowright,
Juliet Stevenson, Joely Richardson), drown their husbands for various reasons
and convince the coroner (Bernard Hill) to declare the deaths accidents by
offering the possibility of later sexual favors.
But the story really seems like nothing more than a backdrop for all
the film's weird idiosyncrasies. Most notably, the numbers 1 through 100 all
appear in the film somewhere. Sometimes they appear in appropriate contexts
such as on a calendar or a piece of paper; sometimes they seem wholly out of
place, such as when they are painted on cows. The characters also play games
involving numerics and combinations throughout the film; these games are often
introduced with narration from a young child named Smut (Jason Edwards). There
are recurring images of insects crawling on rotting food. And it is a safe bet
that almost every scene will include at least one dialogue reference to
numbers, counting, water, sex, or death.
Director/writer Greenaway does seem to know what he is doing here;
Drowning By Numbers  is not a case of directorial incompetence, nor is it even
a David Lynch-style film in which a story is told through abstract images.
Rather, it seems to be a flat refusal on Greenaway's part to play by any
established rules of narrative realism. The film exists at a totally detached,
intellectual level; Greenaway doesn't seem to want us to really care about
what happens as much as he wants us to notice the patterns in the dialogue and
admire the photography and color schemes, which often evoke Renaissance
painting. As best as I can tell, there is no hidden meaning behind all this,
and if there is, then I must say that Greenaway has hidden it a little too well.
Does it work? It's tough to say. Greenaway does stick to the bizarre
rules he has set up for himself, so it is at the very least executed
correctly. And there were certainly things that I liked about the film. The
number sequence was clever and at times hilarious, and it was fun to watch for
the numbers and for the recurring patterns in the dialogue in each scene. The
imagery was skillfully crafted and many of the scenes possessed a wonderfully
surreal quality, particularly those in which a young girl jumps rope outside a
house counting the stars while pink lights fade in and out and a deep,
spectral sound hums in the background. And Smut's narrations are often amusing
in a scratch-your-head kind of way, such as when he explains that "Tuesday is
the best day for violent death, because on Tuesday a violent death is marked
with yellow paint whereas on all other days it is marked with red paint,
except Saturday," at which point he is seen painting yellow streaks around a
dead animal on the road.
Yet there was something manipulative about Greenaway's albeit original
and distinctive style. It was as if his intellectual detachment backed the
audience into a corner, that it would somehow be out of bounds to "dislike"
anything in the film because that would be approaching it the wrong way. For
example, I would normally criticize a film as emotionally empty as Drowning By
Numbers  for all its violence and graphic sexual content, but the fact is that
the entire film is mostly arbitrary and shies away from the psychological
implications of any behavior-violent, sexual, or otherwise. There were a few
graphic scenes which seemed like they were probably unnecessary both to the
story and to the repeating motifs, but even now I find myself hesitating to
criticize them directly because I wonder if Greenaway's film is simply over my head.
Assuming, then, that Drowning By Numbers  was nothing more than an
attempt to take the bare bones of a linear plot and use it for what amounts to
more of a filmed intellectual and artistic exercise than a story with
realistic plot and character development, it works most of the time. It is
difficult to evaluate this kind of film since it refuses to play by any
established rules of moviemaking, but I am tentatively giving it an A-,
awarding it points for its well-crafted imagery and the cleverness of the
recurring pattens and taking away a few for its borderline-manipulative style.
Be warned, however: if I do ever find out that there was supposed to be some
deep symbolic meaning underneath all this cinematic strangeness, it stands to
lose a few more.
Grade: A-

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
For his latest film "Deconstructing Harry," Woody Allen assumes the
personality of Harry Block, a writer and a truly repulsive human being.
Harry's success as a writer is due largely to his ability to take his
obsessions with sex and his numerous extramarital affairs and turn them into
stories. He is cynical and unpleasant to just about everyone, and he knows it.
He even tells women to keep their distance from him emotionally, because in
his mind he is the "worst person who ever lived." This is tough material, to
be sure, and at times it seems to get the better of Allen.
Allen develops the story in non-linear order, with numerous flashbacks to past
incidents in Harry's life as well as on-screen presentations of the
semi-autobiographical stories that he has written. At times, the characters
from these stories, slightly altered from their real-life models, appear and
talk to him. He also makes use of a camera technique whereby there are quick
cuts within the same scene, so that Harry is cut off in the middle of a
sentence, for example, but then we see him in the same place but in a slightly
different posture and talking about something else. While this effect helped
to capture Harry's various quirks and gestures at times, it's frankly kind of
annoying after a while.
And perhaps that's the best way to describe this movie as a whole - frankly
kind of annoying after a while. Allen devotes the film to the study of a
thoroughly unlikeable character. This does not make the film bad in and of
itself, but somehow it just doesn't carry enough impact to justify asking the
audience to swallow such a large amount of obnoxious behavior. A film can have
an unsympathetic protagonist and still deliver as a character study, but it
has to get inside the person's head somehow and allow the audience to relate
to the character. Or it can have an underlying theme that is monumental enough
that the characters aren't so important. Neither of these things happen in
"Deconstructing Harry"; Allen occasionally introduces an element of genuine
pathos to Harry's situation in that he seems defeated by his own insecurities
and obsessions, but the way he handles it is so repellent that I mostly just
wanted the guy to shut up and go away. And the theme - that a bad person can
create good art - isn't striking enough to carry the movie by itself.
Does it still work as a comedy? Well, sort of. Here we have the other problem
with this movie, namely that most of the other characters are reduced to the
level of sitcom dimwits. Allen might have gotten away with the
characterization of Harry Block if he had provided a more easily accessible
secondary character, but he doesn't do that either. One of his ex-wives, for
example, is his former shrink, and when their marriage breaks up she
interrupts her sessions with another patient to step into the next room where
he is waiting and shout obscenities at him. Later, there seems to be a real
contrast between Harry and the generosity of the newlyweds Larry (Billy
Crystal) and Faye (Elisabeth Shue), who come to bail him out of prison just
before their honeymoon. Then Faye inexplicably chooses this moment to mention
that she once slept with her gynecologist, and as a result she seems like just
another sex-obsessed twit.
Granted, these moments are still funny at a basic level, and there are a few
moments of truly inspired lunacy (such as when Robin Williams's character
suddenly becomes "out of focus" on the screen). There are, however, just as
many scenes where we just sit and watch Harry treat other people like dirt,
but not in a way that reveals anything new about him as a person. The first
fifteen minutes of this film, for example, are quite repulsive and almost
unbearably tedious; the people sitting behind me were considering walking out,
and while it does get somewhat better after that, I can't say I would have
blamed them.
I am not saying that characters always have to be pleasant, nor am I even
saying that Allen should not be allowed to make a movie that suggests that all
human beings are neurotic and preoccupied with sex, although I would seriously
doubt the validity of such a statement. I am saying, however, that the viewer
should be given some way to relate to (though not necessarily empathize with)
the characters on screen. Aside from the few moments of revealing insight into
the mind of Harry Block, "Deconstructing Harry" is not much more than a
psychological freak show: we are momentarily shocked at what we see,
momentarily amused at the comic moments, and momentarily intrigued that Allen
took on such abrasive material. After that, the movie is over, and it's out of
sight, out of mind.

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
STIGMATA arrives in theaters amidst a certain amount of controversy 
over its negative portrayal of the Catholic Church's authority 
structure. Personally, I don't think it's worth anyone's effort to 
get offended over something as incoherent as this film, which amounts 
to little more than a two-hour music video. Some half-hearted 
attempts are made to tell a story about Vatican concealment of a 
previously unknown gospel, but most of it makes very little sense and 
is drowned out by the endless MTV-style cutting and the disruptively 
loud soundtrack. Viewers are more likely to come away questioning the 
screenplay's logic than questioning their religious beliefs.
The title refers to a condition reportedly experienced by various 
religious believers throughout history, in which the person 
mysteriously begins to exhibit the wounds inflicted on Christ before 
he died: nail puncture holes in the wrists and feet, lacerations from 
a whip and a crown of thorns, and spear wounds to the sides. STIGMATA 
begins by introducing us to Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), a 
Catholic priest and a former scientist who investigates reports of 
miracles for the Church. He is sent to Pittsburgh when Frankie Paige 
(Patricia Arquette), a 23-year-old hair-stylist and, we learn, an 
atheist, begins to exhibit the stigmata. Andrew quickly realizes that 
this is probably legitimate, despite the fact that all previous 
stigmatics have been devout believers. She is taken to the hospital 
repeatedly for her injuries, supernatural events such as windows 
spontaneously breaking seem to follow her, she is hearing voices, and 
finally she channels an ancient Aramaic text and scrawls it on the 
wall of her apartment. Andrew's superior, Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan 
Pryce), however, is strangely disapproving and elusive, and 
eventually we learn why: the text that Frankie copied is a lost 
Gospel that Houseman fears could undermine the Church's authority, 
and he's willing to kill her to keep this discovery quiet.
If there's anything offensive to the Catholic Church here, it's that 
Andrew and Houseman both seem to be so ignorant about Catholicism. At 
the beginning, Andrew talks with his mentor in a Vatican library, who 
reveals that there are actually more supposed gospels in existence 
than the four in the Bible, and that mainstream Christianity simply 
hasn't accepted any of the others. This is very old news to anyone 
with even a passing acquaintance with Biblical scholarship, and to 
suggest that Andrew wouldn't already know this from his seminary 
training is impossible to swallow. The message contained in the lost 
Gospel that Houseman seeks to suppress is that the Kingdom of God is 
found everywhere, most importantly in the individual, and not just in 
"structures of stone and marble" (i.e. churches). Seeing as Jesus 
more or less said this in the four traditional Gospels, I can't 
fathom why Houseman would think it's dangerous. No Catholic priest 
would deny that the relationship between God and the individual 
supercedes the importance of an institution, and it isn't as if the 
text called for the believers to start tearing down churches. Perhaps 
the biggest howler is when Frankie worries that she will soon die 
because she will eventually receive the fifth wound of the stigmata 
-- the spear to the sides, which she calls "the one that killed him." 
Andrew appears to share her concern, but tries to reassure her by 
telling her that no one has ever received all five wounds of the 
stigmata. Evidently he skipped the parts of his training that 
required him to actually open the Bible, because otherwise he would 
know that Christ died from being crucified, not from being stabbed to 
death with a spear.
STIGMATA is filmed in a dimly lit, grainy style of cinematography: it 
seems to have been inspired more by BATMAN or DARK CITY than JESUS OF 
NAZARETH. Director Rupert Wainwright's hyperactive camera work is 
effective in capturing the hallucinatory power of Frankie's 
supernatural experiences, but it tends to distract in the other 
scenes, and characterization and plot get lost in the unnecessarily 
jumpy cutting and the brain-pounding music by Smashing Pumpkins 
songwriter Billy Corgan. There is only a superficial exploration of 
the relationship between Frankie and Andrew: much of it focuses on 
the relatively dull notion that he finds her sexually tempting, and 
their differences of belief are underdeveloped. Andrew is an 
interesting character in that he's found himself guided more by 
science than by faith, but this is unfortunately played out in scenes 
that seem to lack much internal logic. At one point, when Frankie is 
channeling, he says, "Who are you?" and the voice of a dead priest 
tells him, "The messenger is unimportant." Later, she is channeling 
this same dead priest, and when Andrew asks the spirit if he can be 
the new messenger, the spirit responds, "The messenger believes. You 
only have doubt." Now hang on a second: I thought the messenger was 
unimportant. And if belief is a necessity, why did the spirit choose 
an atheist as his medium?
The marketing campaign for STIGMATA has touted it as another entry in 
the recent wave of supernatural thrillers. It is, in fact, the 
supernatural sequences that are the most effective, since the 
disorienting music-video style is actually appropriate for these 
scenes. Wainwright uses a clever technique during the stigmata 
scenes, cutting back and forth between Frankie exhibiting the wounds 
and black-and-white flashbacks in which the hammer and nails and the 
whip are used on Christ. The scenes in which Frankie channels through 
a deep male voice are also pretty unnerving. I've been told that this 
was lifted from THE EXORCIST, which I haven't seen, but regardless of 
where the idea came from, it does work. Even these scenes, however, 
are marred by poor story logic and a tendency to go over the top. A 
sequence in which a hysterical Frankie runs out into the middle of 
the street and causes cars to swerve out of control and crash into 
each other borders on being unintentionally funny, and the film is 
never quite clear on who she is channeling and why. Most of the time, 
it seems to be the dead priest, but there is the hint of demonic 
possession at one point when she tries to seduce Andrew and then 
starts cursing at him and throwing him around the room. I was left 
wondering whether the filmmakers intended for us to think that she 
was channeling both the spirits of the deceased and demonic visitors, 
or if they thought for some reason that the spirit of a dead Catholic 
priest would behave like this. More to the point, I wonder if they 
even cared, given that they seem much more interested in flashy 
cutting and visual pyrotechnics than in probing the meaning behind 
the images they create.
There is a scene midway through the film which illustrates much of 
what is wrong with Stigmata. Andrew and Frankie are sitting in an 
outdoor caf, discussing their respective lives as Andrew reflects on 
some of the sacrifices he's made to become a priest. Then their 
voices become inaudible, with saccharine music playing while we watch 
their lips move. Then the scene is interrupted by Frankie suddenly 
exhibiting the thorn wounds on her forehead and screaming 
hysterically. Riveting, certainly, but the opportunity for character 
development is wasted in favor of more showy camera work. STIGMATA is 
a film that would almost be better viewed with the sound turned off, 
so that the viewer could enjoy the flair and breakneck pacing of the 
visuals without worrying about the story possibilities that are being 
squandered along the way.
If this review comes off as unnecessarily harsh, that's probably 
because STIGMATA is the most frustrating kind of mediocre film: the 
kind that could have and should have been good. There are many routes 
that the filmmakers could have taken that would have resulted in a 
far superior product. The interaction between an atheist receving 
divine revelation and a priest plagued by doubt could have made for 
an intriguing character piece. Andrew's dilemma as a priest trying to 
balance his religious faith and his scientific skepticism would have 
been a worthy topic in today's world. Frankie's story actually 
carries some strong Biblical parallels, most notably that of the 
unbeliever chosen by God and the idea that divine service is equal 
parts reward and burden. The film refers to each of these issues, but 
it can't sit still long enough to explore any of them in any depth. 
Later on, it tries to switch into full-blown conspiracy thriller 
mode, but the notion of a cardinal trying to suppress a message 
that's already in the Bible is too ill-conceived for this to be even 
remotely convincing.
It has yet to be seen whether or not STIGMATA will inspire the same 
level of widespread protest as, say, The Last Temptation of Christ. 
Frankly, the screenplay's picture of the Church is so misinformed 
that nothing it has to say on the subject can be taken especially 
seriously. If you absolutely must protest this film, my advice would 
be to forget the half-hearted attempts at theology and complain about 
the overwrought visuals and the sloppy storytelling instead.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Blue Velvet (R, 1986)
Written and directed by David Lynch.
Starring Kyle MacLachlan, Isabella Rossellini, Dennis Hopper, Laura Dern.
        Blue Velvet  is definitely not a movie for the faint-of-heart. While
there may be less actual graphic material than, say, a raunchy sex comedy or a
gangster movie, what we do see is played for maximum effect. The basic story
is that young Jeffrey Beaumont (Kyle MacLachlan), after finding a grotesque
piece of evidence for a criminal investigation-a disembodied human ear-lets
his curiosity get the better of him and begins conducting his own
"investigation" on the side. His plan goes awry as he sneaks into the
apartment of lounge singer Dorothy Vallens (Isabella Rossellini), witnessing a
bizarre, sadomasochistic sexual encounter between Dorothy and Frank Booth
(Dennis Hopper). Rather than being repulsed completely by what he discovers,
Jeffrey becomes intrigued by Dorothy and is increasingly receptive to her
self-degrading attempts to seduce him.
        Drawn into the perverse, corrupt world of Dorothy and Frank, Jeffrey
descends into the darkest corners of his own psyche and ultimately has to
climb back out. At the same time, there is a more conventional suspense-movie
plot in that Jeffrey "knows too much" about Frank Booth and his underworld
goons and faces the very real possibility that they will decide to bump him
off sooner or later. But it is really Jeffrey's trip through psychological
hell that is the film's center. There is perhaps no director better suited for
this material than David Lynch, who employs his talents for bizarre, surreal
imagery here not to create other-worldly realities as in Eraserhead  or Twin
Peaks,  but to make our own reality both oddly idiosyncratic and extremely
disturbing. Few directors could have Jeffrey demonstrating the "chicken walk"
to his girlfriend Sandy (Laura Dern) in one scene and Frank inhaling nitrous
oxide and brutalizing Dorothy in the next without having the film collapse
into some kind of circus act gone horribly wrong. But Lynch pulls it off,
sustaining a consistency in mood and tone that convinces us that this is all
part of the same reality, lending to the film a hypnotic pull that keeps the
audience with Jeffrey every step of the way.
        Not surprisingly, Blue Velvet  has stirred up a lot of controversy.
Some viewers, for example, have been outraged at Lynch's juxtaposition of the
raw despair and brutality of the scenes with Hopper and Rossellini with
tongue-in-cheek portrayals of small-town banality. In these viewers' minds,
Blue Velvet  is trying to be a black comedy about material that is not the
least bit funny. I can't make a claim to any special knowledge about what was
going through Lynch's head, but I think that such an interpretation is
misguided. Lynch is a director who works through images, who shows rather than
tells what the characters are experiencing. By showing us the harsh, violent
reality one minute and the benign surface the next, we are made painfully
aware of the obliteration of Jeffrey's innocence and of his long-held
conceptions of the world around him. The silly humor of the other characters'
naivet* may even provoke laughter in the viewer, but it is a sort of nervous,
uncomfortable laughter; the cheerful cluelessness of the town's residents is
funny only at a superficial level because we are reminded so bluntly of the
darkness that it masks.
        As for the more typical argument that the film is offensive because it
depicts offensive behavior, I can only respond that most movies are "violent"
or at least depict evil and fear in one form or another. In an age of
action-movie moral relativism, when hundreds of faceless enemies are blown
away in the name of justice, Blue Velvet  should, if anything, be commended
for exposing this kind of violence in all its sick ugliness. The film does not
flinch from what is happening or apologize for its characters' behavior;
rather, it explores MacLachlan's character with considerable sophistication,
asking just what led him into all this in the first place and how easily he
might be tempted into joining in on Hopper's twisted fun. For all of Lynch's
"artsy" touches, the film is actually quite realistic in its exploration of
the age-old issue of good vs. evil, portraying its main character as a real
person with real flaws and moral conflicts rather than pitting two archetypes
against each other and letting them sort it out with a bunch of explosions.
        Blue Velvet  is not a pointless trash heap or a tasteless black
comedy, then, but a compelling study of the darker aspects of humanity and one
of the most powerful renderings ever of the timeless story of temptation,
fall, and redemption. It may be puzzling upon a first viewing as to what
exactly Lynch is trying to "get at," but, once fully understood, it is a
remarkable film that deserves to be remembered as a classic.
Grade: A+

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
Let's start with the good news: I was fascinated for the first half of
"Stargate." The story, involving a mysterious portal discovered among the
ruins of ancient Egypt that turns out to lead to another planet halfway across
the galaxy, unfolds against a backdrop of outstanding visual design that led
me to believe that we were headed for a mystical sci-fi trip a la "2001: A
Space Odyssey" or "Contact." The eccentric but brilliant Dr. Daniel Jackson
(James Spader), seemed to possess just the right mix of childlike enthusiasm
and raw intelligence to lead the way. When Jackson and a military unit led by
Col. Jack O'Neil (Kurt Russell) cross through the stargate and arrive on the
alien world, they discover exact replicas of the Egyptian pyramids as well as
a race of humanoids who, according to Jackson, seem to be practicing ancient
Egyptian culture.
Unfortunately, after building up this atmosphere of mystery and awe for the
first half of the film, the screenwriters then give us a solution to the
mystery that is only mildly clever at best and lacking in any greater insight
beyond its immediate effect on the plot. What's even worse is that its
immediate effect on the plot is to turn the movie into Indiana Jones On
Another Planet; director Roland Emmerich pretty much abandons the tone of
mystery and intrigue, opting instead for a run-of-the-mill "fight the bad
alien" scenario. The last half hour of the movie, while entertaining at a
basic level, is really nothing more than standard action sequences and
explosions. "Stargate" also makes use of quite a few cliches towards the end
which, although of relatively minor significance plot-wise, are still
noticeable enough to be annoying.
"Stargate" does not quite deserve to be panned (as it has been by many
critics): at its best, it is an enthralling science-fiction mystery, and at
its worst it is still an average action movie. Some movies set their sights
too high and come off looking ridiculous. "Stargate" has the opposite problem:
with this premise, it should have set its sights higher. As it is, I find
myself assigning a two and a half stars to a movie that probably could have
had three and a half.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Tony Scott's ENEMY OF THE STATE is like a very carefully constructed and
reliable machine. The film skillfully assembles all the standard parts of a
paranoid action thriller, puts them in exactly the right places, flicks the
"on" switch, and then justs let the thing run. It has clichs out the wazoo
(innocent citizen happening to witness a government-sanctioned murder,
protagonist as target of a high-tech smear campaign, car chase in an
underground tunnel, exploding warehouse, etc.), but this is the kind of
movie that reminds us why clichs become clichs in the first place:
because, when used properly, they work.
ENEMY OF THE STATE effectively blends elements of two types of thrillers:
the "stolen-identity" story, in which nefarious forces use technological
forgery to undermine someone's credibility and take away his financial and
legal resources, and the chase movie, in which the protagonist is
constantly on the run from the bad guys. That protagonist is Robert Dean
(Will Smith), a labor attorney who accidentally winds up in possession of a
tape documenting the murder of a Congressman. The murder had been ordered
by an NSA operative named Reynolds (Jon Voight), who needed the Congressman
out of the way in order to pass a bill that would legalize widespread audio
and video surveillance of the American population. Eventually Dean is
joined by Brill (Gene Hackman), a rogue NSA agent, as the two of them try
to turn the tables on Reynolds' men.
This is the second big-budget action movie of 1998 to be produced by Jerry
Bruckheimer, ARMAGEDDON being the first. ENEMY OF THE STATE is a slightly
better film than ARMAGEDDON, if nothing else because the suspense depends
on a cat-and-mouse routine between Dean, Brill, and Reynolds rather than on
the efforts of the protagonists to combat a giant piece of CGI. The initial
chase scenes are the high point of the movie, as Scott keeps the audience
on the edge of their seats with quick cuts between the action itself, the
hi-tech video feeds from the NSA satellites, and the hackers at NSA
headquarters monitoring the situation. Screenwriter David Marconi also
deserves some credit, however, for his presentation of Dean's family life,
which seems to be mostly happy but not without its problems. The dialogue
is nothing to write home about, but it is at least realistic and mostly
devoid of the irritating clichs that populate many an action script.
Aside from a far-fetched and unnecessarily bloody ending, the major flaw in
ENEMY OF THE STATE is that Scott and Bruckheimer don't recognize when they
have too much of a good thing. The scenes of the NSA agents pursuing Dean
with the help of various hi-tech gadgets start to grow repetitive after a
while, and as a result the movie really starts to drag in the middle
section until Brill shows up. While not as annoying as the endless
camera-shaking in the final hour of ARMAGEDDON, these scenes still left me
thinking that Bruckheimer and his directors really ought to open a
dictionary and look up "restraint" some time. Fortunately, things pick up
again towards the end when Dean and Brill hatch a scheme to outwit the NSA.
ENEMY OF THE STATE is the kind of movie that really makes me wish I had a
**3/4 rating: it's better than any of the **1/2 films I've seen this year,
but not as good as any of the other *** films. Since I saw it on Christmas
Day, I've decided to be generous.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Archive:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me (1992)
SPOILER WARNING: This review reveals many of the major plot points of the
"Twin Peaks" television series, including the identity of Laura Palmer's
killer and the ending of the cliffhanger finale.
Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me  * * * *
R, 1992
Written by David Lynch and Robert Engels. Directed by David Lynch.
Starring Sheryl Lee, Ray Wise, Kyle MacLachlan, Chris Isaak.
Shortly after the cancellation of the "Twin Peaks" televison series,
co-creator David Lynch announced that he was not ready to leave the story
behind and would make a "Peaks" feature film. Fans were understandably excited
and hoped for a resolution to the show's frustrating cliffhanger ending, in
which FBI Special Agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) was trapped inside an
alternate reality while an evil doppelganger took his place. Then Lynch
decided instead to do a prequel, exploring the events leading to the murder of
Laura Palmer (Sheryl Lee) rather than following up on the series. Many "Peaks
Freaks" were disappointed, and some continue to insist to this day that the
film was an artistic flop.
In fact, however, there is a lot to admire in "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me."
The opening half-hour, in which FBI agents Chester Desmond (Chris Isaak) and
Sam Stanley (Kiefer Sutherland) investigate a related murder, features much of
the goofy humor that made the series so much fun as they encounter, among
others, a hostile macho sheriff ("Cable bends steel!" proclaims a local
headline), a drunken trailer park manager who laments that their investigation
"just means more shit I gotta do now," and a grumpy waitress ("Do you wanna
hear about our specials? . . . We don't have any!"). As the story moves to the
town of Twin Peaks and the final days of Laura Palmer's life, agents of the
supernatural realm known as the Black Lodge appear, and Lynch treats us to
several excellent sequences inside the mysterious "Red Room." 
Many of these elements undoubtedly would seem confusing to someone who did not
watch the series. But there is also a powerfully tragic story to be told here,
that of Laura Palmer's descent into a personal hell of drugs and promiscuity
as she is terrorized by the Black Lodge forces, culminating in her recognition
of her demon-possessed father (Ray Wise) as the source of her sexual abuse and
emotional despair. Lynch and co-writer Robert Engels turn the fact that
everyone seeing this movie knew that it would end with Laura's murder to their
advantage; we honestly want to see Laura somehow escape her horrible fate but
know that she will not. Sheryl Lee gives an engaging and believable
performance as Laura Palmer, creating a character that still deserves our
sympathy despite the fact that a fair amount of her pain is self-inflicted.
The performances of Lee and Wise as well as Lynch's talent for emotional
intensity and for astonishing visuals serve to capture vividly the horror of
her situation and ultimately to produce some very moving moments. Most of
these are soaked in melancholy, but without giving the details away, let me
just say that this film does not end immediately after Laura's death and that
the ending is about as uplifting (and yet un-sappy) an ending as you can have
in a movie in which the main character is murdered. "Fire Walk With Me" is the
rare film that incorporates supernatural elements yet still deals with real
emotions and creates three-dimensional characters that can be taken seriously.
If one accepts "Fire Walk With Me" for what it is - a riveting.
character-driven drama with hints of supenatural mystery - it is ultimately
very rewarding. Many, including myself, might have preferred an extended "Twin
Peaks" episode and a clarification of the TV series's plot threads, but David
Lynch's responsibility as a filmmaker should not be primarily to satisfy fan
expectations but simply to make a competent and powerful film. By that
standard, "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me" is an outstanding success.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Boxer, The (1997)
At its root level, Jim Sheridan's THE BOXER is a commentary on the
political strife that plagues Northern Ireland and a challenge to both
sides to put down the guns. But rather than focusing on the violence
itself, it fashions a political statement by showing us how the "Troubles"
have affected everyday people.
Daniel Day-Lewis stars in the lead as Danny Flynn, a former IRA member who
has just finally finished his 14-year prison sentence for terrorist
activities and no longer wants anything to do with the violent side of the
Republican movement. He and his former girlfriend Maggie (Emiliy Watson)
quickly discover that they are still in love, but she was married to
another prisoner many years ago. Because she is a "prisoner's wife," her
marriage, though she herself no longer believes in it, carries political
significance: if it breaks up, it stands as a sign of disunity among
Republican forces. Day-Lewis and Watson perform admirably, portraying their
relationship with almost no cliche or cheesiness, and I particularly
enjoyed the way they found themselves drifting back together without
consciously trying to do so.
Danny, in the meantime, has teamed up with his friend Ike Weir (Ken Stott)
to start a non-sectarian boxing club in Belfast. He is not without enemies,
most notably Harry (Gerald McSorley), an IRA hard-liner who wants nothing
to do with the emerging peace agreement. Joe Hamill (Brian Cox), Maggie's
father, is a moderate IRA leader who would like to settle for peace, but he
disapproves of his daughter's relationship with Danny because of the
political element.
There is, I suspect, a temptation for filmmakers to take politically
controversial material like that of THE BOXER and fashion an extremely
intense and volatile story around it. Sheridan and co-writer Terry George
take a different approach: the tone of their film is more sad and regretful
than anything else, augmented partly by their decision to shoot most of the
scenes in bluish, hazy cinematography. When a bomb goes off during the
first match at the boxing club and rioting breaks out in the streets,
Sheridan chooses not to stage a pumped-up action sequence and instead gets
his audience to share in the disappointment of Danny and Ike that their
attempt to hold a peaceful gathering between Catholics and Protestants has
failed.
As a matter of fact, one problem that THE BOXER runs into is that it is so
far removed from the mentality of violence that the violent pasts of Danny
and Joe are never quite convincing. Joe, in particular, seems like a nice
family man who just happens to have once ordered quite a few people to be
killed by IRA terrorist attacks. Danny is less of a problem, given that he
left the IRA at a young age, but sometimes he seems too mild-mannered even
for boxing, much less terrorism.
Sheridan also runs into a structural problem in that none of the conflicts
in THE BOXER have easy solutions. (After all, if they did, Northern Ireland
might have had peace years ago.) He and co-writer George accordingly force
a "big confrontation" at the end which basically relies on McSorley's
character turning into a complete loose cannon. It solves the characters'
personal problems, but not the political conflicts that gave rise to them.
I'm not saying that the screenplay should have tried to solve the political
conflicts, as this would have been completely unrealistic, but this ending
just didn't seem to work: it was as if they were trying to fake dramatic
closure instead of simply acknowledging its impossibility.
Films that receive the three-star rating from me generally fall into two
categories: those that are only moderately ambitious in the first place and
just try to entertain for a little while (e.g. THE GAME or AUSTIN POWERS),
and those that have lofty goals and solid underlying ideas but don't quite
cross all the Ts and dot all the Is (e.g. GATTACA or THE END OF VIOLENCE).
THE BOXER is an example of the latter: the execution is sloppy in a few
places, but its heartfelt examination of the "Troubles" is enough to make
it a good film.

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
Martin Scorsese's KUNDUN, which chronicles roughly the first twenty years
of the life of the currently exiled Dalai Lama, has been criticized for its
lack of narrative structure. Personally, I don't think it needs one: it
works perfectly well as a study of Tibetan Buddhist culture and how
Communist China . Scorsese views the Dalai Lama the way many Tibetans
probably do, as a larger-than-life symbol of Buddhist spirituality and
political leadership: the only glimpses into his head come from several
interesting yet oblique dream sequences, but his portrayal is appropriate
for a film that concentrates on the political and spiritual rather than the
personal. The set design and cinematography are outstanding, and while
Scorsese occasionally seems to get carried away with the spectacle, it
helps to augment the cultural contrast when the Dalai Lama travels to China
to meet Chairman Mao. Political art sometimes succumbs to the temptation to
start shouting slogans, KUNDUN does not: it succeeds in delivering its
message in an artistically interesting way and without being overly
manipulative.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb (1964)
Dr. Strangelove, Or: How I Learned To Stop Worrying And Love The Bomb  * * * *
(out of four)
NR, 1963
Directed by Stanley Kubrick. Written by Stanley Kubrick, Peter George, and
Terry Southern.
Starring Peter Sellers, George C. Scott, Sterling Hayden, Slim Pickens. 
Well, I have to hand it to Stanley Kubrick: I never realized that nuclear war
could be so funny. His 1963 classic "Dr. Strangelove" is not only a pointed
satire of the Cold War but a hilariously entertaining black comedy as well.The
political implications of the film were scary back then, and are perhaps even
scarier today, when small-scale terrorist organizations have the chance to get
their hands on nuclear materials. But the way in which the nuclear disaster
unfolds is so comically bizarre that you can't help but laugh at the absurd
irony of the situation. 
The story, in a nutshell, is this: General Jack Ripper (Sterling Hayden) goes
insane and, convinced of a Communist conspiracy to pollute the American water
supply, invokes an obscure rule of protocol that essentially allows him to
order a full-scale nuclear attack on the Soviet Union and cuts off all
communication with the U.S. government. The bewildered President Merkin
Muffley (Peter Sellers) and his advisors are then left to try to obtain the
essential recall codes to call back the pilots, an objective made all the more
necessary by the revelation that the Soviets now possess a Doomsday Machine
which will set off enough nuclear warheads to wipe out the human race if their
country is hit by a single missile. 
As is often the case with stories revolving around political/military
intrigue, "Dr. Strangelove" alternates between several different settings and
groups of characters: the President, his advisors, and the Russian diplomats
in the War Room; Ripper and his second-in-command, Captain Lionel Mandrake
(Sellers again), at the army base as U.S. Army soldiers invade the base in
search of the recall codes; and a fighter plane piloted by a goofy commander
(Slim Pickens) who is determined to bomb something if it's the last thing he
ever does (literally). 
What makes "Dr. Strangelove" so much better than the typical political
thriller, however, is the way in which the humor reinforces rather than
undercuts the film's political commentary. The politicians, for example,
resemble a bunch of ineffectual quibbling socialites more than anything else.
President Muffley calls Soviet Premier Kissoff (who happens to be drunk),
explaining that General Ripper "went and did a very funny thing," then learns
about the Doomsday Machine, which Kissoff planned to announce the following
Monday ("He likes surprises," explains the Russian ambassador). No sooner does
he get off the phone to see the Russian ambassador about to get in a scuffle
with General Buck Turgidson (George C. Scott); he is, of course, outraged at
this scandalous behavior - "Gentlemen, you can't fight in here, this is the
War Room!" 
The Americans eventually manage to call back most of the attacking planes,
setting up the classic comedy-of-errors ending. No longer is the outcome
hinging on the efforts of the American soldiers to obtain the codes from
Ripper, or on those of the Soviet Air Force to intercept the American planes,
but on ridiculously trivial coincidences. Mandrake, for example, only manages
to relay the recall codes to the President after persuading Col. Bat Guano
(who is convinced that Mandrake is a dangerous "pre-vert") to shoot the lock
off of a soda machine in order to get some change to make a collect telephone
call ("That's private property!" Guano protests at first). In the end, the
battle boils down to whether or not Pickens, unaware that a recall order has
been issued, can manually open the malfunctioning bomb-bay doors so as to drop
the fatal nuclear missile on the Soviet mainland. 
These absurdities are strangely appropriate for the film's satirical content.
Somehow, it's scarier to imagine that the annihilation of the human race might
hinge on an insane general hell-bent on counteracting Communist "fluoridation"
of the water supply or on one pilot's struggle to get a door open than it is
to consider any of the more conventional scenarios by which a nuclear war
might start. Perhaps the greatest irony is that the Doomsday Machine, designed
as the ultimate anti-nuclear defense (because no one would dare launch a
nuclear attack and thus set it off), ends up causing destruction many times
worse than the calamity it was meant to prevent. 
"Dr. Strangelove," then, offers just as many sobering observations about human
nature and society as some of Kubrick's other films (such as "A Clockwork
Orange" and "Full Metal Jacket"), but it also has quite a bit of fun in doing
so. Pointedly observant, mischievously entertaining, and all-around brilliant,
this one is a true classic.
Visit my Film Reviews Page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
Scream  ***1/2  (out of four)
R, 1996
Directed by Wes Craven. Written by Kevin Williamson.
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette.
"Do you like scary movies?" asks an exaggeratedly sinister voice over the
telephone, and with that, "Scream" is off and running. The bizarre phone
conversation between this unnamed voice and Drew Barrymore continues as the
caller runs down horror movie cliches. ("I am one second away from calling the
police!" says Barrymore as the call takes a threatening turn. "But they never
get there in time," the caller responds coolly.) Finally, she is challenged to
play a  game in which she has to answer trivia questions about horror movies.
If she gets them right, she lives. If not, she dies.
Despite the gruesome conclusion that this scene eventually reaches, "Scream"
is really more of a camp sendup than anything else. What makes it work better
than most spoofs, and helps it to establish at least some amount of suspense,
is that the script is never quite aware of itself. It manages to pull this off
with the clever premise that the characters, mostly teenagers, are all
familiar with the traditions and cliches of horror movies. In the James Bond
parody "Austin Powers," for example, the villain purposely engages in the
action movie cliche of giving his captives an excessive amount of time to
escape. But he doesn't do this because he's been watching James Bond movies;
he does it because he's a character in a spoof. "Scream" pushes the envelope a
little farther, even going so far as to have one character insist, "But this
is real life, this isn't a movie!" while never giving the game away and
admitting that it is, in fact, a movie.
The main character in "Scream" is Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell), a high
school student who seems to be the killer's next intended victim after she
receives a similar phone call ("The question isn't, 'Who am I?' The question
is, 'WHERE . . . AM I?'") but escapes an assault by someone dressed in a
dopey-looking "ghost-face" costume with a black robe. Among the suspects are
her boyfriend Billy, his friend Stu, local horror film geek Randy, and her
father, who has gone missing. The combination works best in the second half of
the film, when many of the teenage characters gather at Stu's house for a
party and the killer makes an appearance.
Aside from the mystery, "Scream" boasts some moments of deranged comic
inspiration to rival many recent comedies. Some of the best lines come from
Randy, who is always at hand to offer observations about how the situation
parallels that of a particular horror movie (perhaps one of those "Wes
Carpenter flicks," as one girl speculates), or, in one of the best scenes, a
lecture about the rules that a character must follow to survive a horror
movie. (In case you're wondering - never have sex, never drink or do drugs,
and never, EVER, under any circumstances, say, "I'll be right back.")  Kevin
Williamson's script is also smart enough to toss in plenty of humor that is
not directly related to slasher films, such as the weird dialogue between two
characters on a Romantic Evening Walk. ("Do you know what constellation that
is up there?" "No, which one?" "I don't know, that's why I was asking you.")
"Scream" reminded me a lot of the 1985 film "Clue" in the way it developed as
a fun, irreverent mystery-comedy. The only problem is that director Wes
Craven, a horror veteran, seems to want this to be scarier than it actually
is. A few of the killer's attacks, especially the murder of Barrymore's
character, made for genuine suspense, but most were surrounded by so much
tongue-in-cheek dialogue that I was too busy laughing to be scared by
anything. There is some general suspense of the who-will-live and who-will-die
variety, but no more so than in any action thriller, and certainly none of the
cold-blooded fear that horror movies are (I guess) supposed to inspire.
There has been a lot of talk about "Scream" as a landmark for the horror
genre, but other than a few scenes and Craven's name in the credits, there
really isn't that much to qualify it as a horror movie - at least not an
especially good one, in any case. Fortunately, there's enough campy humor for
it to earn a well-deserved place as a cult classic, and one that, ironically
enough, will probably be watched by teenagers at parties for years to come.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
It's now become something of a standard operating procedure for reviewers
to describe A SIMPLE PLAN as "cold," "icy," or "chilling." At the risk of
indulging in a clich or seeming too overly cute (it's partly a reference
to the weather in the film), I'd have to say that all of those words would
be perfect descriptions for this unsettling morality tale about little
evils leading to big ones, as three men decide to engage in what seems like
a harmless white lie in a win-win situation.
A SIMPLE PLAN takes place in the wintry climate of rural Minnesota, where
people are few and far between, where the ground is covered with snow for
miles on end, and where there's enough open land that a small plane could
crash out in the woods without being discovered right away. That's exactly
what happens in this film, as Hank Mitchell (Bill Paxton), his brother
Jacob (Billy Bob Thornton), and their friend Lou (Brent Briscoe) go
traipsing through the wilderness after their dog. This particular airplane
has evidently been there for quite a while, and inside is not only the
long-dead pilot but a sack containing over four million dollars in cash.
Despite Hank's initial reluctance, they eventually decide to keep the money
themselves, rationalizing that it's probably illegal drug money and
agreeing to wait six months and then split it up if no one comes to claim
it.
Except, of course, that it's not as easy as that. Jacob makes a slip and
almost lets on to the local police chief that they know something about a
missing plane. Hank's wife Sarah (Bridget Fonda) gets involved and suggests
that they put some of the money back so as to deflect any possible
suspicion upon the plane's discovery. Somebody gets too close to finding
out what's happening and is promptly knocked unconscious by a paranoid
Jacob. The deceits and cover-ups escalate until finally one of the three
men finds himself in a situation in which he sees no other option than to
murder an elderly man lying helpless in the snow at his feet. Soon, the
shaky alliance between the three starts to crumble as they realize they
can't trust each other with their terrible secret. More dead bodies pile
up, and those left standing continue to bury themselves alive under an
accumulating heap of lies, guilt, and murder.
Director Sam Raimi and screenwriter Scott Smith put the audience right
where we probably don't want to be: that is to say, right there with the
three anti-heroes as they devise scheme after scheme to cover their tracks
and grow increasingly paranoid and violent. We hate what they're doing,
but, like it or not, we do identify with them and sense their desperation,
because at their roots, these three are not bad people. They're ordinary
people who did a bad thing and are trying to escape the consequences. The
first time one of them kills somebody, Raimi keeps the camera on his face
as he looks away from his victim: he's not a cold-blooded killer at heart,
and he doesn't want to think about what the morality of his desperate
split-second decision to destroy another human life. And neither do we, for
that matter: between this scene and several others, A SIMPLE PLAN had me
shrinking back in my seat from the implications of what was happening on
screen more than any other film in recent memory.
A SIMPLE PLAN takes a somewhat satirical view of the class divisions
between the somewhat successful Hank and the blue-collar, unemployed Jacob
and Lou. The latter two are the ones who first suggest keeping the money
and essentially bully Hank into silence when he protests that they should
take it to the police. Yet once things get out of control, Hank proves
himself to be far more capable of cold-hearted violence and manipulation
than the other two. Jacob, on the other hand, is more upset over the things
they've done and also realizes that he doesn't want to take the money and
go build a "well-to-do" life somewhere else: he wants to use it to buy
their father's farm and make a living for himself in his hometown.
While one could certainly find a "love of money is the root of all evil"
message in A SIMPLE PLAN, I think that the lesson Raimi and Smith are
pushing is a little more basic: they're trying to show us the trouble you
can get into from a lapse into spur-of-the-moment moral relativism. If I
did have to pick a philosophical clich to attach to this film, I think it
would be more like, "Every choice has a consequence." Or two, or three, or
ten, as the case may be. The title, of course, is a rather appropriate
irony, in that there is nothing the least bit "simple" about the elaborate
deceptions and cover-ups in which the characters eventually find themselves
caught up.
It would be easy to "Hollywood-ize" a story like this, either by staging a
violent action climax in which the wrong-doers get their comeuppance or by
turning it into an amoral dark comedy caper. Fortunately, the filmmakers
are smart enough to see this story through to the end on its own terms. In
fact, the possibility of exposure and imprisonment is only of secondary
concern here. Instead, Raimi and Smith focus on the psychological and
spiritual damage to those who have participated in these schemes, as the
characters grow to despise what they've become to the point that one of
them literally cannot live with himself any more. This is a wise artistic
choice that actually strengthens A SIMPLE PLAN as a cautionary tale: it
seems to say that getting caught is almost irrelevant, because in the end,
your conscience will inflict due "punishment" for your misdeeds.
A SIMPLE PLAN is not the kind of film that is always especially "fun" to
watch, nor should it be. It does, however, feature some of the best
character-writing of the year, and it provides an insightful and probably
all too truthful look at the self-serving side of the human psyche. This
one probably won't be raking in a fortune at the box office, and it will
probably be mostly overlooked when it comes to the award ceremonies, but
Raimi and Scott can and should be proud of having made a film as unusually
(and unsettlingly) honest as this one.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
I must admit that I was a tad skeptical of "Good Will Hunting", based both on
the previews and the first fifteen minutes of the film, in which the main
character Will Hunting (Matt Damon), an MIT janitor in his early twenties, is
discovered to be an Einstein-level closet genius when he solves two
extraordinarily difficult math problems overnight. The only problem is that
Will is a tough street kid who's had his share of run-ins with the law, and
before long he's being hauled in for assault after a parking lot fight.
Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard), who had brought up the math problems in
his lectures, tracks him down and strikes a deal with the police: Will is to
be released, provided he works with Lambeau on his math research regularly and
attends therapy sessions. 
This sounds like the formula for mildly charming fluff, but "Good Will
Hunting" rises above its fairly mundane premise to deliver a poignant and
clever drama. A conflict gradually emerges between Lambeau and Will's
therapist Sean McGuire (Robin Williams) - Lambeau wants to get Will to use his
brain, while Sean wants him to listen to his heart, both of which he has been
largely neglecting. Will finds that the former is much easier than the latter,
so much so, in fact, that he gets bored with it and grows increasingly
resistant to Lambeau's attempts to recruit him into the academic lifestyle. He
also has his share of problems with his girlfriend Skylar (Minnie Driver), an
MIT student who is moving to California at the end of the school year and
would like a reluctant Will to come with her. 
What makes "Good Will Hunting" work so well, aside from the strong
performances (especially from Damon and Williams), is the depth of
characterization and the representation of the conflicts in Will's life. The
script's sympathies seem to lie more with Sean McGuire than with Lambeau, but
neither of them is presented as completely right or wrong. Lambeau, while he
may seem a little cold at times, is still written well enough that we like him
as a character even when we're not sure if we like what he has to say. And
Sean, for all his warm-heartedness, has, as Lambeau and later Will point out,
not lived up to his full intellectual potential either; the therapy sessions
turn out to be just as revelatory for Sean as they do for Will. 
Will's reaction to this situation, and the way in which he slowly becomes more
receptive to Skylar and to Sean, is presented in a believable fashion and in a
way that forces the audience to consider all the characters' opinions, rather
than setting up an obvious "right" and "wrong" side and beating them over the
head with it. For a film with such an extraordinary character, "Good Will
Hunting" presents itself as remarkably ordinary; it achieves the difficult
task of making the next Albert Einstein into an Everyman, a character to whom
the audience can easily relate and who must make choices similar to those that
almost everyone faces at one time or another. This film gives us real drama
when it so easily could have given us merely melodrama, by having the
government kidnap Will to use him in covert spy missions or introducing some
other equally far-fetched situation. 
"Good Will Hunting" also has its share of fun humor, such as when Will, in an
early therapy session, pretends to be hypnotized and smoothly parodies the
alien abduction scenarios that have become so well known in popular culture.
And in the one scene in which government agents do in fact appear, Will blows
them off with a hilariously scathing accusation of human rights violations in
Africa. Will's relationship with his friends, most notably Chucky (Ben
Affleck), is usually rather amusing, if somewhat crude (the film has 100+ uses
of the 'f' word, which was most likely the reason for its R-rating), and lends
itself well to the development of Will's character. 
Add all this to the fact that "Good Will Hunting" even manages to pull off an
uplifting happy ending without getting excessively sentimental, and you might
be wondering why I haven't given this film four stars. Well, for one thing, no
matter how well Damon and Affleck, who wrote the screenplay, and director Gus
Van Sant pull it off, the story is still rather contrived and not particularly
original. There are also a few scenes that did feel a bit formulaic, including
one that was supposed to be emotional but really just seemed like the
Obligatory Crying Scene for any movie involving therapy sessions. Still, "Good
Will Hunting" takes its premise a lot farther than I thought it would, and is
definitely one of the better personal dramas I have seen in the last few
years, and as of right now it stands as one of the top five on my list of '97
films. 

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
I think it's pretty safe to say that few films nowadays feature an
isolated, obsessed math whiz as a lead character, and even fewer put such a
character in a suspense film in which theoretical mathematics and Jewish
mysticism figure prominently into the plot. Darren Aronofsky, in his
feature-film debut PI, does both, crafting a surreal psychological thriller
of considerable intelligence that examines the paper-thin line between
genius and insanity.
The main character of PI is Max Cohen (Sean Gullette), a recent college
graduate who seems to have turned his apartment into a theoretical
mathematics laboratory. Complex computer machinery is everywhere, set up by
Max to perform calculations designed to predict the performance of the
stock market. Max believes that literally everything can be explained by
distinct mathematical patterns, and it is his ambition to discover them. He
is extremely private and not very friendly: when someone knocks at the
door, he usually looks out the peephole and pretends not to be home until
they go away. He is also beset by cluster headaches, for which he is
constantly popping pills and self-administering steroid injections, in
quick, mechanical motions that seem to have become disturbingly routine.
Lately, his headaches have become harder to control, occasionally causing
him to pass out and experience strange nightmares that are not too
different from his everyday life.
Part of Aronofsky's achievement in PI is the filming technique he uses to
get the audience to identify with Max, who would probably be played as a
one-dimensional arrogant jerk by most filmmakers. The film is shot in a
grainy black and white, and its soundtrack is full of ominous buzzes and
whirrs. The cutting is often rapid, with the film sometimes sped up during
Max's narration in which he states his theories about nature and
mathematical patterns. There are also numerous close-ups on the machinery
in Max's apartment and on complex number charts. The total effect of all
this is to make the film seem like a cross between an old "Outer
Limits" episode and a "Nova" special, and the audience is swept up in the
sense that Max might really be close to some amazing discovery and isn't
just some insane crackpot.
Max's already strange lifestyle takes a turn for the stranger when his
program suddenly locks up and spits out a 216-digit number. Soon
afterwards, he finds himself being pursued both by Jewish Cabalists, who
think the number might be the numerical equivalent of the ancient Hebrew
name of God, and by Wall Street types who think Max may have actually found
the mysterious pattern in the stock market. Max, reflecting on the fact
that there are some mathematical patterns which are known to have curious
applications in nature, decides that he may well be onto something and goes
after it with increasing rigor, all the while becoming more paranoid as the
audience is left to wonder which of the on-screen events are real and which
are delusional fantasy.
The problem, of course, is that once you get into such strange notions as
trying to find a single pattern to the entire universe, the line between
scientific breakthrough and delusional fantasy becomes increasingly hard to
draw, and this more than anything else is the central concern of the film
and the message underlying Max's descent into obsession and paranoia. As
Max's former professor (Mark Margolis) points out, it isn't hard to pick a
pattern--any pattern--and decide you're finding it everywhere you look. And
if Max may be prone to delusion, then what of the investors and the
Cabalists? Are they visionaries on the verge of an earth-shattering
discovery, or are they just hacks whose pursuit of knowledge has spun out
of control?
PI eventually makes its way to an ending that, while effective on a
symbolic level, seemed a little hasty and dramatically incomplete. But
overall, I would have to say that PI is one of the more uniquely satisfying
experiences I've had at the movies lately: it's fascinating to watch, and
leaves the audience with ample food for thought (I'm pretty sure this is
the first time I've come out of a movie wanting to do research on Jewish
mysticism). It's a remarkable debut for Aronofsky, and personally I can't
wait to see what he does next.

Title
Review for Dead Man (1995)
Dead Man (R, 1996)
Directed and written by Jim Jarmusch.
Starring Johnny Depp, Gary Farmer, Lance Henriksen.
        Jim Jarmusch's Dead Man  is an alternately haunting and hilarious film
that follows one man, a meek accountant named William Blake (Johnny Depp), as
he travels to the Western town of Machine to accept employment and quickly
finds himself in the middle of a dangerous and increasingly out-of-control
situation. The film looks a lot like a Western picture, but it possesses a
dreamlike, hallucinatory feeling that often lets the audience wonder what is
"really happening." From the opening moments of the film, in which the camera
fades in and out on Blake's train to the twangy chords of Neil Young, it is
clear that something is not quite right, and when a quirky stranger (Crispin
Glover) approaches Blake to warn him against going through with his trip to
Machine because "you might find your grave" there, we have a feeling he may be right.
        Blake doesn't listen, however, and lo and behold, he finds that his
promised position as an accountant has been taken. With almost no money left,
he spends the night with a local woman, only to be discovered with her by an
ex-boyfriend. A gunfight ensues, although, as in many of the gunfights in this
film, it appears that none of the characters involved actually know how to use
a gun. The woman's ex-boyfriend, shot by Blake in self-defense, turns out to
be the son of the wealthiest man in town. He quickly sends three hired killers
after Blake, who has escaped but is seriously wounded. From then on, the film
follows Blake as he and a Native American who calls himself Nobody (Gary
Farmer) try to outrun the killers, but the film retains its dreamy atmosphere
to the end and usually seems more like a nature walk than an old-fashioned
Western chase.
        More bizarre episodes ensue, including several more awkward gunfights,
a confrontation with three lowlifes who have an interesting take on the old
story of Goldilocks and the Three Bears, and an odd running joke in which
Blake is asked by almost every single character if he has any tobacco. Also
recurring throughout the film are numerous references to the work of the
famous poet William Blake, for whom Depp's character is at first mistaken by
Nobody, and to ideas of Native American spirituality. And although it tiptoes
to a vague and inconclusive ending, Dead Man  never seems arbitrary or
manipulative; the ending may not be typical Hollywood material, but it feels
appropriate within this film's aesthetic. 
        All of this makes Dead Man  an enjoyable viewing experience as a
quirky, off-beat take on the Old West. Yet as with all such "art films," there
is the issue of whether or not there is a deeper meaning to be found, and on
this point the film is perhaps a bit too elusive. One popular interpretation
is that Blake is in fact a "dead man" from very early on, perhaps after the
initial confontation in Machine. But if that is the case, the film offers few
clues as to what exactly the events in the rest of the film are meant to
symbolize. The William Blake references and Native American spiritual concepts
are interesting, but they never quite tie together into a single, coherent
idea. Jim Jarmusch has a reputation as a very literate director, and perhaps
he wants us to do our own homework based on what he has given us here, but if
that's the case, he hasn't given us much to start from.
        Yet with a film as subtle and skillfully directed as this, I cannot
help but think that Dead Man  might have lost some of its dreamy, mysterious
atmosphere had it declared itself more clearly. While it doesn't quite hit the
mark as an intellectual experience, it does at least succeed in echoing the
haunting spirit of the romantic ideas that it references. And as a cinematic
experience of mood, style, and imagery, it is no less than remarkable.
Grade: A

Title
Review for Edward Scissorhands (1990)
Tim Burton's EDWARD SCISSORHANDS is a cinematic fairy tale, a flight of
fancy that sails on the wings of Burton's vivid imagination, and yet it
still bears implications upon the real world. It's a film which is narrated
in flashback to a little boy's question about where snow comes from. It's a
film in which the protagonist, a boy named Edward (Johnny Depp), was
invented by a strange scientist living in a castle (Vincent Price) and is
eventually discovered still living there, many years after the scientist's
death, by none other than the Avon lady. And yet it's also a film in which
the fundamental conflicts and relationships are the same ones that we find
right next door.
Burton's films have generally met with mixed reaction among both critics
and the general public. Even his less-than-stellar efforts, however, are
infused with a unique and remarkable visual style that sets him apart among
modern filmmakers. EDWARD SCISSORHANDS is no exception, as Burton creates
both an unnervingly bright and colorful suburbia that is somehow
intimidating in its cheerfulness and a majestically constructed Gothic
castle that has been Edward's home. Composer Danny Elfman supplies the film
with a score that is appropriately both whimsical and sad, a perfect fit
for this warm-hearted but ultimately tragic tale of an outsider trying to
find his place among "normal" people.
The aesthetics of EDWARD SCISSORHANDS place it definitively within a
fantasy universe. This is a good thing, because otherwise viewers might ask
questions such as why no one aside from the Avon lady ever wanted to have a
look inside the mysterious castle sitting at the end of Main Street, or
what kind of scientist could create a an otherwise perfectly functional
human being but not be able to get the hands right, or why on earth he gave
Edward scissors  as a replacement until he figured it out. In any case, the
Avon lady decides to bring Edward out of his lonely castle and into her
home. At first, he's a sensation: all the neighbors come to visit the
family and see the strange boy who can perform tricks such as sculpting the
bushes into fantastic sculptures. All too quickly, however, he is
unwittingly dragged into a robbery by the Avon lady's daughter Kim (Winona
Ryder) and then incurs the wrath of her jealous boyfriend when she starts
to fall in love with Edward. Prejudices take over, and Edward comes to be
seen not as the kind-hearted but easily confused individual that he is, but
as a dangerous monster who must be driven out of their community.
It would be easy to see Edward as nothing more than a generic freak, a foil
for an "it's okay to be different" message. I think that Burton and his
screenwriter, Caroline Thompson, intend for Edward to serve as a metaphor
for something a little more specific: the naive, socially inept artist. He
is liked and admired when he's performing elaborate tricks for an audience,
but few if any of them care about him as a person: he's just another
novelty for them to enjoy. He is easily manipulated, and ends up being the
fall guy for a crime which he barely understands simply because a beautiful
young woman whom he trusts asked for his help. Worst of all, his attempts
to fit in and help others often go wrong, provoking further anger and
alienation, in his case because he has a tendency to literally cut things
up by accident when he gets confused and uneasy.
There are quite a few clichs in EDWARD SCISSORHANDS, though not all of
them detract from the story. There is almost no development of the romance
between Edward and Kim, but the film gets away with this due to its fairy
tale format. Even Kim's mean-spirited boyfriend, a cardboard cut-out from
the Book of Evil Teenage Movie Characters, manages not to irritate for the
most part. Still, the film would have been fine without a duel to the death
at high altitude. There are also a couple of the townspeople who are just a
little too over the top, such as the Bible-thumping fundamentalist who is
convinced that Edward is a demon and the seductive hair stylist who finds
Edward attractive.
In the end, however, the film's good qualities are enough to carry it past
any mistakes. Imaginative, clever, and strangely touching, EDWARD
SCISSORHANDS stands as a high point of Burton's career.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Archive:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
With the exception of their surrealistic satire Barton Fink, the films of Joel
and Ethan Coen fit into two broad categories: quirky and sometimes darkly
humorous takes on the "film noir" genre in which crime schemes go wrong and
spin increasingly out of control (FARGO, MILLER's CROSSING, BLOOD SIMPLE), and
off-the-wall comedies centered around an eccentric, scatter-brained lead
character (RAISING ARIZONA, THE HUDSUCKER PROXY). Their latest offering, THE
BIG LEBOWSKI, falls within the latter category, though there are elements of
the crime-gone-wrong theme and even a touch of satire to be found in this
film. The main difference, however, is that while the protagonists of RAISING
ARIZONA and THE HUDSUCKER PROXY had lofty aspirations and ideals but didn't
quite have the brains to get it all together, the main character of THE BIG
LEBOWSKI seems like a fairly intelligent guy who's wise to the world, but he
doesn't really want to do much of anything besides go bowling, smoke pot, and
generally relax. 
That main character is Jeffrey "The Dude" Lebowski (Jeff Bridges), introduced
by the film's rambling narrator (Sam Elliott) as "quite possibly the laziest
man in Los Angeles county." The Dude is unemployed, needless to say, and
spends most of his time at the bowling alley with his two best friends, Walter
(John Goodman), a borderline-psychotic who's in the habit of pulling a gun
when he thinks somebody's cheating in a bowling match ("Has the whole world
gone CRAZY?!" he shouts at a suspected cheater), and Donny (Steve Buscemi),
who's always a few steps behind the conversation and is constantly berated by
Walter for it ("Donny, you have no frame of reference here!"). These three
seem to more or less live for bowling tournaments, and as the film begins they
are anticipating an important match with rival bowler Jesus Quintana (John
Turturro), who, when we first meet him, is doing a dance in the bowling lane
to accompany a Spanish version of "Hotel California" and, if it's possible,
seems to be even more of a head case than Walter. 
If that doesn't give you a good idea of this film's absurdist tone, then
perhaps this will: the entire scenario which drives the story is set in motion
by two thugs mistakenly urinating on the Dude's rug. They've mistaken him for
a millionaire of the same name who is also known as the "Big" Lebowski (David
Huddleston) and whose nymphomaniac wife Bunny (Tara Reid) owes money to porn
producer Jackie Treehorn (Ben Gazzara). The Dude goes to the Big Lebowski
seeking compensation for his ruined rug; he doesn't have any luck, but when
Bunny is apparently kidnapped, the elder Lebowski asks him to deliver the $1
million ransom. 
Unfortunately, Walter gets involved and fouls up the drop-off, and before they
can try again to get the money to the supposed kidnappers, the Dude's car gets
stolen, along with the briefcase containing the money. Soon, the Dude is being
harassed not only by the Big Lebowski himself but also by Treehorn and by a
group of German "nihilists" who demand the ransom money even though they may
not have been involved in the kidnapping in the first place; the Dude and
Walter suspect that Bunny may well have kidnapped herself in order to extort
money from her husband to repay her debts to Treehorn. Meanwhile, the Big
Lebowski's daughter Maude (Julianne Moore), a feminist avant-garde artist who
likes to make grand entrances swinging through the air naked, wants to recover
the money for her family. 
The plot, however, is really just a vehicle for all these bizarre characters
to run wild and wreak their own unique forms of havoc. The previews for THE
BIG LEBOWSKI feature Creedence Clearwater Revival's "Run Through The Jungle,"
and it fits: the Coens see Los Angeles as a veritable jungle of oddballs and
nutcases, with the sometimes bewildered Dude left to run through it and try to
avoid any more trouble (usually unsuccessfully). The film doesn't feature
quite as many one-liners and sight gags as the Coens' other comedies (though
there are a few hilarious moments of visual humor, particularly in the Dude's
dream sequences and acid flashbacks), but it more than makes up for it with
the sheer fun of watching these strange characters interact. The film
sometimes seems a little disjointed as a result - you get the feeling that the
Coens have not only set their characters loose in this "jungle" but are also
themselves running crazy through the jungle of their own twisted imaginations
- but for the most part the characterizations are interesting enough to
overcome the shaky plotting and what turns out to be a somewhat anticlimactic
resolution. 
There's also a noticeable (but not too heavy-handed) thread of social
commentary in THE BIG LEBOWSKI, which, incidentally, takes place just as the
Gulf War is about to begin; at the beginning, we see George Bush on television
making his "This aggression will not stand" speech. The Coens take aim at just
about every elite L.A. subculture in the book: the egotistical wealthy
businessman ("The bums will always lose!" shouts the Big Lebowski at one
point), the porn industry, the overbearing Malibu policeman who berates the
Dude for disturbing their "peaceful beach community," and so on. By the end,
we really start to admire the Dude, who almost certainly harbors the least
"aggression" of anyone in this story; his passive resistance (emphasis on
"passive," albeit) to the elite emerges as something more than just another
quirky characterization in a film overflowing with quirky characters. He also
turns out to have a pretty well-functioning brain in his head, even if he
doesn't like to use it very much; his sarcasm towards Treehorn and the Malibu
policeman shows that he knows when he's getting a run around, and he does
manage to unravel the kidnapping mystery by the end. 
The Coens certainly poke fun at the Dude for his laziness, but they don't just
treat him as fodder for cheap shots either. I think that, more than anything,
is what makes THE BIG LEBOWSKI a standout comedy: it manages to approach
characters like the Dude and, to some extent, Walter, with genuine affection
while still acknowledging that they are pretty scatter-brained. Audience
members may find themselves surprised at how much they like the un-dynamic duo
by the end of the movie, given that they seemed like nothing more than the
butts of an extended joke at first. "It's good knowin' he's out there, the
Dude, takin' it easy," posits the narrator towards the end. I dare say that
truer words have seldom been spoken.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
DARK CITY
Rating: *** (out of four)
R, 1998
Directed by Alex Proyas. Written by Proyas, Lem Dobbs, and David S. Goyer.
Starring Rufus Sewell, Kiefer Sutherland, Jennifer Connelly, William Hurt. 
DARK CITY certainly boasts one of the more interesting premises of any recent
science fiction movie: a race of powerful aliens, in an attempt to discover
what constitutes the human soul, abduct a group of people and take them to an
artificially constructed "city." Every time it turns midnight, they are all
put to "sleep" while their memories are extracted, mixed, and redistributed;
meanwhile, the city itself is redone completely as entire buildings appear and
disappear through the aliens' "tuning," the term they use for their
manipulations of physical reality. They wake up in new places with new
memories and personal histories. Assisting them in these experiments is Dr.
Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland), a human scientist who helps the aliens as they
search for any indication that someone's individual essence might withstand
the constant brain-scrambling. 
As DARK CITY begins, we learn that something has just gone wrong with the
aliens' experiment. John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) has had his memory wiped as
expected, but the implantation of new memories seems to have failed. He is
left with no identity and, more importantly, no idea what he's doing in a
hotel room with the bloody corpse of a dead prostitute. Before long, both the
"police" that the aliens have brought to the city as well as the aliens
themselves are after him as he tries to figure out who he is and whether or
not he is responsible for the woman's murder. Along the way, the aliens
discover that he is able to "tune" in the same way that they can and begin to
think that he may be the answer to their questions about human individuality.
It's an idea that occurs to the audience as well, as Murdoch does seem to
retain a certain high moral character despite the memory loss; as the
sympathetic Police Inspector Bumstead (William Hurt) notes, he doesn't seem
like a murderer, whatever the evidence against him. 
Writer/director Proyas does a wonderful job in creating the experimental city:
it is a place filled with towering skyscrapers, dark alleys, and ugly yellow
and neon-green interiors. The sun never rises (literally, since the aliens
can't stand the light), leaving everyone trapped in what seems like perpetual
and unabated gloom. It is perhaps fortunate for the human subjects that the
aliens reset everyone's memory after a day; I have no doubt that I would lose
my mind after consciously spending more than about a week in this place. This
nightmarish atmosphere is perfectly suited to the story, immersing the
audience in the same sense of paranoia that Murdoch feels as he tries to
convince himself of his own innocence and seeks the sympathy of his supposed
wife (Jennifer Connelly) and Bumstead. Proyas adds plenty of clever touches to
add to Murdoch's frustration as he looks for answers. At one point, for
example, he asks someone what train will take him out of the city, to which
the person responds, "You want the express." He waits for the express, only to
see it fly past him without stopping; when he asks another bystander why it
didn't stop, the man casually explains, "That's the express." 
Unfortunately, DARK CITY is weakened by a rushed and incomplete ending that
ignores a major plot element (and in a way that lends itself to truly eerie
implications - see below for spoilers) as Proyas, like any sensible Hollywood
director, decides that since he's put together these impressive sets and
visual designs, he might as well blow them up before he's finished. In the
process, he leaves us with quite a few lingering questions. Do *all* humans
have a "soul" to speak of, or just Murdoch (since he can "tune") and the other
few who are able to resist the aliens? Why are the aliens so sloppy with their
experiment as to leave everyone with only vague and confused understandings of
their present situation - didn't they realize people would get antsy when they
couldn't even figure out how to leave the city? Why do all of them have names
like "Mr. Hand", "Mr. Book", and "Mr. Quick"? Why did they design the city
like something out of a 1940s noir film? And if they're advanced enough to
manipulate physical reality, couldn't they have found some way around their
intolerance of light and thus avoided another dead giveaway for anyone who got
suspicious? 
The answer for some of these questions, of course, is probably that Proyas
shares the fascination of several of his contemporaries, such as Tim Burton,
with this Gothic comic-book atmosphere and visual design. (If that's the case,
however, he could have taken lessons from Burton, who in the BATMAN films
managed to create unease and dread even in broad daylight, and solved at least
one of his plot holes.) That's not to say that these dark, gloomy images are
wasted: they come through with a definite visceral power that puts DARK CITY
only one shelf below Terry Gilliam's BRAZIL and David Lynch's LOST HIGHWAY in
the library of Psychologically Disturbing Films. But unlike those films, which
rested on a subjective, mind's-eye viewpoint, DARK CITY seems to have
underlying explanations which, while they may be science fiction, fit into the
framework of linear narrative. Once Proyas has chosen this expository
technique, the narrative demands that he follow through on it completely, and
he doesn't. 
Proyas seems to have quite a gift for haunting, atmospheric filmmaking; the
visual design and direction in DARK CITY are second to none. Perhaps once he
finds a top-notch screenplay, he will join the ranks of Burton, Gilliam, and
others as a first-rate fantasy filmmaker. Until then, DARK CITY still holds
its own as a refreshingly bizarre and original film that is sure to please
fans of science fiction or of psychological thrillers. 
- - - -SPOILER WARNING (Do not read further unless you want the ending and
other plot points revealed)- - - - 
Perhaps the biggest problem with DARK CITY is the final sequence in which
Murdoch has gained control over the aliens' technology and uses it to
re-"tune" the city so that now there is daylight, people can leave the city
and go to the beach, etc. Isn't he even going to *try* to pilot the city,
which has turned out to be a spaceship, back to Earth? What about recovering
everyone's original memory? Schreber apparently couldn't do this, but
presumably the aliens kept records of who everyone was before all this
started, or else they flunked high school lab science on their home planet. It
would have been fine for the screenplay to address these questions at the end
but not answer them, but instead it ignores them altogether. 
Moreover, is this really a "happy" ending, as its upbeat tone seems to
suggest? If it is, it potentially subverts whatever message the film was
trying to convey. No one else but Murdoch seems to know what's happened. Is
everything OK simply because the mutable city is now in the hands of a
supposedly more benevolent overlord, i.e. Murdoch? Seems to me like we're
right back where we started - a group of alien abductees is trapped in an
artificial reality controlled by a powerful being with the ability to "tune"
reality. Now, I don't really think this was Proyas's intention, but he should
have been more careful. 

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
Fargo  * * * 1/2 (out of four)
R, 1996
Directed by Joel Coen. Written by Joel and Ethan Coen.
Starring Frances McDormand, William Macy, Steve Buscemi, Peter Stormare.
As the Coens' "Fargo"  begins, shifty Minneapolis car salesman Jerry
Lundegaard (William Macy) drives down a snow-bound road to a bar in Fargo,
North Dakota, where he meets two thugs-for-hire, Carl Showalter (Steve
Buscemi) and Gaear Grimsrud (Peter Stormare). He has a rather unique
proposition for them; they are to kidnap his wife and demand $80,000 in ransom
from her wealthy father, then split the ransom money with Jerry. What is
instantly clear, however, is that, as well as being generally unsavory types,
Showalter and Grimsrud are dumber than a box of rocks and probably should not
be trusted with Jerry's laundry, much less his wife. Between that and the fact
that "Fargo" is the latest from Joel and Ethan Coen, who brought us "Blood
Simple" and "Raising Arizona," among others, it's a pretty safe bet from then
on that things are going to go haywire. Pretty soon, the very pregnant Sheriff
Marge Gunderson (Frances McDormand) of Brainerd, Minnesota is being called in
to investigate a triple homicide on an isolated highway and Jerry's
scatter-brained scheme is going hopelessly awry.
Yet "Fargo" is more than just a crime/suspense thriller. It is "about" this
kidnapping scheme, but it is about a lot of other things too. It is about
Northern accents and expressions like "you betcha." It is about ice on the
windshield and large quantities of snow. Most importantly, it is about how a
laid-back community of Northern Midwesterners come face-to-face with
cold-blooded evil in the persons of Showalter and Grimsrud, and how they deal
with it in their typically laid-back, golly-gee-whiz (or in this case, "oh
yah, yer darn-tootin'!"), easy-going way. McDormand herself has described it
as "miles and miles of pure white snow, splattered with red blood." 
Stylistically, "Fargo" occupies a middle ground between "Blood Simple" and
"Raising Arizona," it has both the disturbing violence of the former and the
wacky humor of the latter. Sometimes it even has both at once, such as when
Jerry finds a piece of Showalter's handywork in the form of a dead parking lot
clerk and mutters, "Oh jeez" with all the animation of someone who just
stubbed his toe. The kidnapping scene itself is a similar mix; Mrs. Lundegard
and Showalter stare curiously at each other through the window for a good
thirty seconds before the two thugs break in, and later, when she bites
Grimsrud's hand in attempt to escape, he goes upstairs to clean himself up in
the family's bathroom, leaving Showalter to chase her. The Coens do not make
the mistake of laughing off the violence entirely, however; the scene in which
Grimsrud hunts down two witnesses and kills them execution-style, for example,
is unabatedly vicious and brutal.
"Fargo" is sometimes black-comic and sometimes just plain black, but there is
plenty of good-natured humor as well, most of it deriving from the quirks of
the local culture and the charm of McDormand's character. "Oh, for Pete's
sake, he's fleein' the interview!" she exclaims at one point when a suspect
eludes her during an interrogation. Not only is she instantly likeable and
intelligent, she is also remarkably hardy and persistent for a woman seven
months pregnant. When she arrives at the initial crime scene, for example,
beset with morning sickness, she excuses herself momentarily to vomit, then
returns and promptly gets back to her job. The locals, meanwhile, are featured
in several scenes in which witnesses call the police with long-winded, banal
stories but can only describe Showalter as "a little fella, kinda
funny-lookin'." The interaction between Showalter and Grimsrud is also quite
amusing at times, such as when Showalter, frustrated by Grimsrud's lack of
interest in coversation, delivers a thoroughly un-silent monologue about how
"two can play at that game, buddy," and how he is going to be completely
[bleeping] silent.
The Coens claim (falsely) at the start that "Fargo" is based on a true story,
and they do take something of a documentary approach, allowing themselves to
go off on minor tangents about the various characters rather than sticking to
a carefully defined suspense-movie plot structure. This is a good idea, as the
characters and the regional culture are really the most interesting thing
about the film, but at times the Coens stretch it a little too far. A brief
segment in the middle when everyone involved seems to be more or less
twittling their thumbs is still a little out of place in a kidnapping story,
however loosely structured it may be. The duo also leave what is at least a
minor plot thread dangling, which is a surprise given how meticulous they
normally are in crafting their stories and the supposed "true-to-life" aspect
of the film.
Those who have hailed "Fargo" as the Coens' masterpiece are, I think,
overstating their case a little bit: it doesn't quite match up to the
unnerving surrealism of "Barton Fink" or the madcap comedy of "The Hudsucker
Proxy" and "Raising Arizona." Still, it is one of the better and more original
crime dramas of the past few years, and well worth seeing.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Ed Wood (1994)
Ed Wood (R, 1994)
Directed by Tim Burton. Written by Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski.
Starring Johnny Depp, Martin Landau, Sarah Jessica Parker, Patricia Arquette.
        Ed Wood  has been billed as a comedy, and its material certainly seems
like the perfect material for laughs. After all, this is the story of Ed Wood,
the universally acclaimed Worst Director of All Time and the man responsible
for the cinematic disasters Glen or Glenda?  and Plan 9 From Outer Space ,
among others. But when I heard that the film was directed by Tim Burton, who
has a reputation for championing the lonely outsider in films such as Edward
Scissorhands  and Batman,  I thought that it really might be something else.
Maybe this movie would actually show us Ed Wood as a human being rather than a
caricature, the Ed Wood that was determined to make movies and to make them
his way, the Ed Wood that was blissfully unaware of his own lack of talent.
        And indeed it did. That's not to say that the film isn't funny, which
it certainly is. But it's more than that: Wood, played here by Johnny Depp,
ultimately emerges as a sympathetic character. This is not because the film
waters down Wood's lack of talent; the script devotes considerable attention
to the making of Glen or Glenda?, Bride of the Monster,  and of course Plan 9 
 and does not attempt to portray them as anything other than scatterbrained
nonsense. Nor does it apologize for him by suggesting that it wasn't really
his fault that his movies were bad; in fact, his sponsors try to interfere and
bring some sense to Plan 9,  but he refuses to listen to their suggestions.
        Yet Wood comes across as a likeable human being. He is certainly
dedicated and enthusiastic about his profession, however incompetent he may
be. And if the film is historically accurate, he was one of the few true
friends that actor Bela Lugosi (Martin Landau) had in the last years of his
lonely, drug-addicted existence. Wood, Lugosi, and the others involved in
Wood's films, most of them occupying the fringes of society (Wood himself was
a known transvestite), may have been dismal failures in terms of the quality
of the movies they made, but Burton portrays their cinematic misadventures
with an odd romantic touch that makes it hard not to admire their
perseverance. Wood's relationship with his girlfriend and later wife Kathy
Johnson (Patricia Arquette) is treated much the same way; their idea of a
romantic evening seems to be sitting on the couch reading a book about space
invaders from Mars, but their goofy innocence is admired much more than it is
mocked. Near the end of the film, when Wood firmly tells his sponsors that
their suggestions for Plan 9 From Outer Space  would not be needed, I actually
found myself cheering for him as he and his crew managed to realize the
project in all its stupidity.
        What Burton and screenwriters Alexander and Karaszewski seem to be
saying is that yes, of course Ed Wood was a nut, but if all this silliness
made some sense to him and those around him at the time, then maybe everyone
else should at the very least leave him alone. This is certainly an
understandable sentiment from Burton; when a movie mogul chews Wood out for
playing Glen or Glenda?  as an (albeit mishandled) attempt at social
commentary rather than the sensationalist exploitation flick that he wanted, I
cannot help but think of those who slammed Burton for making Batman Returns 
into a dark, psychologically unsettling film rather than the campy superhero
movie that was expected. Ed Wood  does not have the visual flash of Burton's
other work (it is shot in black and white), but at the same time it is
probably his best and most personal film. They are light-years apart in terms
of talent, of course, but in a way I can see Tim Burton and Ed Wood as kindred
spirits: two filmmakers determined to do things their own way, regardless of
the pressure from above.
        Burton and his writers are making a pretty extreme statement in Ed
Wood -that nothing, not even lack of talent, should stand in the way of
dedication and honesty when it comes to art. Whether you agree or not, this
film is probably just about the best argument there is for such a position.
Along with the Coens' Barton Fink, Ed Wood is one of the most off-beat, and
one of the best, films to tackle the entertainment industry in recent years.

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
"My name is H.I. McDonough. You can call me Hi," drawls Nicolas Cage, and with
that, Joel and Ethan Coen's "Raising Arizona" is off and running with the
deranged inspiration of a tall tale. Hi, a dimwitted but surprisingly eloquent
convenience store thief, is the perfect narrator for this tale of love and
kidnapping, rural Arizona-style, delivering his "observations" with all the
weight of a Shakespearean monologue. After several rounds in the slammer, Hi
finally marries his true love, a police officer and prison photographer named
Ed (Holly Hunter) for whom he has been carryinga torch ever since she first
took his mug shots - "the day I'll never forget," as he fondly remembers it. 
Unfortunately, they soon discover that Ed is infertile, and their inability to
have children puts the strains on their marriage ("I even found myself driving
past convenience stores . . . that weren't on the way home," Hi reflects
somberly). The adoption agencies aren't too impressed with Hi's criminal past,
so the two come up with a unique solution. A wealthy family has recently had
quintuplets, so they'll just steal one of theirs - after all, four ought to be
enough for them, right? After Hi somehow manages to make away with one of them
despite starting what is probably the best approximation of a riot that
two-week-olds can manage, the movie follows Hi and Ed as they try to care for
their new addition to the family. 
More grins ensue, mostly deriving from the banter between Cage and Hunter and
from the performances of John Goodman and William Forsythe as two hilariously
inept escaped criminals. And the Coens' talent for visual comedy makes for
some of the movie's best moments; an extended romp through the desert towards
the end of the movie is good for quite a few laughs as Goodman and Forsythe
manage to pull one ridiculously dumb stunt after another. There is also a
chase scene in the middle which seems to come straight out of a Road Runner
cartoon and has to be one of the funniest pieces of slapstick in movie
history. It's nearly impossible to describe verbally, but let me just say that
it starts with what seems like a typical convenience store robbery, but by the
end, a trigger-happy policeman is running through a drugstore trying to dodge
carts steered by screaming women who are being pursued by a pack of house
dogs. 
The only thing that seems a little uneven about "Raising Arizona" is its
handling of the bizarre "Lone Rider of the Apocalypse" character. This hefty,
gun-slinging biker, who seems to have wandered in from a Mad Max  movie,
appears at first mostly in Hi's dreams or in his imagination, but towards the
end he seems to be a real person. While some of the other goings-on are pretty
outlandish, it is not until the biker is revealed to be a physical reality
that "Raising Arizona" clearly crosses the line into fantasy, and at an hour
and fifteen minutes into the film, it's a little late. The biker's scenes are
certainly amusing - it wasn't until after the movie was over, when I had
finally stopped laughing, that I got to thinking about this in the first place
- but it also didn't take me too long to figure out that the character was
handled rather strangely. 
Psychotic bikers and metaphysical distortions aside, however, "Raising
Arizona" is definitely one of the funnier and better-written comedies that I
have come across, and I would definitely recommend it to anyone who enjoys
clever, tongue-in-cheek verbal humor and off-the-wall slapstick.

Title
Review for Color of a Brisk and Leaping Day (1996)
Film review (C) 1997 by Kevin Patterson
Color of a Brisk and Leaping Day (NR, 1996)
Written and directed by Christopher Munch.
Starring Peter Alexander, Jeri Arredondo, Michael Stipe.
        Christopher Munch's Color of a Brisk and Leaping Day  is a good
example of the right way to do social commentary in film. Its characters do
not shout slogans, nor does it overstate its case by creating an exaggeratedly
heartless villain. Rather, it focuses on John Lee (Peter Alexander), a young
Chinese-American who fights to save the railroad that his ancestors helped to
build. World War II has just ended and the U.S. government wants to shut it
down; Lee resolves to raise enough money to keep it up and running.
        Munch rarely strays from this simple plot line, following the
tremendous effort Lee makes for what is probably a hopeless cause and the
difficulty it causes in his personal life. Not only are the "villains" of the
story-in this case the Washington budget-slashers-not exaggerated as is often
the case in films with a social theme, they do not even appear on screen. Lee
receives news of the latest budget cut or deadline by telegraph, and the film
focuses on how he reacts rather than on the supposed ill-will of those
responsible. Munch does not underestimate his audience's intelligence, then;
he allows his viewers to understand the social commentary of Color of a Brisk
and Leaping Day  for themselves rather than beating them over the head with
it. He also shows his skill as a director, creating a mood of melancholy that
hangs over Lee's probably futile endeavors to save the railroad. At the same
time, he tosses in a few moments of off-beat humor-most of them involving
Skeeter (R.E.M.'s Michael Stipe), the quirky clerk at the train station-that
are good for a laugh but do not undercut the generally somber nature of the story.
        This film is also quite original stylistically in that it occupies a
sort of middle ground between a feature film and a documentary. John Lee is
not only the main character, he is also, in a sense, the narrator and the
director. Almost as many of his lines are spoken in voiceover as in dialogue,
and the lingering shots of railroads and their surrounding scenery evoke Lee's
aesthetic sensibilites as a true railroad enthusiast. Some have criticized the
film on the grounds that the images sometimes seem disconnected and that
Alexander's acting is bland. I see it more as a product of this style: Lee's
character is revealed through the film's choice of images rather than through
dialogue and emotional outbursts from Alexander. If something appears on the
screen, then we are to assume that it is important to Lee and thus draw our
own conclusions about his character.
        Color of a Brisk and Leaping Day  is also successful as a character
study, then, although it falls noticeably short in one area: its handling of
Lee's romantic relationships. At the beginning of the film, there is clearly
incestuous, albeit possibly unconsummated, attraction between Lee and his
sister, yet the film never really explores the implications of this taboo
relationship. Lee seems mildly uncomfortable with his sister in a later scene,
but no more so than we would expect with a normal ex-girlfriend. And his later
romantic interest (Jeri Arredondo) gets only a cursory introduction before the
two of them become a "couple." It is rather disappointing to see an otherwise
fiercely original film fall back on the Hollywood convention that whenever two
attractive people appear on the screen at the same time, they will instantly
fall in love.
        This is at most a minor flaw, however, and even if the relationship is
underdeveloped, Arredondo's character does at least serve a purpose in the
story. In any case, despite the occasional distraction, Color of a Brisk and
Leaping Day  is successful as a character drama, a study of the human
implications of the government's railroad policy, and, above all, as a
stylistically innovative film.
Grade: A
*This film was not rated by the MPAA; it would, however, probably receive an R
for one scene of nudity and for the implied incestuous relationship.

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
WHAT DREAMS MAY COME is one of those films that takes a fascinating premise
and doesn't do as much with it as it could, but in the end, the mere fact
that anyone even tried this in the first place was enough to make me like
the film. The subject of the afterlife and what happens if two soul-mates
don't go to the same place has undeniable emotional and spiritual power,
and frankly it deserves a better treatment than that given it by director
Vincent Ward and writer Ron Bass. Still, I'm glad someone even let them put
this on the screen in the first place.
The screenplay introduces us to a happy, loving family of four--Chris
(Robin Williams), his wife Annie (Annabella Sciorra), and their two
children--and then quickly proceeds to kill three of them (Chris and the
two children) in car accidents. Chris finds himself in heaven, which
initially, in one of the many wondrous visual sights in this film, appears
in the form of one of Annie's impressionist paintings. He is still able to
connect with what Annie is experiencing back on earth because, as his
longtime deceased friend Albert (Cuba Gooding Jr.) tells him, he and Annie
are a rarity: true soul-mates. This is a decent explanation for why Chris
and Annie are so hopelessly devoted to each other, but it's also an excuse
not to spend much time on character development. Since all the main
characters except Annie are killed within the first ten minutes of the
film, we never actually see the wonderful life that they once shared, and
the emotional connection between characters and audience isn't what it
needs to be for this sort of material. We believe it's there because the
film literally tells us so, but we don't feel it to the extent that we
should.
While Chris acclimates himself to the joys of heaven, Annie labors under
severe depression, feeling she has nothing left to live for. One of the
film's successes is the juxtaposition of the magnificent displays of
paradise and the earth-bound gloom of Annie's lonely existence: the shift
in tone between the two is noticeable and effective. In any case, Annie
eventually decides to take her own life. Unfortunately, that means she
can't pass to heaven and be re-united with Chris, and here the screenplay
conjures up an inventive reason for why this is her fate that doesn't rely
too heavily on the outdated "all suicides go to hell" theology. Chris, of
course, won't accept this, and becomes determined, with the reluctant help
of a few friends and of his children, to journey literally through hell and
back to find Annie and save her from her self-defeating gloom.
The problem, however, is that Ward and Bass seem much more interested in
suggesting these ideas about love, death, and the afterlife than they do in
Chris and Annie themselves. They are, of course, inventive ideas. While
they don't spend too much time with it, the afterlife they've created
operates with its own set of rules that, as far as I can tell, have not
been derived from any particular theological tradition. For example, those
in heaven seem to have an incomplete picture of the mechanics of salvation,
and while they know God is "up there somewhere shouting down His love,"
they apparently haven't actually sat down and had a cup of coffee with Him
yet. And I would be neglecting a major aspect of the film's appeal if I
didn't mention its epic, magnificent visual design of the idylls of heaven
and the gloomy dungeons of hell.
But the film is still on tenuous ground here. Any story about eternal love
and quests through heaven and hell risks degenerating into cheesy
pseudo-philosophical fluff. WHAT DREAMS MAY COME mostly avoids the obvious
pitfalls, though I could have done without all the scenes of people flying
and a bizarre attempt at black comedy in which Chris has to traverse a "sea
of faces" in Hell and accidentally steps on a few lost souls' noses ("Watch
where you're stepping!" one of them yells). The story mostly flows nicely
without too many problems; in fact, sometimes it goes to greater lengths
with the exposition than seemed necessary. It starts to get a little rocky
towards the end, however, as so many vague truisms are uttered in an
attempt to explain what's happening that one more could have sent the whole
thing into a dizzying metaphysical tailspin.
Even if you find the story trite and pointless (which I didn't), you should
still see WHAT DREAMS MAY COME if nothing else for the outstanding design
and scope of the visuals. (By the way, the Oscar committee really have
their heads in the sand if this doesn't get nominated for something in the
technical categories.) In the end, it scrapes through by the skin of its
teeth, with its imaginative qualities carrying it through the weak spots to
produce an honest but flawed drama. Still, when the greatest virtues of a
film about the afterlife are intellectual and aesthetic rather than
emotional and spiritual, it's a pretty sure sign that it wasn't all it
could have been.

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
REVIEWER'S NOTE: For those of you who are paying attention, yes, I had already
written a review of FARGO some time ago. I recently saw the film again, and
while this isn't the first time I have changed my mind about a film after
another viewing, this is the first time that I felt like I had cheated a
four-star masterpiece out of its rating. See below for explanation. 
As the Coen Brothers' FARGO begins, shifty Minneapolis car salesman Jerry
Lundegaard (William Macy) drives down a snow-bound road to a bar in Fargo,
North Dakota, where he meets two thugs-for-hire, Carl Showalter (Steve
Buscemi) and Gaear Grimsrud (Peter Stormare). He has a rather unique
proposition for them; they are to kidnap his wife and demand $80,000 in ransom
from her wealthy father, then split the ransom money with Jerry. What is
instantly clear, however, is that, as well as being generally unsavory types,
Showalter and Grimsrud are dumber than a box of rocks and probably should not
be trusted with Jerry's laundry, much less his wife. Between that and the fact
that FARGO is the latest from Joel and Ethan Coen, who brought us BLOOD SIMPLE
and RAISING ARIZONA, among others, it's a pretty safe bet from then on that
things are going to go haywire. Pretty soon, the very pregnant Sheriff Marge
Gunderson (Frances McDormand) of Brainerd, Minnesota is being called in to
investigate a triple homicide on an isolated highway and Jerry's
scatter-brained scheme is going hopelessly awry.
FARGO is far from the typical crime/suspense thriller. It is "about" this
kidnapping scheme, but it is about a lot of other things too. It is about
Northern accents and expressions like "you betcha." It is about ice on the
windshield and large quantities of snow. Most importantly, it is about how a
laid-back community of Northern Midwesterners come face-to-face with
cold-blooded evil in the persons of Showalter and Grimsrud, and how they deal
with it in their typically laid-back, golly-gee-whiz (or in this case, "oh
yah, yer darn-tootin'!"), easy-going way. McDormand herself has described it
as "miles and miles of pure white snow, splattered with red blood." 
Stylistically, FARGO occupies a middle ground between BLOOD SIMPLE and RAISING
ARIZONA: it has both the disturbing violence of the former and the wacky humor
of the latter. Sometimes it even has both at once, such as when Jerry finds a
piece of Showalter's handywork in the form of a dead parking lot clerk and
mutters, "Oh jeez" with all the animation of someone who just stubbed his toe.
The kidnapping scene itself is a similar mix; Mrs. Lundegard and Showalter
stare curiously at each other through the window for a good thirty seconds
before the two thugs break in, and later, when she bites Grimsrud's hand in
attempt to escape, he goes upstairs to clean himself up in the family's
bathroom, leaving Showalter to chase her. The Coens do not make the mistake of
laughing off the violence entirely, however; the scene in which Grimsrud hunts
down two witnesses and kills them execution-style, for example, is unabatedly
vicious and brutal.
FARGO is sometimes black-comic and sometimes just plain black, but there is
plenty of good-natured humor as well, most of it deriving from the quirks of
the local culture and the charm of McDormand's character. "Oh, for Pete's
sake, he's fleein' the interview!" she exclaims at one point when a suspect
eludes her during an interrogation. Not only is she instantly likeable and
intelligent, she is also remarkably hardy and persistent for a woman seven
months pregnant. When she arrives at the initial crime scene, for example,
beset with morning sickness, she excuses herself momentarily to vomit, then
returns and promptly gets back to her job. The locals, meanwhile, are featured
in several scenes in which witnesses call the police with long-winded, banal
stories but can only describe Showalter as "a little fella, kinda
funny-lookin'." The interaction between Showalter and Grimsrud is also quite
amusing at times, such as when Showalter, frustrated by Grimsrud's lack of
interest in coversation, delivers a thoroughly un-silent monologue about how
"two can play at that game, buddy," and how he is going to be completely
[bleeping] silent.
What the Coens have created in FARGO is not only an interesting, off-beat
slice of culture but also an examination of the moral conflicts underlying the
characters' behavior. It's almost like the flip-side to David Lynch's BLUE
VELVET: in both films, innocent, clean-cut protagonists from a seemingly
peaceful small town stumbles into a shockingly violent crime scenario that
reveals ugly secrets hidden underneath their heretofore laid-back existence.
But while Lynch's protagonist found himself unable to deal with the evil and
perversity that he discovered without first dealing with his own "dark side,"
Marge Gunderson emerges untainted. She investigates the crimes with notable
intelligence and stands her moral ground, as she confronts the criminals'
selfishness head-on, allowing herself to feel disgust and even bewilderment,
but never letting it shake her long-held perceptions of herself and of what's
right and wrong. 
The Coens have, throughout their filmmaking career, returned periodically to
the theme of an Ordinary Joe who perseveres even when confronted by nutcases
and two-timing jerks. FARGO isn't quite their best film (that honor still goes
to BARTON FINK, their 1991 surreal psychodrama that sent up artistic
pretension and Hollywood commercialism) but at the very least, Marge Gunderson
turns out to be an Ordinary Josephine who almost certainly outclasses all the
Coens' previous Ordinary Joes (which is not an easy act to follow). Poignant,
intelligent, and occasionally hilarious, FARGO is a fine example of filmmaking
that no one should miss. 
For one thing, I don't think I fully grasped the moral conflicts that I
discussed in the second-to-last paragraph above when I first reviewed the
film: at the time, I saw FARGO as mostly just an off-beat examination of the
local culture within the framework of a crime thriller. Also, I criticized the
film on two grounds which, in retrospect, were mostly irrelevant. The dangling
plot thread of which I spoke was incidental at best, and returning to it at
the end would almost certainly have disrupted the narrative flow. As for the
criminals taking too long to get things moving, there does seem to be a slight
amount of sloppiness - they seem to take half the day driving from the Twin
Cities to Brainerd, when in reality it's only a few hours - but again, this is
at most a minor flaw and not a serious detraction from the film's overall effectiveness.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Those who have grown accustomed to Jim Carrey as a one-note Johnny
specializing in funny faces and fart jokes might be surprised to see him in
THE TRUMAN SHOW, one of the better films of the past few years, portraying
Truman Burbank, a man who has lived his entire life on national television.
He lives inside the largest studio ever constructed, set up to resemble a
small island town, unaware that everyone around him is an actor and that
cameras are hidden everywhere. "The Truman Show," created by an enigmatic
producer named Christof (Ed Harris), is on the air twenty-four hours a day
and is a worldwide hit. Christof and his actors all seem to hold Truman in
high regard, even as they manipulate and deceive him.
Truman's a nice guy and a bit of a goof, partly because he's been raised in
an idealized, "Leave It To Beaver"-style community. He lives a pleasant,
stable life with his "wife" Meryl (Laura Linney), and has to deal with only
the mild conflicts and difficulties designed by the show's producers. He's
nearing thirty years old, however, and he's starting to wonder what life is
like outside the island, and he still sometimes pines for a strange woman
he met in college who started to tell him a bizarre story when she was
suddenly whisked away by her "father," who claimed she was schizophrenic.
(In fact, she was trying to tell Truman that his life was a television
show.)
"The Truman Show" is television, not reality, and as a result the other
actors sometimes have to pause awkwardly in the middle of dialogue for
product placement, and there is the occasional technical glitch. The show
has remarkably efficient damage control: when a stage light falls from the
sky and lands outside Truman's house, for example, he hears a radio report
shortly afterward that a malfunctioning airplane had just flown overhead
and shed a few parts. But now that he's starting to question his place in
the world, these things are starting to bother him a little more. He starts
taking a few risks, like jumping out in the middle of albeit slow traffic
and finds that, lo and behold, all the cars instantly stop to let him
through. His attempts to leave the island are continually thwarted through
various "coincidences." He's beginning to think that there is some sort of
secrecy or conspiracy surrounding him, and, of course, he's right.
Most of Andrew Niccol's screenplay focuses on Truman's gradual realization
that things aren't what they seem and Christof's increasingly desperate
attempts to keep him convinced of the deception. Carrey turns in an
excellent performance, convincingly capturing both Truman's initial
golly-gee-whiz naivete and his nervous insistence on knowing the truth,
while never losing sight of the character's essential charm and niceness.
There is perhaps one instance of a hastily executed plot development, but
other than that, the screenplay flows nicely, and director Peter Weir does
a particularly good job of finding the right mix of irony and genuine
empathy for Truman's scripted emotional moments.
But what really makes THE TRUMAN SHOW work is all the side issues raised by
the screenplay. At one level, it's a satire of television, in that the
viewers and producers talk about Truman as if he really were nothing more
than a character in a TV show, and some of his little daily problems are
the artificial, contrived stuff of soap operas. It can also be read as a
shot at the current fad of "reality" programming that has brought us the
likes of "World's Scariest Police Chases" and "When Animals Attack."
Equally interesting, however, is the issue of how we simply accept the
reality into which we are born. There are times when I found myself
wondering why Truman didn't start getting suspicious earlier, but the small
bits of weirdness like the supposed crumbling airplane may well just be
part of everyday life as far as he's concerned. Niccol's screenplay also
addresses the human rights aspect rather well. He allows Christof to argue
that it is the outside world with all its violence and unrest that is sick
and twisted rather than his scheme to keep Truman in the studio and on
camera, yet still ultimately sides with the small "Free Truman" movement
that seems to have sprung up.
Simply put, THE TRUMAN SHOW has everything that makes for an excellent
film: an engaging lead performance, a screenplay with solid
characterization and plotting and interesting subtexts, and controlled
direction that adds to the personality of the film without getting in the
way. Some of the buzz surrounding the film has labeled THE TRUMAN SHOW as
the Movie of the Decade. I don't know if I'd go that far, but as of
mid-June 1998, it's at least the Movie of the Year.

Title
Review for Reservoir Dogs (1992)
Pretty much everyone knows the story about how former video store clerk
Quentin Tarantino made his 1994 film, "Pulp Fiction," on a small budget and
how the film went on to win the Palme D'Or at Cannes and become one of the
most successful independent films in recent history. Tarantino's 1992
directorial debut, "Reservoir Dogs," was largely ignored when it was first
released, however. In retrospect, "Dogs" showed traces of the stylistic
quirkiness that dominated "Pulp Fiction," but it also boasts a well-conceived
gangster story.
"Reservoir Dogs" revolves around a bank robbery gone wrong, but we never see
the robbery itself. Instead, the film flashes forward to immediately after the
robbery as three of the thieves gather at their warehouse hideout. One of them
is seriously wounded and doesn't seem likely to last much longer, and as the
others straggle in, they all become pretty certain that there was an
undercover cop in their ranks. What is most interesting is the
characterizations of these criminals: rather than being the generic heartless
thugs that we have come to expect from crime movies, these men seem to have
their own, albeit warped, sense of ethics. Two of them, for example, have a
debate on whether or not to take their wounded colleague to the hospital, and
all of them seem thoroughly disgusted with another fellow thief who lost his
head during the robbery and started shooting innocent bystanders.
Tarantino makes a smart move in humanizing otherwise unsavory characters,
because what happens next lends to the film a sense of genuine tragedy.
Everyone agrees that someone must be a cop, but no one knows who it is. The
criminals gradually turn against each other: some of them do so out of
self-defense, and some of them are standing up for each other. The suspicions
and misunderstandings escalate until all of them are heading towards an
inevitable but senseless bloody confrontation. 
Unfortunately, Tarantino's shtick sometimes gets in the way. "Reservoir Dogs"
has his signature quirky dialogue, funky music, and non-linear structure
(about half of the movie is devoted to flashbacks of the escape from the
botched robbery and of the initial assembly of the group of criminals). Unlike
"Pulp Fiction," however, which was a study in surreal and sometimes darkly
humorous exaggeration, this film doesn't really seem to need it. The opening
scene in which the criminals debate the meanings of Madonna's lyrics, for
example, is funny and would have been fine in a Richard Linklater movie, but
here it just seems like a waste of time. Also, the behavior of the character
who turns out to be the undercover cop borders on downright inexplicable at
times. Some viewers have claimed that Tarantino was exploring themes of
loyalty through this character, but if so, then there is almost no build-up,
because all I saw was that he shot somebody when it didn't make any sense for
him to do so.
I do not deny the signs of sophistication that have propelled Tarantino to the
spotlight: at his best, he is a smart action/crime-movie director with a flair
for character development. What I also see, however, is a director who seems
to want some sort of insurance that his films will become cult hits, and as a
result injects a lot of well written but unnecessary "offbeat" material into a
film that would have been perfectly successful without it. "Pulp Fiction" 
took the over-the-top aspect of "Reservoir Dogs" and ran with it for a whole
movie, and, from the rumors so far, so does Tarantino's upcoming "Jackie
Brown." Hopefully, when it comes time for his next project, he'll be able to
settle down enough to write the gritty four-star crime drama of which he is
clearly capable.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Wavelength (1967)
Michael Snow's WAVELENGTHis definitely one of the stranger things I have seen
projected on a silver screen over the years. It begins with a wide shot of two
people leaving a largely empty room which appears to be on the second or third
floor of a building. Later, someone comes in, listens to the Beatles'
"Strawberry Fields" on the radio, then leaves. The camera slowly starts to
zoom in on the far wall as a high-pitched whirring sound begins in the
background. There are occasionally bright flashes of light and changes in the
color scheme: the shot changes from brownish floorboards and walls and daytime
showing through the windows to white walls, grey floorboards, and the lights
of nighttime traffic visible from the outside. A man enters the room, lies
down on the floor, and apparently does. A woman enters, picks up the
telephone, calls someone to report the death, then also leaves. In an
interesting effect, we see her "ghost image" shortly after this, entering and
moving in the exact same places in the frame, only she is slightly out of sync
with the room, since the camera has continued zooming in since she left. The
whirring grows louder and higher-pitched as the zoom continues, until finally
we see what the camera has been approaching: a painting of the ocean on the
far side of the wall.
The problem is that this takes forty-five minutes. I have literally described
everything that "happens" in this film: most of the time, the audience is left
staring at an empty room. Yes, the empty room changes colors once in a while,
but it's still the same empty room. Those who admire WAVELENGTH(including my
film professor, who recently screened it--that's how I managed to see this in
the first place, in case you're wondering) have described it as a meditation
on the subjective nature of cinema and on the ways in which new zooming and
lense technology that had recently been invented could add to this subjectivity.
This claim seems to be partially backed up by comments from Snow himself, who
said he wanted to explore "aesthetic ideas," among other things, in this film.
What I don't understand is why it had to take forty-five minutes, or why Snow
wanted to explore these largely academic and technical subjects in the medium
of avant-garde film. This sort of thing is best suited for instructional film
(I know that I myself got a lot more out of watching clips of the film in
lecture the next day, with the professor explaining the technology behind the
various shots, than I did out of seeing the film itself) or for the written
word. Snow may have hoped for an emotional response as well, as his comments
on the film indicate that he hoped to explore religious experience and the
nature of sight itself in addition to the more technical issues.
Unfortunately, the slow pacing and lack of variety in the images renders the
film inaccessible at most levels other than the most esoteric and drastically
reduces the possibility of the sort of intuitive, expressionistic sensations
which are generated by the best abstract films. Even those who recognize the
issues of human consciousness present in the film are, in my opinion, probably
appreciating them intellectually rather than sensing any connection or
parallel to their own experiences in consciousness.
I don't deny that there is a certain intelligence and craft behind
WAVELENGTH(and in fact, many film experts consider it a masterpiece, so my
opinion should probably be taken with a grain of salt anyway). If it had only
been ten or fifteen minutes long, it might have been a nice little piece of
scratch-your-head abstraction that might also have provoked the sort of deeply
intuitive sensations that are evoked by the best avant-garde films and thus
would have demonstrated the artistic power of the new technology with which
Snow was experimenting. The slow pacing, however, emphasizes the technical and
downplays the human: WAVELENGTH becomes a film about film and little else.
I can't really call it a failure, since it succeeds at being a film about
film, as much as an idea ill-suited to the medium. WAVELENGTHis not available
on video and, needless to say, doesn't play in the theaters very often, so it
may be hard to find even if you do want to see it. If you're highly interested
in an exploration of the technical aspects of filmmaking in and of themselves,
you might want to see it if you get the chance. Otherwise, don't waste your
time trying to track it down.

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
EYES WIDE SHUT arrives in theaters as one of the most anticipated 
releases of 1999, overshadowed perhaps only by STAR WARS: EPISODE I - 
THE PHANTOM MENACE. The reason for all the hype, of course, is that 
it is not only the first film from Stanley Kubrick in thirteen years, 
but it is also his last, as he died shortly after showing an initial 
cut to the cast and to studio executives. This situation has led to 
some controversy over whether or not the film, as released, truly 
represents Kubrick's intentions for the final product, especially 
after it became known that digital images were inserted during one 
scene in order to ensure an R-rating. Adding to the hype has been one 
report that Kubrick had told a friend that, in his estimation, Eyes 
Wide Shut was his best film yet.
I don't think that EYES WIDE SHUT is, or could have been, Kubrick's 
best film yet. It does not reach the heights of DR. STRANGELOVE or 
2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, and I doubt that any post-production tinkering 
would have changed that. But with all the attention that EYES WIDE 
SHUT has received, we tend to forget that Kubrick probably never 
conceived of this film as any sort of "grand finale." He simply set 
out to make an original and thought-provoking drama, and at that task 
he has succeeded admirably.
As EYES WIDE SHUT begins, we are introduced to a wealthy New York 
couple, Dr. Bill Harford (Tom Cruise) and his wife Alice (Nicole 
Kidman). They go to a party hosted by Victor Ziegler (Sydney 
Pollack), a patient of Bill's who moves in an even more elite crowd 
than the Harfords. At the party, both Bill and Alice, after having a 
few too many drinks each, flirt briefly with others, but nothing 
comes of it and they go home. The following evening, while the two 
are smoking pot in their bedroom, Alice asks Bill about the women who 
were with him at the
party. They quarrel over whether or not there is any jealousy present 
in their relationship, and finally she recounts a story about a 
handsome naval officer she noticed on their family vacation years ago 
and claims that, had the officer shown any interest in her, she might 
well have left Bill and their young daughter for him.
Bill is understandably upset, but before he can resolve things with 
Alice, he is called away to the home of a patient whose father has 
just died. After he leaves, he goes out for a walk and encounters a 
variety of sexual temptations, but never actually acts on any of 
them. He goes to the apartment of a prostitute, for example, but his 
cellular phone rings before the two of them do anything. Eventually 
he makes his way to an isolated mansion, where he finds a strange 
ritual taking place that seems to be a hybrid between a religious 
ceremony and a sexual orgy. All the participants are masked, and a 
secret password is required to enter. A woman approaches Bill and 
warns him that he is in danger, and soon the masters of ceremonies 
realize that he is not supposed to be there. It seems inevitable that 
he will somehow be "punished" and possibly even killed, when suddenly 
the unidentified woman intervenes on his behalf. He is ordered to 
leave immediately, and no one will tell him what will become of the 
woman now.
At times, it seems as though EYES WIDE SHUT is about to settle into 
the mode of a classic thriller, with a single protagonist on the run 
from powerful, shadowy forces. Bill has reason to believe that the 
mysterious woman from the orgy, as well as the acquaintance who 
illicitly gave him the password, have been killed. When he tries to 
determine their whereabouts, he is warned in no uncertain terms to 
stay away, and the safety of his family is threatened. There are a 
few elements that are disappointingly conventional, such as an 
ominous figure in a trenchcoat who seems to be tailing Bill, or the 
two anonymous men who approach him in a black car and step out to 
deliver him a typewritten note. (There is, however, at least a hint 
that this stereotypical, clichd 'bad guy' behavior may have been 
intentional.)
For the most part, however, Kubrick and co-writer Frederic Raphael 
keep the focus on the emotional suspense, as Bill and Alice continue 
to deal with their personal fears and insecurities about themselves 
and about each other. One of the most interesting aspects of the 
story is that their relationship nearly falls apart over sexual 
jealousy despite the fact that neither of them ever actually cheats 
on the other. Instead, they are driven apart by mere suggestions, 
possibilities, and even dreams -- one night, Bill comes home to a 
distraught Alice, who has had a nightmare in which she imagined 
herself having sex with countless men at once and laughing at Bill as 
he looked on. And even as he fears for his life, Bill continues to 
flirt with the New York City sexual underworld, still never actually 
betraying his wife but coming dangerously close at least once more. 
The thriller plot is composed similarly out of suggestion and 
ambiguity, as it is never clear if any real violence has taken place 
or if the entire situation is just a combination of unusual 
coincidences and intimidation tactics. The conflicts in EYES WIDE 
SHUT arise not out of actual events but out of the possibilities that 
exist in the minds of Alice and Bill, as they contemplate sexual 
abandon and, in Bill's case, physical danger. Issues of internal 
moral character become more important than legalistic details of what 
exactly happened (or, in this case, didn't happen) and why and when.
Kubrick's talent for hypnotic style and masterful orchestration makes 
him an ideal director for this sort of material, which relies more on 
thematic coherence and on the intensity of the psychological 
experiences than on its intentionally flimsy plot. He creates a 
convincing cinematic landscape, with an emphasis on the bleak and 
slightly decadent aspects of life in New York City, then utilizing 
them to construct a nightmarish excursion into the sexual underworld 
that is at once frightening yet believable. The orgy scene in 
particular is a perfectly composed piece of surreal tension, as the 
participants chant in a foreign language and engage in mechanical, 
ritualistic sex as Bill wanders through, perhaps fascinated, perhaps 
repulsed, and perhaps both. What little dialogue the scene contains 
is spoken from behind masks, creating the eerie impression of voices 
dissociated from the actual persons, floating in a void where 
ordinary human interactions have no place.
As is typical of Kubrick's films, the characters' quandaries arise 
out of a form of dehumanization, in this case the possibility that 
simple, impersonal sex could replace devotion and love as the center 
of Bill's and Alice's lives. Despite its explicit content, EYES WIDE 
SHUT is not an exhortation to the mindless sort of "sexual freedom" 
that permeates Hollywood. (If anything, it gets a little too 
obviously preachy; a brief subplot involving an HIV scare can't help 
but come off like something out of a high school sex-ed video.) The 
scenes of nudity, which are used almost exclusively to suggest 
infidelity and objectification, are more disturbing than anything 
else, and are certainly not intended to be erotic or sensational: 
stylistically, EYES WIDE SHUT has much more in common with BLUE 
VELVET or EXISTENZ than it does with the latest soft
core direct-to-video garbage.
There are times when the psychological drama and the suspense 
thriller seem to rest awkwardly side-by-side, but Kubrick and Raphael 
effectively resolve both threads at once in a conclusion that is 
low-key but appropriate and actually somewhat optimistic. There are 
no real scenes of confrontation in the final reels of EYES WIDE SHUT. 
Instead, the threat of physical harm and conspiracy is marginalized 
to the point where Bill feels he can safely leave behind the strange 
events of recent days, and he and Alice seem ready to count their 
blessings and move forward. And yet this is not a picture-perfect 
ending. There are some lingering doubts in their dialogue in the last 
scene, and it is not lost on them that they may have been saved 
partly by coincidence and lack of opportunity.
Kubrick has always been known as a somewhat pessimistic filmmaker, 
perhaps not without reason: A CLOCKWORK ORANGE imagined a future 
world overrun by selfishness and violence, DR. STRANGELOVE ended with 
nuclear holocaust, and the "happy" ending of 2001 showed a character 
who achieved enlightenment only when he ceased to be human. EYES WIDE 
SHUT demonstrates that he can play the other side of the coin as well 
and create characters who are not defeated by the unavoidable dangers 
of his troubled universe. Bill and Alice don't quite descend all the 
way into the abyss and climb back out, as is par for the course in a 
cautionary tale with an optimistic conclusion, but at the very least 
they step right up to the edge of the abyss and still manage to turn 
away.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Title
Review for Kalifornia (1993)
The other reviews I have read of KALIFORNIA have labeled it as everything
from a brilliant insight into humanity's capacity for evil to pointless
exploitative garbage. I don't really think it's either. It's a good film
with considerably more substance than most thrillers, yet it's not quite as
successful as it could have been.
Screenwriter Tim Metcalfe has created two edgy protagonists in Brian
Kessler (David Duchovny) and his girlfriend Kerry (Michelle Forbes). Brian
has a fascination with serial killers, and believes that most of them are
not really evil but tend to be the product of circumstances that hinder
their development as moral human beings. Kerry is trying to make a living
selling erotic photography, and Brian is supposed to be writing a book on
serial killers but is getting nowhere. The down-on-their-luck couple decide
to take a cross-country trip to California, and along the way they will
stop at the sites of several well-known murders so that Brian can try to
get inside the killers' frame of mind while Kerry takes the pictures for
his book.
Since they don't have enough money to make the trip by themselves, they
decide to advertise on a ride-sharing board. Another couple, Early Grace
(Brad Pitt) and Adele (Juliette Lewis), respond to the ad. Early seems
slightly intimidating and prone to violence (he takes Brian to a biker bar
and gets in a fight, and later shows Brian how to shoot a gun), and Adele
is spacey and disturbingly submissive to Early. Brian finds himself
strangely attracted to Early's impulsive behavior, while Kerry remains
suspicious, and with good reason: Early has recently finished a prison
term, and murdered his landlord right before taking off with Adele. By the
time Brian and Kerry fully realize what's going on, they are essentially
hostages as the trip continues. Still, Brian can't resist the opportunity
to try to understand Early's motivations, wondering if an abusive father
might have instilled his violent tendencies and asking him why he kills and
how it makes him feel. Brian's own fascination with violence, and his
forgiving attitudes towards those who engage in it, are both challenged by
the living example of Early Grace.
Unfortunately, the challenge proves to be insufficient in the end. At the
heart of KALIFORNIA is the question of whether some people are truly evil
or if everyone is more or less a product of circumstance, but the material
presented can't really answer that question. Early is not, from my
admittedly limited knowledge of the subject, a serial killer. His murders
are spur-of-the-moment and are usually precipitated by anger or selfishness
(such as when he follows a wealthy suit-and-tie type into a bathroom, stabs
him to death, and takes his money). The issue of whether or not evil is
simply a more powerful force in some human beings than others cannot be
settled by the likes of Early Grace: he acts on impulse alone, and the
distinction between good and evil is essentially meaningless for him
(which, whether it was intended or not, actually seems to validate Brian's
theories).
The best way for a film with these underlying themes to conclude would have
been to unite the moral conflicts with the more immediate physical danger:
make the final showdown one between serial killer and serial killer
researcher. But since Early's characterization makes this impossible, the
only way for first-time director Dominic Sena to bring everything to a head
is to focus on the one conflict that is complete enough to drive the plot,
and it's also the simplest--Early is dangerous, and might kill Brian and
Kerry. The final moments of the film consist of a series of violent
confrontations and action scenes, some of which seem a little excessive
(which may account for the charges of exploitation from some critics). In
one sequence, for example, Early has kidnapped Kerry and driven to an
isolated house near a nuclear testing facility. Brian heads after them, and
as he approaches the house, he spins off the road as his truck overturns
and he is knocked unconscious. He awakes the next morning, walks the rest
of the way to the house, and attempts to rescue Kerry. Why not simply have
him drive up, park, and then confront Early? Well, I guess because then we
wouldn't have had the car crash scene.
Still, the filmmakers might have gotten away with this kind of incomplete
resolution if they had played their cards right. They could have
acknowledged that the issue really hinges on true serial killers or on
megalomaniacs like Adolf Hitler or Joseph Stalin, who carefully consider
and plan out the suffering they cause, and not on an animalistic thug like
Early. Unfortunately, they seem to be trying to fake it in the final reels.
In a final narration delivered without any noticeable irony, Brian seems to
think he's got it all figured it out and understands what constitutes human
evil. Personally, I think he'd better do a little more research before he
writes that serial killer book.
I have spent a considerable amount of time discussing where KALIFORNIA goes
wrong, yet it's not a bad film by any means. It's an engaging thriller with
a tight plot, sharply written characters, and some interesting ideas about
violence. It had the potential, however, to be a lot more, and ultimately
settles for good instead of great by confining the moral conflict to a
subplot and falling back on the familiar cushion of a violent action
climax. Still, there's some good stuff here, and I'll probably be keeping
my eye open for Sena's next film.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Dream with the Fishes (1997)
DREAM WITH THE FISHES does not waste much time in planting itself firmly in
some pretty strange territory. It begins with Terry (David Arquette), a
neurotic voyeur, spying on Nick and Liz, the couple in an apartment across
from his. Nick is ignoring Liz, and when he heads out for the evening,
Terry goes to a liquor store, buys himself a bottle of booze, and prepares
to jump off the nearest bridge. He's interrupted by Nick, who stops by to
ask him for the time, then convinces him that jumping off a bridge is a bad
method of suicide, and finally offers to trade a bottle of sleeping pills
for Terry's wristwatch. Unbeknownst to Terry, Nick has given him vitamins
instead. When Terry realizes what's happened, he follows Nick again, this
time to read him off and get his watch back, only to find that Nick is in
the hospital, undergoing treatment for a terminal disease that will kill
him in another month.
Thus begins one of the weirdest setups for a buddy movie that I can recall.
The rest of the film is comparatively tame (but then again, what wouldn't
be?): Nick decides he'd rather not spend his last moments in a hospital,
and convinces Terry to help him escape so that the two of them can go on a
sort of last-chance road trip. They proceed to have numerous little odd
adventures, the most amusing of which involves Nick, high on LSD, deciding
to steal a fish from a nearby aquarium and set it loose in the sea, before
they run out of money and have nowhere to go but back to Nick's hometown.
There we are introduced to Nick's dysfunctional family, as well as his old
friends and a former girlfriend, while the perpetually timid Terry starts
to come out of his shell as he becomes more comfortable with Nick's various
acquaintances.
Both Nick and Terry live on fantasy rather than reality. For Nick, it is
the fantasy of omnipotence: he's the kind of guy who thinks he's always
right, that everyone would be a lot better off if they would just listen to
him, and that then he could have all the fun he wants and not have to worry
about the consequences. Nick's journey is not one of discovery but one of
denial, as he spends most of the film pulling stunts rather than thinking
about what his life has meant or resolving old conflicts. Terry's fantasy,
on the other hand, is that of withdrawal: his immediate response to any
uncomfortable situation is to remove himself from it. He prefers to live
vicariously through others, as a voyeur, rather than to make a life for
himself, and ultimately this fantasy has manifested itself through the
suicide attempt.
Writer/director Finn Taylor has found himself in something of a Catch-22
here: he knows these characters and their shallow, fantasy-prone tendencies
so well that the film itself risks becoming shallow and fantasy-prone.
Terry learns to enjoy life and realizes he doesn't want to kill himself,
but he owes most of his "discoveries" to Nick, who can't really be said to
be any more functional than Terry aside from not being suicidal. It's a
start, of course, but the events of DREAM WITH THE FISHES would really just
be a small step in Terry's development as a more functional and satisfied
person.
I am assuming that Taylor knows this and knows that his audience knows this
and does not intend for people to walk away thinking all is well for Terry.
Accordingly, I'd say DREAM WITH THE FISHES is a moderate success. It's a
simple story, nothing monumental, but it's a story that is told with skill
and consistency and stays true to itself and to its characters.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8MM ventures about as far into the sleazy underbelly of America as any film
I can remember. The plot, if you haven't heard, revolves around a private
detective named Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage) who is hired by a wealthy widow
who discovers what appears to be a snuff film in her husband's private safe
after his death. Understandably disturbed, she hopes that Welles can prove
that it's a fake and that the woman apparently murdered in the film is
actually still alive. Welles's investigation inevitably leads him into the
world of underground pornography, where anonymous dealers congregate in
back alleys and abandoned buildings to sell illegal hardcore videos that
depict pedophilia, bestiality, rape, and other forms of depravity.
Some will undoubtedly be outraged over the film's graphic content. While
director Joel Schumacher thankfully spares us the most disturbing images
(he mostly keeps his camera on Welles's horrified reaction during his
screening of the snuff film, for example), we certainly see enough brief
clips of the hardcore films that even the most seasoned viewer will feel
genuinely shocked, if not downright repulsed, at least a few times during
8MM. The film was reportedly trimmed down after initially receiving an
NC-17 rating, and all I have to say about that is this is one case in which
the distributor should probably pass on a "director's cut." Still, I can
comfortably acquit Schumacher and screenwriter Andrew Kevin Walker of any
charges of exploitation. The film's content is never sensationalized, and
most of it is shot in a murky gloom that lends an appropriately ugly feel
to the kind of human behavior on display here.
Unfortunately, I can't acquit them of the charge of telling a pretty
mediocre story: it certainly isn't boring, but there isn't much in the way
of real substance. What 8MM  should have done, I think, was to explore the
psychology that leads people down these dark paths in the first place.
Instead, it mostly proceeds according to typical Hollywood thriller
conventions and without much character insight. Take, for example, Max
California (Joaquin Phoenix), the adult bookstore clerk that Welles enlists
to point him in the right directions as he tries to trace the snuff film's
origin. Max is smarter than the people he works for (apparently the porn
clerk position was the best job he could get in L.A.), which is why Welles
latches onto him: at heart, he's a regular guy who recognizes this
perversity for what it is. Obviously, I don't know a whole lot about Max's
line of work, but it seems unlikely that someone like him would make a lot
of connections in the illegal porn business. I think he'd probably come to
work in the morning, take his paycheck, and go home. Of course, if that
were the case, then Welles wouldn't be able to have a Trustworthy
Wisecracking Sidekick (TM). Later, they meet a fringe S&M pornographer
named Dino Velvet (Peter Stormare), who is frightening, but in an overly
stylized way (he transfers his hardcore movies from film to video and is
therefore considered the "Jim Jarmusch of S&M") that prevents the audience
from taking him, or what he represents, too seriously. Yes, he's twisted
and sadistic, but like Max, he only makes sense as a movie character and
not as a real person.
The filmmakers flirt with the dark psychology a little bit, but in a way
that's just marginally effective. At one point, Max warns Welles, "You
dance with the devil, and the devil don't change: the devil changes you."
Those of us who have seen screenwriter Walker's SE7EN can see where this is
going: eventually, Welles gets to the stage where he feels he is justified
in taking the law into his own hands against the people who made the snuff
movie. But since most of the film is occupied with the details of the
investigation rather than Welles's reactions to what he is discovering, we
don't really identify with his character, and his transformation into a
vigilante seems to happen only because the screenplay says so. What we end
up with is a final half-hour that seems only loosely related to everything
that preceded it. I could rationalize Welles's behavior, but I didn't find
him sympathetic, unlike Brad Pitt's character in SE7EN, whose fall from
grace I could understand even as I hated the fateful choice that he made.
Granted, some unsettling but worthwhile insights can actually be found in
the final half-hour, as the callous disrespect for human life that led to
the girl's murder is finally verbalized by those responsible for it.
Perhaps the most chilling moment, at least for me, is a pornographer's
description of how they slapped her around and pumped her full of drugs to
get her to calm down as they prepared to kill her. Unfortunately, these
confessions occur within the setup of yet another annoying Hollywood
formula, where the bad guy is held at gunpoint and arrogantly proclaims his
evil-ness and lack of remorse, even daring the good guy to pull the
trigger. I've never understood why someone would behave like this. I mean,
no matter how vile and depraved these people may be, wouldn't simple
self-preservationism kick in at some point and make them shut their mouths?
Sitting on the bus on the way back from the movie theater, I looked out the
window at an apartment building. Briefly, the thought crossed my mind: what
if, in some back room of that building or in an alley behind it, a band of
perverts were selling illegal child porn, or making a hardcore S&M torture
movie, or even a snuff film? At that moment, I felt more disturbed than I
did at any time during 8MM. How is it, after all, that most of us lead
fairly "normal," everyday lives, yet we inhabit the same world with the
twisted individuals who view the brutalization and murder of other human
beings as entertaining and even sexually arousing? This, I think, is why
these things are so horrifying, and this is also the point which 8MM
explores only fleetingly. There are moments when I honestly empathized with
Welles, such as when he can't bring himself to explain to his wife what
he's been doing for the past few weeks and why he seems so sad and
withdrawn, and I wish there had been more of them. The filmmakers could
have crafted a compelling human drama about a man who journeys into the
darkest corners of the psyche and becomes alienated from the life he had
previously taken for granted, but instead they send Welles back out the
door to play vigilante.
In the absence of much legitimate emotion or psychological commentary, 8MM
is little more than a serviceable but unexceptional thriller that, along
the way, takes something that most of us were probably aware of at some
level and shows it to us in all its repellent sickness. The problem is not
the content per se as the fact that the filmmakers seem don't seem to have
anything interesting to say about it. What exactly are we supposed to take
away from this film? That people who like the most extreme forms of porn
are more than a little messed up in the head and that snuff films, if they
do really exist, are a horrifyingly evil thing? Thanks guys, but I kinda
knew that already.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
The Game  * * *  (out of four)
R, 1997
Directed by David Fincher. Written by John D. Brancato, Michael Ferris, and
Andrew Kevin Walker. Starring
Michael Douglas, Sean Penn, Deborah Unger.
Corporate executive Nicholas Van Orton (Michael Douglas) has pretty much got
it made as far as cash flow goes: he owns an incredibly successful business,
he has a house the size of a small subdivision, and he doesn't even seem to be
working all that hard at it. He also makes for rather unpleasant company; he
is arrogant and apathetic, and he knows it - he doesn't even bother to respond
when his secretary wishes him a happy birthday, and his best friend seems to
be his maid. His life is luxurious but formulaic and, frankly, boring. Then,
one day, his brother Conrad (Sean Penn) arrives with a unique birthday gift
for him: a company known only as Consumer Recreation Services (CRS) will put
on a "game" for him to play. The twist is that he doesn't know the rules or
the object of the game; he knows when it starts, but after that it's up to him
to figure out what to do next.
This is the plot of David Fincher's "The Game," and if you think about it,
it's just about the best plot you could have for a suspense movie. With this
powerful, wealthy entertainment company pulling the strings, anything - and I
do mean literally anything - can happen; playing this game is like trying to
assemble a puzzle but not knowing what the final picture is supposed to look
like. In fact, one of the most humorous moments of the movie is Nicholas's
attempt to describe his progress in the game to possible-ally Christine
(Deborah Unger) - "I got the key . . . out of a mouth, from this . . . um . .
. clown . . . ." 
It isn't long, however, before what seems at first like a series of benign
practical jokes takes a dangerous turn; Nicholas understandably begins to feel
his life is threatened when the game starts requiring him to do things like
extracting himself from a taxi submerged hundreds of feet underwater.
Furthermore, his financial power and prestige evaporate through CRS's
manipulations, and he is forced to see things from the other side of the
fence. The lessons that he learns about money and greed are fairly predictable
and certainly nothing we haven't seen in the movies before, but this aspect of
the film does at least add a human element to the story and makes Nicholas a
sympathetic focal point for the atmosphere of fear and paranoia that Fincher creates.
The only thing wrong with "The Game," then, is that the story is really rather
ludicrous if given much thought. There were too many instances in which the
slightest deviation would have either cost Van Orton his life for real, caused
CRS's design to fall apart, or both. I found myself occasionally comparing
this movie to Terry Gilliam's "12 Monkeys" in terms of plot twists, but that
film had a narrative escape hatch in that it was a science-fiction story
involving time travel. "The Game" purports to be taking place in the real
world, and I find that a little hard to swallow. That said, this didn't
prevent me from enjoying the movie. And if other directors can get away with
flying buses, spontaneously exploding boats, and the like, then I suppose we
can let Fincher have an omnipotent entertainment company.
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
The Fifth Element (PG-13, 1997)
Directed by Luc Besson. Written by Luc Besson and Robert Mark Kamen.
Starring Bruce Willis, Milla Jovovich, Gary Oldman.
        After the hype for The Fifth Element,  I went expecting to see a
science fiction movie with a sophisticated story along the lines of, say,
Blade Runner  or 2001: A Space Odyssey.  That story may have been there, but
the movie didn't quite seem to deliver all of it. What it did deliver,
however, was a movie that took the conventions of sci-fi/action cinema to
their logical extremes, creating an entertaining atmosphere of non-stop mania.
        This actually worked very well for two reasons. First, the art
direction was excellent. The cartoonish, Terry Gilliam-esque visuals gave off
the impression that the film wasn't taking itself too seriously and that
perhaps we were supposed to believe that none of this was even real and
instead was taking place inside someone's deranged mind (such as, perhaps,
that of writer/director Luc Besson). Another review that described The Fifth
Element  as something like a "lunatic's dream" pretty much hit the nail on the head.
        Second, this sense of an interstellar roller-coaster was achieved not
just through lots of fights, chases, and explosions (though there were
certainly plenty of those), but also through some hilariously manic
characters. First and foremost was Leeloo (Milla Jovovich), an alien woman who
possesses the key to stopping an evil force poised to destroy the earth; as
the reincarnation of a Supreme Being, she speaks only the "ancient tongue." As
a result, she spends most of her time hysterically spouting gibberish (which
she does quite convincingly) and single-handedly beating the tar out of hordes
of alien mercenaries (hey, she's a Supreme Being, remember?). Also notable
were Chris Tucker as a talk-show host and Gary Oldman as a greedy warlord,
both of whose characters give new meaning to the word "flamboyant." Bruce
Willis, the hero of the story, strolls through all this in typically deadpan
fashion, delivering the usual wisecracks, blowing bad guys' heads off, and
generally kicking ass as needed.
        Another benefit to this approach is that it gives what is basically a
ludicrous story an odd kind of inner coherence. When watching the movie Speed,
 for example, I couldn't help but think that there wasn't really anything all
that special about the characters played by Keanu Reeves and Sandra Bullock
and that in reality they would have quickly lost control of the situation.
With The Fifth Element,  on the other hand, you get the feeling that if these
characters somehow actually existed (perhaps as a sort of practical joke on
the rest of us by one of Leeloo's Supreme Being cousins), they just might be
able to pull this off.
        Unfortunately, the story itself sometimes gets lost in the shuffle.
The bare-bones plot is fairly standard sci-fi: an evil force appears and seems
ready to destroy life on Earth, and some ancient artifacts as well as Leeloo's
supernatural powers are needed to defeat it. There were a few hints, however,
that there was really more to it than that, and that perhaps not everything in
Luc Besson's head quite made it to the screen. Similarly, the "moral lesson"
at the end of the movie, in which Leeloo becomes reluctant to save the human
race when she learns of its bloody history, seems kind of forced and
obligatory because not much time is devoted to it. The Fifth Element  is not,
then, the landmark sci-fi classic that some had predicted, but it is a
well-executed, generally clever, and wonderfully entertaining action-comedy
that is, if nothing else, worth the price of admission.

Title
Review for Vacances de M. Hulot, Les (1953)
Jacques Tati's 1953 classic "Les Vacances de M. Hulot" (also known as "Mr.
Hulot's Vacation," in English) ought to be the textbook on how to do
nondialogue comedy in film. The characters hardly ever speak to each other
directly, and the film operates on the paperthin premise that Monsieur Hulot,
played by Tati himself, is awkward and clumsy and generally manages to annoy
the other guests at the beach resort hotel where he is taking a week's
vacation. Yet the film had me beside myself laughing more consistently than
any in recent memory. 
Part of the reason the film works so well is the clever setup for the various
gags. Slapstick has often been regarded as an unsophisticated and even crude
form of comedy, but I think part of the reason for this is that it often seems
forced: you can only see movie characters start running after something and
then crash face-first into a pole so many times before you start to wonder
what all these poles are doing there in the first place or why these people
don't watch where they're going. In "Les Vacances de M. Hulot," the gags build
upon each other and often start out relatively low-key. In one sequence, for
example, Hulot is painting the side of his small row boat on the beach when,
while his back is turned, the paint can gets caught up in the oncoming waves,
washes away, then comes back up on the other side of the boat. While crossing
over to get the can, Hulot steps in the boat and unknowingly cracks it. When
he actually takes the boat out into the water, it breaks in half, but the two
halves flip up against each other, trapping him inside as the bystanders
mistake it for a shark fin and panic on the beach ensues. Tati doesn't waste a
single opportunity for humor; scenes that might have yielded one joke in most
comedies are good for at least four or five in this film. 
It has been said that comedy relies on frustrating the audience's
expectations, and "Les Vacances de M. Hulot" succeeds brilliantly in that area
as well. Tati accomplishes this largely through a sort of deadpan
understatement. When Hulot goes into a separate room during dinner and starts
playing a record at defeaningly loud volume, no fights or shouting matches
ensue; instead, the waiter calmly walks in and shuts off the power in the
room, disconnecting the record player and leaving a puzzled Hulot sitting in
the dark. Tati also uses running gags to this effect, allowing them to keep
running far longer than most comedy directors would; more often than not, we
can see them coming and think, "Oh, he's not going to do that  again," but, lo
and behold, he does. For example, there is a recurring joke in which Hulot's
noisy, sputtering car engine wakes everyone in the middle of the night as an
exterior shot reveals the hotel's lights coming on one by one. Then this image
turns up again in the finale, which I will not give away other than to say
that involves a lot more noise in the middle of the night than a car engine
could ever produce. 
The ending is one of two elements that really make this a four-star film as
opposed to merely an above-average, clever comedy. As much as I was laughing
during this film, I was thinking to myself occasionally that Tati had to top
himself at the end to really make this work as a complete viewing experience;
suffice it to say that he did. The other important aspect is that the film
never seems disdainful of its characters. It easily could have turned the
tables on Hulot and had the other guests exact some kind of revenge on him;
alternatively, it could have portrayed the others as humorless curmudgeons.
Instead, Tati seems to regard his characters with cheerful amusement more than
anything else and invites the audience to like them, however strange or
irritating they might seem. 
"Les Vacances de M. Hulot" is not subtitled, but the dialogue is sparse and
for the most part not terribly essential to the flow of events. Anyone with a
taste for this kind of absurd humor ought to make this film their next rental
from the video store.
NOTE: "Les Vacances de M. Hulot" was not rated by the MPAA. It would at most
receive a PG rating.

Title
Review for Elephant Man, The (1980)
The Elephant Man (PG, 1980)
Written by Eric Bergren, Christopher DeVore, and David Lynch. Directed by
David Lynch. Starring Anthony Hopkins, John Hurt.
        The Elephant Man  is based on the true story of John Merrick, a man
born so horribly disfigured that he was put in a carnival freak show, where he
got his nickname "Elephant Man." Assumed to be a complete imbecile and
exploited by the freak show owner, his plight was ignored until he was taken
to the hospital for beatings from his owner. It was there that Dr. Frederick
Trieves discovered that Merrick was in fact quite intelligent and could hold
conversation like anyone else; painfully aware of his own humiliation, he had
always been afraid to speak.
        Fine performances are turned in by Anthony Hopkins as Dr. Trieves, the
well-meaning physician who nevertheless realizes he is walking a fine line
between genuinely helping Merrick and using the case for the sake of notoriety
among the medical community, and by John Hurt as Merrick. Hurt successfully
plays his character as someone who is very grateful for the chance finally to
experience life as a human rather than as an animal in a zoo and approaches
everything with both the wonder of a child and the wisdom of an adult. It is
this characterization that, more than anything else, makes The Elephant Man 
such a powerful story: it is impossible not to sympathize with Merrick.
Director David Lynch, who is well-known for his bizarre films, appropriately
puts aside his usual weirdness here to concentrate on the story; he in fact
possesses an almost equal flair for emotional intensity, which serves this
film well.
        There are two minor flaws in The Elephant Man- first of all, the
sequence in which Merrick is kidnapped by his former owner and put back in the
carnival is merely glossed over; he escapes and returns to Dr. Trieves almost
immediately. I can't help but think that to be dragged back to his status as a
circus freak after years of building up his self-respect from nothing must
have been more significant in the life of the real John Merrick; this deserved
more time. (On the other hand, this part does at least pave the way for what
is perhaps the climax of the film, when Merrick finally has the courage to
declare, "I am not an animal! I am a human being!") Second of all, many of the
transitions between scenes suffered from inexplicably choppy editing. I am not
someone who usually notices that kind of thing in a film, but it's kind of
hard not to notice that the screen is starting to fade out while a character
is still talking.
        These small problems, however, do not change the status of The
Elephant Man  as a classic drama and a wonderfully told story of the strength
of human dignity. Hats off to Hurt, Hopkins, and Lynch for this one.

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
The Lost World (PG-13, 1997)
Directed by Stephen Spielberg. Screenplay by David Koepp. Based on the
novel by Michael Crichton. Starring Jeff Goldblum, Julianne Moore.
        Let's start with the good news: The Lost World  is a decent,
entertaining summer thriller. The special effects team does a wonderful job in
bringing these dinosaurs to life, and there is plenty of fast-paced action and
suspense to make it fun to watch. Jeff Goldblum returns as Dr. Ian Malcolm,
the mathematician and chaos theorist from Jurassic Park,  delivering his lines
with a nervous deadpan that would make Fox "Spooky" Mulder of X-Files  fame
proud. It has all the necessary ingredients for its status as the summer
blockbuster of the year.
        Now for the bad news. First of all, the plot is for the most part a
re-hash of the first film: Humans arrive on island populated by genetically
resurrected dinosaurs. Humans manage to piss off said dinosaurs. The main
characters are attacked by a Tyrannosaurus Rex while in an automobile and one
of them gets eaten, then they escape and run around in the jungle for a while
before they reach a power station which they use to call for help. The only
difference here is that one T. Rex manages to find its way to San Diego,
which, surprise surprise, results in more chases, more destruction, and more
people being eaten. It also sinks even further into action-movie clich*s-did
anyone really think that Dr. Malcolm's estranged daughter wasn't  going to end
up on the trip to the island somehow?
        Perhaps in an attempt to differentiate itself from Jurassic Park, 
this one seems to be trying to find an uneasy compromise between the
kind-of-scary-but-family-friendly nature of the first movie (after all, these
are dinosaurs) and sheer cold-blooded terror. It doesn't always work: a scene
in which a boy wakes up in the middle of the night and tells his incredulous
parents that "there's a dinosaur in our back yard" kind of ceases to be cute
and endearing when it ends with the family's dog (and probably the family
themselves) being gobbled up. It also tries to push a message about
conservation, which I guess is admirable, but I wonder how many
environmentalists would appreciate the script's conflation of Greenpeace
activists with Earth First! eco-terrorists.
        This is not to take anything away from Spielberg, who clearly still
knows how to direct a tight, suspenseful thriller with dazzling special
effects and stunts. I just don't think this is one of his better films, nor is
it even that important an addition to the Jurassic Park  legacy. Like
Independence Day, whose box-office records it has now broken, it seems like
just another summer sensation that will probably be forgotten in a year or two.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Titanic  **** (out of four)
PG-13, 1997
Directed and written by James Cameron.
Starring Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet, Billy Zane, Bill Paxton.
I must admit that I was more than a little skeptical when I first heard about
"Titanic" and its numerous production delays and its $200 million budget. I
wasn't sure how well the Hollywood Happy Ending Factory would handle a tragedy
like the sinking of the Titanic. The laborious effort that reportedly went
into the film made me think, more than anything, that this was another case of
a studio wasting an enormous amount of time and money trying to make  a
mediocre movie into an epic. In other words, I expected a way-overdone and
probably irritating disaster movie.
Fortunately, I turned out to be wrong on all counts. For one thing,
writer-director James Cameron doesn't flinch from the unpleasant facts of the
story, namely that hundreds were killed in the boat's sinking. More
importantly, he doesn't make the mistake of having all the sympathetic
characters survive so as to dull the audience's emotional reactions. Titanic
is a disaster movie, but it has none of the triteness and cheap thrills
normally associated with that genre because we actually care about the
characters as people rather than as one-dimensional elements of suspense.
Cameron spends most of his time focusing on the story of Jack (Leonardo
DiCaprio), a young, rootless American who wins his ticket on the Titanic's
maiden voyage in a card game, and Rose (Kate Winslet), a wealthy young woman
who is betrothed to the cold-hearted, domineering Cal (Billy Zane). This is
clearly a marriage of financial and social convenience for the two families.
Rose dreads the life that awaits her so much that she is about to throw
herself overboard and die when Jack stumbles upon her and talks her out of it,
and of course we all know what happens next. Yes, the ensuing love story
between the two and the resulting disapproval of Rose's family is predictable,
and yes, it's a bit melodramatic at times, but it still works pretty well and
adds the necessary human element to the story.
The love story and character development occupy roughly the first half of the
film; then comes the infamous collision with the iceberg and the resulting
slow destruction of the ship. Uniting the two halves is a pointed social
commentary about the mentality that led to the Titanic disaster. The decks of
the ship were divided by social class, for example, with the result being that
the crew evacuated the wealthier passengers first. Due to some cold-hearted
publicity snobs' desire to avoid "cluttering up the deck," there were not
enough life boats, and as a result more than half the passengers, all of them
of "lower" social status, were left to drown.
Throughout the film, all of the aristocratic types casually refer to the
Titanic as "unsinkable," as if it were somehow a fact that did not even
deserve to be questioned. Some of the crew seem to share this confidence, and
this seems to be at least part of the reason that the iceberg was not spotted
earlier: no one was watching very closely. Cameron never addresses the issue
of why the ship was thought to be unsinkable, but I think (or at least I hope)
that this is intentional: the real tragedy, as the film rightly points out, is
not so much that a supposedly unsinkable ship ended up sinking, or that the
collision might have been avoided, but that anyone could be so stupid and
arrogant to presume to have constructed an "unsinkable ship" in the first place.
The film runs over three hours long, but it is never tedious or boring, and as
a result I could go on for quite a while about all the different things it
does right. I will, however, limit myself to mentioning a few other elements
which I liked. One is that Cameron creates some truly loathsome characters
among the aristocrats, but he resists the temptation to send them to the sort
of gruesome demise that has become commonplace for movie villains nowadays; he
is content simply to expose them as narrow-minded and selfish. Another is the
sometimes disturbingly funny gallows humor that pops up occasionally without
undermining the fundamentally serious quality of the film ("Great drowning
music!" exclaims a passenger to the ship's band, who, true to popular legend,
do in fact continue playing to the bitter end.) Finally, he frames the story
in a flashback as Rose, now 101 years old, recounts the story of the Titanic
to an underwater explorer (Bill Paxton). Since the story and time period are,
I imagine, completely alien to almost any viewer, the presence of the
modern-day characters helps to ease the audience into the story, but manages
not to take up unnecessary time or distract from the film's focus.
I don't know if "Titanic" is exactly flawless, but it does so many things so
well that any minor missteps (such as the dumb Celine Dion song that played
over the final credits) are excusable. It is certainly the most successful
"epic" film that I have seen recently, and it seems fairly likely from the
recent buzz that Cameron, DiCaprio, and Winslet may be receiving some
well-deserved Oscar nominations pretty soon. The increasingly "bottom
line"-oriented movie industry does not let $200-million epic masterpieces
happen often, so don't miss "Titanic."

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
DICK is the best kind of stupid movie: the kind that knows it's 
stupid. It is the work of filmmakers who have thrown all credibility 
to the wind in favor of going for one ridiculous gag after another. 
Most of the jokes work, and when one doesn't, you still have to 
admire them for even trying it in the first place.
The film takes as its title the moniker of former President Richard 
Nixon, who is one of many targets in this screwball satire. Its 
premise is that Deep Throat, the mysterious informant who provided 
Washington Post reporters Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein with 
crucial leads in the Watergate case, was in fact the pair of Betsy 
Jobs (Kirsten Dunst) and Arlene Lorenzo (Michelle Williams), a couple 
of dimwitted teenage girls who didn't even understand what they had 
discovered. They had been at the hotel at the night of the break-in, 
but they didn't realize what was going on, and it is only after a 
paranoid G. Gordon Liddy (is that redundant?) noticed them at the 
White House later that they began to stumble across the shady 
dealings. Convinced that they were spies, Liddy had them taken aside 
from their school field trip to a private study, where Nixon and Bob 
Haldeman cooked up the idea of making them official White House 
dog-walkers to keep them quiet. The irony, of course, is that they 
had no useful information until they were brought inside the White 
House in order to keep them from leaking information.
At this point, the history of the last two years of the Nixon 
presidency unfolds as a comedy of errors. The pullout from Vietnam, 
for example, is another concession to the girls, after one of them 
solemnly tells Nixon, "War is not healthy for children and other 
living things." Unique explanations are offered for some of the more 
peculiar details of the scandal, such as the missing 18-1/2 minutes 
on the Oval Office tape, which is caused, indirectly, by Arlene's 
schoolgirl crush on the President. Woodward and Bernstein, meanwhile, 
turn out to be childish idiots, squabbling with each other over who 
gets to be on the telephone with the girls (their initial phone call 
to the newspaper was only meant to be a prank) and what not. When 
Woodward meets with them in an empty garage, a noise is heard in the 
background and they fear they've been followed. And they have--by 
Bernstein, whose pratfall off his bicycle accounted for the noise.
All of this, of course, is absurd (though I do wonder if the details 
of the real Watergate scandal would seem believable if they hadn't 
actually happened). But everyone involved seems to know it's absurd, 
and neither director Andrew Fleming nor any of the performers take 
any of it remotely seriously. While there is, of course, an element 
of political satire present, most of it is fairly obvious, as the 
filmmakers are by and large unconcerned with maintaining any 
connection to reality, opting instead to create their own deranged 
screwball universe. All in all, this movie really has more in common 
with AIRPLANE! than it does with DR. STRANGELOVE.
Needless to say, DICK is not exactly what one would call a classic. I 
regard it in much the same light as this year's SOUTH PARK feature 
film, as an inventive, amusing, and largely inconsequential comedy 
(though far less vulgar). Profound it ain't, but at least it made me 
laugh.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
Roberto Benigni's LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL takes "dark comedy" to entirely new
levels. It is clearly a humorous film, making good use of Benigni's comic
talents, yet nearly half of it takes place in a Nazi concentration camp,
and it does have something very worthwhile to say about the Holocaust. At
its roots, this is a story about how someone who is leading a relatively
peaceful, ordinary life suddenly has it stripped away, and how such a
person struggles to make sense out of the unimaginable human cruelty that
he witnesses. It just so happens that this character is Guido Orefice, an
Italian Jewish waiter who seems like he must have once been a circus clown
and is frankly a little nuts.
For the first hour, we are introduced to Guido and his life in 1939
Italy--after Mussolini's takeover, but before the worst days of World War
II and the Holocaust--as he meets and falls in love with Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi), a grade school teacher. Guido is able to live a happy life for
the most part. So far, his freedom has not been curtailed very strictly. He
can't quite consider himself equal to the non-Semitic Italian citizens, but
it's mostly limited to passing insults and subtle forms of discrimination.
Benigni is a talented actor, and he succeeds at getting us to like Guido
and his friends through his various bizarre stunts and comic routines,
while at the same time showing the audience the creeping inhuman racism
that is becoming more and more a part of everyday life in Italy. Then we
jump forward to 1944. He and Dora are married, and they have a young son
named Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini). But Italy is a slightly more threatening
place now. Armed troops patrol the streets day and night, and few people
will shop at the bookstore that Guido now operates because he is Jewish.
Suddenly, one day the German army arrives and puts an abrupt end to the
life they once knew: the order has come down for Guido and Giosue to be
arrested and taken to a concentration camp. Dora is exempt since she isn't
Jewish, but when she learns what happens, she finds the train that they are
on and insists to the Nazis that she be taken to the same camp. When they
arrive there, Guido can't bring himself to explain to Giosue what's
happening. How, after all, do you tell a 5-year-old that an insane racist
dictator has decided that he is a sub-human because he is Jewish, or that
he now lives in a place where the tiniest transgression probably means
death in a gas chamber or a crematorium? So, instead, Guido tells Giosue
that they are playing a strange sort of game, with all kinds of rules that
lead to either addition or subtraction of points. Hiding from the guards
earns you a lot of points, while crying or being hungry or wanting your
mother will cost you quite a few. Whenever Giosue comes close to realizing
what's really going on, Guido invents another set of rules to explain it,
or tells him that the other prisoners are making things up to try to get
him to lose points.
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL has been criticized by some who claim that it makes a
joke of the Holocaust. The thing I realized as I watched the film, however,
is that--and I'll explain this as carefully as possible so as to avoid
offending anyone--in a way, the Holocaust *is* a joke. Certainly an
unimaginably cruel one, and not one that really makes you laugh, but
nevertheless a joke in that it is fundamentally absurd and ridiculous. In
one scene that is simultaneously hilarious and sad, the guards ask who
among the prisoners knows German, because they want to explain the camp's
regulations to the Italian prisoners. Guido, not wanting Giosue to hear the
real regulations, claims he can speak German and proceeds to translate the
guard's instructions with things like, "We play the parts of the big mean
guys who scream all the time. Avoiding us gets you 50 points. And no
complaining for more food! The other day I complained and ate two whole
meals' worth and lost 100 points!"
Obviously this is brilliant tragicomedy in its own right, but think about
the implications here. Are the rules Guido is inventing any more ludicrous
than the idea of uncooperative prisoners being gassed to death in a shower?
If someone claimed this was happening in the United States as we speak,
wouldn't you laugh at them? Recently, while surfing the Internet, I came
across a web site which claimed that the Freemasons had built an elaborate
underground base under the Denver Airport where reptile aliens were using
abducted children as slave labor and then eating them when they became too
weak to continue working. Once I got past the initial shock at the horrific
imagery, I must admit my next reaction was to laugh. Not because I find the
idea of aliens eating children inherently humorous, of course, but because
it seemed funny that anyone could actually come up with such a ridiculous
idea in the first place. Is Nazism any more inherently farcical than this?
I don't think so. The only real difference is that, somehow, Nazism
actually happened, whereas (let's hope) this alien invasion is just a
paranoid fantasy. What Benigni has realized, I think, is that while it is
understandably a sensitive subject, it is no less deserving of mockery and
satire than these other examples of ideological lunacy. In fact, in one
scene, when Giosue has heard about the crematorium from other prisoners,
Guido convinces him they were lying simply by arguing that the story is too
crazy to be believed.
Part of the reason it seems so farcical, of course, is that it is so
difficult to imagine such abject and inhuman evil existing in a world that
most people take for granted as a basically decent place. Guido does what
he does mostly for the sake of his son, but we get the feeling that he
himself kind of wants to believe that this is all just some ridiculous
game. The only time that he comes face to face with one of the infamous
piles of skeletons that have become known to most of us through various
Holocaust documentaries, he and Giosue are wandering through a thick
nighttime fog, and he is mumbling to himself that perhpas it is all a
dream. This is also, I think, the purpose of the first hour of the film,
which in my opinion has been unfairly maligned by critics as being too
silly and slight in comparison to the Holocaust horrors that follow. It's
not just character development: it's also establishing the stark contrast
between the relatively pleasant (though increasingly restricted) life that
Guido's family led in comparison to the misery of the concentration camp.
We may find ourselves wondering how the film can shift so suddenly in tone,
and, by extension, how these things can all exist in the same world.
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL doesn't quite earn four stars from me, mostly because I
had a little trouble actually accepting the premise, however
thought-provoking it may be. Little children may be gullible, but they can
still tell when they are surrounded by misery and suffering, and they would
not stay willingly in such a place regardless of what their parents may
tell them. Giosue protests that he doesn't want to play the game any more
at one point, but Guido manages to calm him down a little too easily.
Logically, I think he'd have reached a point where he would have insisted
that they stop regardless of the consequences or the possible rewards of
winning the game, and I certainly don't think he'd have made it through
more than a few days at the camp without crying or begging for his mother.
Nazism has been portrayed many times over in various art forms, usually
with an understandably grim seriousness. I can't recall anyone ever
addressing it with the bitter and viciously mocking satire that it receives
in LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, however, and Benigni is to be praised for his
creative and intelligent approach to such a difficult subject.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Time Bandits (1981)
Terry Gilliam's "Time Bandits" was promoted as a children's movie when it was
released, and it's easy to see from a marketing standpoint why this was done.
The main character (Craig Warnock) is a child, and the story revolves around
his fantastic adventures with a group of six mischievous "time bandits" -
former servants of the Supreme Being who have used their knowledge of space
and time to travel to various periods of history and steal valuable artifacts.
Along the way they encounter Robin Hood (John Cleese), Agamemnon (Sean
Connery), and other famous mythical-historical figures. Gilliam, who got off
the ground career-wise as the animator for Monty Python, puts his visual
sensibilities to good use, creating magnificent alternate worlds that are both
epic and cartoonish at once.
What elevates Gilliam's many cinematic flights of fancy above simple adventure
stories, however, is his insight into the mindset and implications of fantasy,
and "Time Bandits" is no exception. We don't just see the fun, care-free
aspect of these childhood fantasies, but the dark side as well. Some of the
young boy's heroes, for example, are not all they are cracked up to be. Robin
Hood's band of merry men seem to be a rather cynical and mean-spirited bunch,
as they amuse themselves by smacking the poor citizens around after they give
them their handouts. When we meet Agamemnon, he is in the middle of a brutal
fight to the death and seems genuinely regretful at having to cut down his
enemy. And towards the end, when the six bandits are trying to summon up a
portal to another dimension, one of them proclaims, "You just have to
believe!" This is straight out of any kids' adventure movie; yet the bandit's
intention is to transport himself and his companions to a realm ruled by greed
and evil.
"Time Bandits" succeeds at both romanticizing and pointing out the hazards of
childhood fantasies, then, but it ultimately drags on a little too long. The
motley crew's various adventures are completely disconnected from each other,
and not until the end, when they enter the realm of evil and it becomes
Warnock's responsibility to fight for the cause of good, are any of them
possessed of a real sense of urgency. It might also have helped if Gilliam had
been a little clearer about his internal logic, because "Time Bandits" is
thoroughly confusing at times, such as when the young boy's parents disappear
for no definite reason.
All in all, "Time Bandits" is an enjoyable and intelligent film, and a prelude
to later pieces such as "Brazil" and "The Fisher King" that would distinguish
Gilliam as one of the most talented fantasy directors working in modern cinema.
Visit my Film Reviews home page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/home.html

Title
Review for Himmel ber Berlin, Der (1987)
Not many modern films open with a shot of a lonely angel sitting on top of
a Berlin skyscraper, peering down at the city and its inhabitiants. WINGS
OF DESIRE, a film by German director Wim Wenders, does exactly that. This
angel, whose name is Damiel (Bruno Ganz), is having something of a crisis.
He has spent eternity with his companion Cassiel (Otto Sander), working to
spread compassion and hope among humans, but he is beginning to wish he
could share in the human experience. He wonders what it would be like to
have a cup of coffee, or feel a breeze on his face, or, more importantly,
fall in love. He gets an opportunity for the latter when he starts paying
attention to Marion (Solveig Dommartin), a lonely trapeze artist whose act
is going out of business.
Wenders asks the audience to swallow a large dose of peculiar ideas for
this film. First and foremost, we are asked to believe that angels are
simply God's errand boys: they go from place to place dispensing happiness,
and they are pleased when they have a positive effect on someone, but they
don't seem to be able to share in this happiness. Wenders also asks us to
accept that when Damiel appears in a dream to Marion, it is apparently so
vivid and real that when she sees him in the flesh, she instantly accepts
him as her true soul-mate. There's also the issue of whether the human or
angelic experience is more "real," though this is never really resolved.
Finally, there is the role played by Peter Falk, who happens to be making a
detective movie in Berlin and who eventually fits into the story in a way
that can only be described as unique and unexpected. That's not to say that
any of these ideas are bad, just that they really come from out of left
field.
Ultimately, however, what emerges is a poetic and artistically ambitious
film that serves as an examination of various facets of spirituality. There
isn't really much of a plot in this film, other than Damiel's
self-examination and eventual decision to "take the plunge" and become
human, but I don't think it needs one. Wenders is content to let his camera
wander through Berlin, following the angels as they spread intellectual
inspiration in a library, or comfort lonely subway passengers, or ruminate
on what it was like the first time anyone ever laughed (they have, after
all, been around for eternity). Their scenes are shot in black and white
and often accompanied by low, meditative music, while Damiel's scenes after
he becomes human are shot in color, backed up by the sounds of everyday
life in the city. Much of Damiel's attention is devoted to Marion, of
course, while Cassiel's "favorite human" seems to be an old writer whom he
often finds in the library or sitting in a deserted lot in the city.
What Wenders seems to be getting at is that there is a spiritual dimension
to human emotional and physical experiences, whether it's something as
complicated as falling in love or creating a work of art, or something as
simple as running around kicking dirt or finding a peaceful, isolated place
and sitting there, or even something seemingly unpleasant such as
loneliness. Damiel and Cassiel are the right characters for Wenders's
meditation on humanity, as apparently spiritual beings who are deprived of
sense experience. I kind of doubt that angels would actually be confined to
knowledge of the ethereal only, but the film wisely refrains from declaring
itself as theology and can easily be read as an allegory about human
existence.
Wenders and co-writer Peter Handke have created a haunting, hypnotic
testament to human spirituality in WINGS OF DESIRE. There's quite a bit of
metaphysics floating around here, and I'm not sure if all of it makes sense
or is explained very well, but on the other hand this isn't really the
point of the film. This is the sort of film that should be approached the
way one might approach a poem or a piece of music rather than an essay or a
novel. Its intellectual foundations may be tenuous, but its spiritual and
emotional impact is more than enough to make up for it.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
Jackie Brown  *** (out of four)
R, 1997
Directed and written by Quentin Tarantino.
Starring Pam Grier, Robert Forster, Samuel Jackson, Michael Keaton.
I suppose Quentin Tarantino was in an almost impossible position after the
wide acclaim and endless hype of his 1994 film "Pulp Fiction," an offbeat
crime movie that was not only possessed by a unique kind of manic energy but
even emerged as something of a morality play by the time it was over.
Personally, I didn't think "Pulp Fiction" was quite the masterpiece that many
other movie-goers thought it was, but I can still see how it would be hard to
top in terms of basic in-your-face impact.  So I guess it's not such a
surprise that his follow-up, "Jackie Brown," is something of a letdown.
Don't misunderstand - this film is not without its virtues. The story, adapted
from a novel by Elmore Leonard, revolves around an upcoming payment of
$500,000 for illegal gun sales by Ordell Robie (Samuel Jackson). When airline
stewardess Jackie Brown (Pam Grier) is caught bringing a smaller transaction
of money into the U.S. for Ordell, an ATF agent (Micheal Keaton) offers to get
her off the hook if she will set up Ordell for them and hand over the
$500,000. Meanwhile, Jackie formulates a plan that might, with the help of
bond officer Max Cherry (Robert Forster) let her "take the money and run." The
film spends most of the time following Jackie as she arranges things with Max
while still trying to convince both Ordell and the authorities that she is on
their side.
Numerous double-crosses and deceptions ensue, along with a surprisingly small
body count; Tarantino has toned down the violence considerably from "Pulp
Fiction" and his first film, "Reservoir Dogs." His offbeat humor is still
present, however, especially when Louis (Robert DeNiro), a recently released
bank robber who seems to have left his brain behind when he got out of jail,
is involved; the dialogue between Louis, Ordell, and Ordell's "little blond
surfer gal" Melanie make for some of the funniest moments. And as with most
"caper" movies, the plot itself is interesting enough to keep the audience
entertained most of the time.
I think the problem with "Jackie Brown" is just that it moves a little too
slowly. There were times in this movie when I was actually kind of bored, and
I think everyone, whether they liked "Pulp Fiction" and "Reservoir Dogs" or
not, can pretty much agree that Quentin Tarantino had never put a boring
moment on the screen before now. He has said publicly that he was aiming for a
more low-key style with this film rather than trying to top himself and thus
decided to focus on the characters, most notably Jackie, but I think he may
have overdone it in this respect. These characters are better developed than
those in most action/crime movies, but there are also some scenes which drag
on too long without telling us anything very revealing about them or about the
central storyline.
I figure that a movie that keeps me entertained at a very low level, through
basic action sequences or simple plot manipulations, deserves two stars.
"Jackie Brown" has the added benefit of Tarantino's style, humor, and
character development, so it gets three. Don't go to see it expecting "Pulp
Fiction II," but as a quirky, entertaining, and generally well-written crime
movie, it delivers the goods.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT
Rating: ***1/2 (out of four)
R, 1999
Directors/Screenplay: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Starring Cast: Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, Michael Williams
Almost everyone predicted that cinema in 1999 would be the year of 
Lucas and Kubrick, but few would have guessed ahead of time that one 
of the most talked-about films of the year after THE PHANTOM MENACE 
and EYES WIDE SHUT would be a micro-budget horror film called THE 
BLAIR WITCH PROJECT. The film was made (do I even need to repeat this 
story?) on a budget of $37,000 and boasts an intriguing premise: it 
claims to be the footage, only recently discovered, shot by three 
film students who disappeared in the woods near a small town called 
Burkittsville while making a documentary about the local legend of 
the "Blair Witch." This is, of course, a piece of fiction, though 
reportedly much of what we see was improvised on the spot by the 
three actors (Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael Williams, 
all using their real names), who really did shoot the footage 
themselves and who were given only a broad outline by co-writers and 
directors Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez.
Since the scenes were filmed by the actors, with the directors 
waiting off-camera and out of sight, there are no special effects or 
scenes of gruesome murder in THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, and the witch 
herself never actually appears on-screen. The "horror" rests instead 
on slowly escalating psychological tension, as the students become 
lost in the woods, their map disappears, and unseen menaces seem to 
draw nearer. They seem to be surrounded by strange noises at night 
whose origins they cannot determine, and in the morning, 
ominous-looking stick figures made of twigs and leaves are found 
outside their tent. One night, children's voices are heard outside 
and their tent suddenly collapses on them, but when they run outside, 
there is no one in sight. As their situation grows more desperate, 
they start to turn against each other and lay blame for their 
predicament, mostly on Heather, who had conceived of the project and 
who insisted beyond all reason that they were not lost.
John Carpenter said once that horror revolves around the loss of 
control, and Myrick and Sanchez seem to understand that. Until the 
last five minutes, the overall effect of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is 
more disturbing than it is "scary" in the way the word is typically 
understood. Since none of the apparent supernatural elements are ever 
witnessed on screen, there are very few moments that are likely to 
make the audience jump out of their seats in fright. Instead, we come 
to empathize with the three characters as they endure day after day 
that is dominated by fear and confusion; what the film lacks in 
visceral thrills is compensated for by the human tragedy that plays 
itself out. Towards the end, Heather records a tearful apology to 
Josh's and Mike's families as well as her own and accepts 
responsibility for the untimely end which she knows they will soon 
meet. This scene is matched in power perhaps only by the final five 
minutes, which will truly scare many viewers witless and which end 
with an ambiguous but unsettling visual that will not easily be 
forgotten.
All three performers pull off their roles almost flawlessly. Heather 
is perhaps the most interesting of the trio, as her later need to put 
some sort of emotional distance between herself and the increasingly 
grim situation accounts partly for the fact that the entire ordeal is 
caught on camera. Even when they are hopelessly lost and running out 
of food, she insists that they keep filming, and Josh, who had 
earlier screamed at her to turn the camera off, later takes a look 
through the lens and tells her he understands, because watching 
through the camera rather than through one's own eyes is "not quite 
reality." She is also the most flawed of the three, as it was her 
initial overconfidence that led indirectly to their predicament. Both 
Josh and Mike are also quite believable and sympathetic, though the 
way in which one of them is revealed as being responsible for the map 
disappearing doesn't really work: it strikes me as an amazingly 
boneheaded stunt, however frustrated the guilty party may have been.
I don't know if there's really much of a theme or a point to THE 
BLAIR WITCH PROJECT aside from some fairly routine "humankind's 
arrogance in overstepping its boundaries" implications. It's a story 
that exists mostly for its own sake, as an experiment in blending two 
cinematic approaches that are usually incompatible, i.e. the 
supernatural thriller and the verisimilitude of a pseudo-documentary. 
On this level, however, it does definitely succeed. There is never 
the sense that we are watching actors perform a scene, and the 
supernatural elements are necessarily implied rather than shown (an 
appearance by a CGI-rendered Blair Witch would have turned the whole 
thing into a long joke with a bad punchline). The key to the film's 
success is the realization that, for the most part, stories sink or 
swim with their characters. By giving the protagonists center stage 
and keeping the spooks off-screen, Myrick and Sanchez have made THE 
BLAIR WITCH PROJECT into a film that is not only disturbing and 
occasionally downright chilling, but tragic and empathetic as well. 
It's a bold debut, and I would be surprised if I see a better horror 
film any time soon.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
http://members.aol.com/ReviewsKTP/reviews.html

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
GODZILLA
Rating: ** (out of four)
PG-13, 1998
Directed by Roland Emmerich. Screenplay by Emmerich and Dean Devlin.
Starring Matthew Broderick, Maria Pitillo, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria.
GODZILLA, as I'm sure you already know, is a movie about destruction
wrought by a giant lizard created through genetic mutations due to nuclear
fallout in the South Pacific area. I'm no biologist, but I'm pretty sure
this is pure nonsense. But that kind of thing isn't what makes or breaks a
monster movie. I'm more than willing to turn my brain off and watch a giant
lizard destroy New York City and lay its soon-to-hatch eggs all over the
place as long as the script and logic manage not to actively annoy me.
Well, bad news: GODZILLA annoyed me often, and in many ways.
First off, there's the World's Most Incompetent Military Strike Force.
These guys plow into New York City with lots of high-tech weapons to fire
at the lizard...and they MISS!  Not once, not twice, they miss OVER AND
OVER AND OVER AGAIN. They fire missiles into the side of the Chrysler
Building, as well as several other skyscrapers, but they can't hit
Godzilla. As the city's Mayor Ebert (played by Michael Lerner in an obvious
parody of film critic Roger Ebert--he has an assistant named "Gene") points
out, the military causes even more destruction than Godzilla does. Why did
director Roland Emmerich and producer Dean Devlin, who co-wrote the
screenplay, make these guys into such idiots? Did they need a catalyst for
another ten minutes of destruction? (Hey guys, here's an idea: there's a
GIANT LIZARD on the loose.) Was it supposed to drum up sympathy for the
monster ? (Not a bad idea, but if that was their goal, the follow-up was
hardly adequate.) In any case, the result is puzzling at best.
The characters in this film are at best one-dimensional and at worst boring
and irritating. Matthew Broderick does okay as an expert biologist, as does
Jean Reno as a French secret service agent (who is involved in this
because--don't laugh--the French government supposedly feels guilty about
its nuclear tests in the South Pacific). Hank Azaria is, I guess, intended
as comic relief as a TV cameraman nicknamed "Animal," but his humorous
moments are ill-conceived. I realize that disaster movies have to tone down
the pure panic that would likely occur in a real giant lizard attack, but
honestly, do you know anyone who would wag his finger at a rampaging
400-foot-tall lizard and declare, "Now I'm really pissed!"? Maria Pitillo,
playing a reporter wannabe who was once engaged to Broderick's character,
is stuck with the role of a complete ditz. She's not ditzy in an endearing
way, nor would she even work as an object of mockery. She's just grating to
the point that you want her off the screen as soon as she opens her mouth.
This movie is full of misfired attempts at humor. There are times when the
script seems to be in some sort of contest with last year's BATMAN AND
ROBIN for bad one-liners ("This lizard reproduces asexually." "Where's the
fun in that?"). The Siskel and Ebert parodies were mildly amusing at first,
but obvious takes on real people are a risky form of comedy that belong to
the realm of spoof or of cameo appearances, and these two wear out their
welcome by a long shot. Then there's a scene of a taxicab inside Godzilla's
mouth, which miraculously results in no one biting the dust but does give
Azaria cause to scream "You're going the wrong way!" at the frantic driver.
Add this to some pure silliness like Broderick managing to trip up some of
Godzilla's babies by throwing ball candy on the floor in their path, and I
was occasionally left wondering if I was watching a Zucker brothers parody
of Godzilla movies.
GODZILLA isn't even a great example of a simple action movie. The conflicts
between these characters are for the most part shallow and uninteresting,
and this is one case in which the filmmakers would have done better to just
accept their one-dimensionality and get on with the explosions, monsters,
and general chaos. Instead, we're treated to long, boring scenes in which
they exchange cliched dialogue. Up until the second half of the movie, the
destruction and mayhem is surprisingly lifeless, running the gamut from
repetitive, mediocre imitations of INDEPENDENCE DAY, the Devlin/Emmerich
team's previous film, to downright laughable when the military manages to
hit everything in the city with the exception of the 400-foot-tall giant
lizard. Finally, as if to suck even more dramatic tension out of the action
scenes, Devlin and Emmerich telegraph most of them a mile away. "Did you
hear that?" one character whispers to another as they track Godzilla's
babies through underground tunnels. "What?" the other responds. Gee, you
think something's about to jump out at them?
After all this ranting, you may wonder why I gave GODZILLA any stars at
all. First of all, the action is fairly well executed towards the end of
the movie as the four principal characters are trapped inside Madison
Square Garden with hostile Godzilla babies. Yes, it's a JURASSIC
PARK ripoff, and yes, it's interrupted with dumb jokes like Broderick
opening an elevator door to find the monsters right outside and announcing,
"Sorry, wrong floor," but it still managed to keep me entertained even
though I knew Steven Spielberg had done it better. The final romp through
the city with the big guy himself is also quite good, ending with an
exciting chase on the Brooklyn Bridge. The movie also gains points for
portraying Godzilla not as an evil monster bent on destruction but as
nothing more than an animal trying to find a habitat. In this scenario, the
humans are not morally upstanding beings defending their rights, but simply
a competing species. This is slightly more thoughtful than simple
"Aaaaahhh, it's a big scary monster, kill it!" logic, but none of the
characters seem to think or talk about it very much, and the filmmakers do
little with this aspect of the story other than to portray the attempts to
down Godzilla with a certain amount of regret.
For about half of its excessive two-hour-plus runnning time,
GODZILLA provided some good edge-of-the-seat thrills, so I suppose it's a
partial success as a monster movie. Still, it's saying something about a
film that its best moments are when the filmmakers start unashamedly
ripping off other movies and reduce their characters to stick figures who
exist only to run around. If Godzilla comes back for a sequel, as the
ending indicates he probably will, I have a few suggestions: scrap these
characters, quit trying to be so cute, and find some more original ways to
create mayhem.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
If nothing else, STAR TREK: INSURRECTION should convince people that the
supposed curse on odd-numbered installments of the TREK series has been
lifted. It more or less plays like an episode of the "Next Generation" TV
series with a bigger budget, but that's not necessarily a bad thing. While
maybe not the best of the four TREK series, "The Next Generation" was
certainly the most politically idealistic and can lay claim to two of the
franchise's most consistently interesting characters: Captain Jean-Luc
Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the android Lieutanant Commander Data (Brent
Spiner).
Screenwriter Michael Piller, who has been involved in all three of the new
STAR TREK series, wisely puts Picard and Data at the center of the action
for most of the film. As the film begins, Data is on a survey mission with
a team from Starfleet secretly observing a race known as the Ba'ku, who
have abandoned their technology in favor of a return to a simpler, more
agricultural way of life. Suddenly Data turns against the other team
members, exposing their secret observation post and telling the Ba'ku that
the team are their enemies. Picard and the rest of the Enterprise crew are
called in to handle the situation, and after apprehending Data, discover
that he suffered an injury which rendered inactive all of his artificial
brain except for his moral/ethical subroutines.
Soon the situation becomes clear: there is a special kind of radiation
emitted by the ring system of the Ba'ku planet which prevents the aging
process. A rogue Starfleet Admiral, along with some seedy aliens, have
decided to move the Ba'ku against their will in order to take advantage of
this radiation. When these plans are discovered, Picard objects on the
grounds that they would be violating Starfleet's Prime Directive, which
states that all alien civilizations must be allowed to develop
independently. The impatient aliens then prepare to kill the Ba'ku as well
as the Enterprise crew. From this point on, INSURRECTION follows the
reliable formula for a STAR TREK action/adventure story by splitting up the
crew between one group on a planet and/or a hostile spaceship while the
other group fights a space battle with the aliens. In this case, Picard,
Data, and several other Enterprise officers go to the planet to protect the
Ba'ku from the alien onslaught, while First Officer William Riker (Jonathan
Frakes, who also directed) takes command of the Enterprise.
The biggest success of INSURRECTION is the way it handles some of the
philosophical questions underlying this latest TREK adventure. At this
point in the storyline, Picard and his crew have been relegated mostly to
diplomatic duty, as Starfleet's war with the invading Dominion (a story arc
from the "Deep Space Nine" TV series) has strained their resources and
forced them to concentrate on the political rather than on exploration and
science. As he spends more time with the Ba'ku, we can see that Picard is
considering that he might prefer to return to a simpler form of
exploration, that of human relationships and community, given that he
probably won't be getting back to quasars, solar systems, and wormholes any
time soon. The use of technology has always been a source of controversy
and moral dilemma in the STAR TREK universe, but I don't recall ever seeing
the technology-driven futuristic idealism of the TREK franchise questioned
so directly.
If anything, the filmmakers push this aspect a little too far, as the
screenplay seems to be so ga-ga over the utopian community of the Ba'ku
that it never questions the morality of their decision to exile anyone who
wants to take another try at a technological society. Aside from that, the
only other noticeable problem is the often sophomoric humor that arises out
of the effects of the anti-aging radiation on the Enterprise crew. The
giggly romance between Riker and ship counselor Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis)
is so corny that one wonders if Frakes and Sirtis had been receiving some
radiation treatment themselves when they performed these scenes, and Picard
breaking out into a samba dance in his quarters isn't far behind on the
silliness meter. There is some slightly more credible, and seemingly less
radiation-induced, attraction between Picard and a Ba'ku woman, but it
still comes off as a movie romance rather than a real one.
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is certainly not the best of the movie series:
FIRST CONTACT and THE VOYAGE HOME, at the very least, are clearly superior,
and a case could be made for THE UNDISCOVERED COUNTRY, THE WRATH OF KHAN,
and maybe even THE SEARCH FOR SPOCK as well. Nevertheless, its entertaining
mix of sci-fi adventure, character development, and philosophical questions
about humankind and its future makes it easy to see why STAR TREK has
indeed managed to live long and prosper.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews archived at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
EVENT HORIZON is the latest entry into the sci-fi/horror sub-genre of
Movies About Weird Stuff Happening In Deep Space. With its ominous-looking
visual design and its setting on a spaceship trapped inside the atmosphere
of the planet Neptune, it aspires to be a claustrophobic piece of isolation
and fear in the tradition of ALIEN. But while ALIEN can lay claim to a
reasonably well-developed story and interesting characters to engage the
audience's attention, EVENT HORIZON cannot: its screenplay is vague and
undeveloped, and it is populated by one-dimensional figures who are there
mainly to run around, scream in fright, and bleed profusely.
As the film begins, we learn that it is the year 2047, and a deep space
research ship known as the Event Horizon, having disappeared without a
trace seven years ago, has now reappeared near Neptune and has sent out a
garbled message to Earth. The Event Horizon has the capability to move
faster than light through a sort of dimensional jump initiated by a
"gravity drive" designed by Dr. Weir (Sam Neill), who is now assigned to a
military team led by Captain Miller (Laurence Fishburne). Their mission is
to recover the ship and determine the fate of its crew. When they
eventually reach the ship, they discover that everyone on board is dead,
either killed or driven to suicide by some sort of otherwordly force that
has occupied the ship during the attempted dimensional jump: "save
yourselves from Hell," an Event Horizon crew member has recorded over the
ship's log. The force is still present, and it soon begins wreaking havoc
on Miller's crew.
This mix of science fiction and supernatural horror is on tenuous ground
from the beginning. Science fiction normally lends itself to strange and
fantastic events that are nevertheless explainable, at least according to
some sort of movie pseudoscience. But Philip Eisner's screenplay seems to
posit that the evil forces of EVENT HORIZON are demonic, or at least
non-corporeal, which raises the question of why these demons would suddenly
decide to pick on the crew of an experimental spaceship, as opposed to your
average Joe Earthling. A ship moving faster than light could easily find
itself on the wrong side of the universe, but I'm not sure why it would
wind up in Hell. Unfortunately, the movie doesn't seem to know the answer,
or at least it never lets the audience in on the secret.
In any case, this concept is handled somewhat inconsistently by the
filmmakers. If you're going to make a horror movie with a paper-thin story,
you might as well at least concentrate on the more frightening aspect of
it, which in this case would be the supernatural. But this demon, or
demonic alien, or living hell-ship, or whatever it is, spends an awful lot
of time using a possessed crew member to blow stuff up and shoot at the
others when it has already proven that it can drive someone to suicide with
hallucinations. Of course, it never actually does anything to help its
cause, like deactivating life support or disabling the auto-destruct system
(perhaps it was too busy filling a corridor with blood at the time). There
is also one action sequence, in which a crew member is thrown thousands of
miles into outer space, but returns to the exact point where he left using
propulsion from his spacesuit's air tanks, that is so implausible that I
literally shouted, "Oh, come ON!" at the screen. It's as if the filmmakers
thought it was sufficient simply to create on-screen mayhem even if most of
it makes very little sense.
The screenplay supplies some of the characters with guilt complexes or
conflicts of one sort or another, but they are of relatively minor
significance and are nothing we haven't seen before (Weir mourns his dead
wife, Miller remembers another officer whom he was forced to let die,
another crew member misses her child, etc.). Miller's conflict with Weir,
whom he resents because his team was called off leave for this mission,
seems pretty unprofessional and is something I might have expected from one
of the junior team members instead of the captain. Cooper, a foul-mouthed,
cocky young officer, supplies some comic relief, but his personality
contrasts so much with the others that he sometimes seems like he
accidentally wandered in from a Quentin Tarantino movie. And none of this
much matters in the first place, because the characters rarely get a chance
to think about what's happening or engage in much dialogue before there's
another explosion or another hallucination or another blood flood.
That's not to say that EVENT HORIZON isn't at least partly effective: the
apparitions and hallucinations are genuinely scary. And while director Paul
Anderson is stuck with a pretty bad script, he at least manages to conjure
up some claustrophobia and dread with the movie's remote setting, and this
setup invests a certain chill into a series of gruesome confrontations that
otherwise might have been merely disgusting. (And lest anyone think I was
being facetious in my earlier comments about blood, these scenes are indeed
gruesome: I don't think I've seen this much blood in a movie since
FANTASTIC VOYAGE.) Something pretty frightening is happening in this movie,
though it's anyone's guess as to exactly what.
EVENT HORIZON gets a passing grade as a horror flick, but that's about all
it gets: the plot is a mess, and even the scares rely too heavily on shock
and gore. The isolated outer space setting and the ambitious, extravagantly
creepy design of the ship's interior are really all that's noteworthy about
this film. The rest of it could have been made by any horror hack with a
camera, a few actors, and large quantities of fake blood.

Title
Review for Smoke Signals (1998)
The buzz surrounding SMOKE SIGNALS has largely focused on the fact that it
is the first film to have been written, produced, directed, and acted
entirely by Native Americans. While it is notable for its avoidance of
pop-culture stereotypes of all Native Americans as either shamans or
drunkards, the roots of its success are the same as those of most
successful films: realistic, three-dimensional characters who have an
interesting story.
Victor Joseph (Adam Beach), the lead character, is a young man living on a
reservation in Idaho whose alcoholic father Arnold (Gary Farmer) abandoned
his family years ago. It's a small, isolated community, which means that he
sometimes sees more than he would like of Thomas Builds-The-Fire (Evan
Adams), whom Arnold rescued from a fire when he was only an infant. Thomas
is the kind of guy who's settled into a routine, which in his case is his
enthusiasm for just about everything and his tendency to tell odd little
stories all the time, and is completely oblivious to the fact that he can
get on people's nerves once in a while. Victor's father, who's been in
Arizona since he left his family, has now died, and Victor doesn't have
enough money to go collect his ashes by himself. Along comes Thomas, who
agrees to supply the rest of the cash if he can go along for the ride.
>From there, SMOKE SIGNALS follows the basic formula for a buddy/road movie,
in which the characters discover certain things about themselves and about
each other along the way. Victor discovers that his father wasn't just a
simple drunk who ran out on the family and that he has harbored a lot more
anger and bitterness over his family's breakup than he would like to admit.
Thomas, who sometimes unintentionally mimics the stereotype of Native
Americans as mystics and who "has seen DANCES WITH WOLVES a hundred times"
according to Victor, turns out to be a little wiser than one might
initially think.
While there are some traces of resentment over their social
marginalization, the Native Americans in SMOKE SIGNALS seem just as likely
to joke about their situation as they are to complain about it. "The only
thing worse than Indians on TV is Indians watching Indians on TV," Thomas
comments when he, Victor, and Arnold's friend Suzie (Irene Bedard) find
themselves watching a cowboys-and-Indians movie. Some of the funniest
moments belong to a radio broadcaster on the reservation who makes daily
traffic and weather reports such as, "A car went by about ten minutes ago,
and there's a cloud up in the sky that looks kind of like a horse." The
humorous touches serve to undermine the stereotypes through the characters'
mockery of them.
The acting in SMOKE SIGNALS and the evocation of the rural West by director
Chris Eyre are probably a little more polished than Sherman Alexie's
screenplay, which includes a few long, drawn-out scenes of only minimal
importance and comes dangerously close to making a caricature of Thomas as
storyteller wannabe. Still, the mix of character study and humor is
engaging enough to keep Victor's and Thomas's road trip moving past any
bumps along the way.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Many of the reviews of SNAKE EYES have labeled it a disappointment, and in
some ways I can understand why: the previews promised an intricate, stylish
murder mystery thriller, and it doesn't quite deliver that, at least not as
well as it could have. The plot is complex and interesting, but the mystery
evaporates within the first forty-five minutes and the thrills, while
effective, are mostly of the fairly ordinary "is the good guy going to get
out of the room before the bad guy opens the door" variety. What it does
deliver, however, is an interesting inner conflict for a character who
realizes it's time to clean up his act and may have to risk everything if
he doesn't want an innocent woman's death on his conscience.
That character is Rick Santoro (Nicolas Cage), a corrupt Atlantic City
police detective who routinely shakes down criminals for bribes. His
longtime friend, Navy Commander Kevin Dunne (Gary Sinise), is in charge of
security for the Secretary of Defense at an Atlantic City boxing match, and
he gets Rick a front-row seat. In the second round, Dunne gets up to
question a strange woman sitting across the arena. A drunk stands up and
yells at the fighters. The defending champ goes down. Then suddenly shots
are fired, the Secretary is killed, and the woman who was talking to him
stumbles away, wounded and afraid for her life. Director Brian DePalma is
showing us the pieces to an intriguing puzzle, and in a way it's a shame he
decided to put them back together before the 45-minute mark.
In any case, Rick starts investigating the murder, at first because it
seems like a good PR opportunity. He eventually tracks down the wounded
woman (Carla Gugino), who has information about the case that Rick quickly
wishes he hadn't found out. He hides her in a basement room in the casino
complex and is soon intercepted by the killer, who offers him a handsome
cash reward in return for dropping the case and supplying the location of
the woman. And we sense that while he has let the guilty go free quite a
few times in his career, he still plays fair with the innocent. He doesn't
want to betray the woman, even though his refusal to do so might lead to
his death in the worst-case scenario and exposure of his past wrongdoings
in the best-case scenario.
Most of the harshest critics of SNAKE EYES have panned the film on the
grounds that the ending, which involves damage to the casino building by an
approaching hurricane and a police van that arrives at a convenient moment,
is a deus ex machina  that erases the impact of what has proceeded it. For
my money, they're right on the first count--it *is* a rather unlikely
contrivance--but wrong on the second. This wasn't the best resolution that
SNAKE EYES could have had, but the confrontation was still brought about by
the characters' internal motivations. Had Cage's character made a different
moral choice, neither he nor the villain would have been anywhere near the
police van at the end.
SNAKE EYES is certainly not a perfect film, but on the whole it does more
things right than wrong: the plot could have been handled a little better,
but the suspense works most of the time, and DePalma adds some inventive
direction to the mix, such as when he keeps the opening SteadiCam shot
going for nearly twenty minutes without a cut, or shows the same scene from
several different subjective viewpoints. And, most importantly, the Cage
character is well-written and well-performed enough to pick up the slack
whenever the storyline starts to wobble.

Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
Alfred Hitchcock's "Vertigo" is the rare top-flight, well-acclaimed film that
succeeds despite a somewhat weak screenplay. While many modern movies throw
logic out the window in the name of  pointless action sequences and
explosions, "Vertigo" throws it out the window for the sake of emotional
resonance, ironic twists, and thematic coherence. The film is based on a
French novel, which makes me think that Hitchcock decided he wanted to adapt
the novel to film but hired screenwriters who, while careful to preserve the
most essential themes, failed to fit these themes into a tighter plot.
It is fortunate, then, that Hitchcock and his leads, James Stewart and Kim
Novak, seem to know exactly what they're doing here, because a less competent
team of director and actors would have ended up with little more than a
muddled psychological thriller. Instead, they deliver what starts out as an
intriguing mystery and turns into a tragic love story, a story of a doomed
romance based on deceptive appearances and obsession rather than on real
understanding or emotional connection. Hitchcock is known as the  "master of
suspense," but it is the final half hour of the film, after the mystery has
evaporated and the film focuses on the relationship between two desolate and
frankly sick characters, that is the most powerful.
As the film begins, we are introduced to ex-police detective John "Scotty"
Ferguson (Stewart), who has quit the force after an incident in which another
officer was killed in a high-altitude chase due to Scotty's fear of heights
and resulting inability to climb a roof. Scotty is approached by a friend of
his who claims that his wife Madeline (Novak) has been behaving strangely and
may be possessed by the spirit of a suicidal Hispanic woman from the 19th
century. Scotty reluctantly agrees to follow her and report back on her
activities so as to ascertain the cause of her odd behavior. Before long,
however, he develops a romantic obsession with Madeline, and when he saves her
from an apparent suicide attempt, the two fall in love and begin carrying on
an affair. He can't seem to save her from her apparent possession, and
eventually she acts out the destiny of the deceased woman and plunges to her
death from a church tower.
Grief-stricken and withdrawn, Scotty spends several years in a mental
hospital, then is released only to cross paths with a woman who is the
spitting image of Madeline. Her name, however, is Judy Barton, and she
claims to know nothing of Scotty or Madeline. Scotty won't leave her alone,
however, and the way in which he insists she make herself over to look exactly
like Madeline did, as well as her curious complicity, is truly disturbing and
perverse as portrayed by Stewart and Novak. Hitchcock handles  these
psychological themes deftly, particularly in the long, mostly dialogue-free
scenes in the beginning of the film in which Scotty follows Madeline from
place to place. This transplants Scotty's obsession with Madeline to the
audience, making the shift in perspective towards the end when we discover how
truly flawed he is  as a protagonist all the more powerful and frightening.
It is a shame, then, that the script was not any better, because "Vertigo"
might have been a true four-star masterpiece if the writing had been a little
more polished. For one thing, some of the dialogue is just plain silly, such
as when the condition which requires the commitment of the nearly vegetative
Scotty to a mental hospital is described as "melancholia, combined with a
guilt complex"; I know many people who could be said to be suffering from both
of those conditions, and none of them are catatonic. More notably, the
connection between Madeline and Judy and Scotty hinges on a rather bizarre and
excessively complex scheme, while not completely implausible, is not the sort
of thing in which most rational human beings would get themselves involved.
There are other instances of illogical behavior or plot development which seem
to indicate that the screenwriters were so intent on capturing the
psychological themes of obsession and love for an illusion that they didn't
bother to make sure that the story made sense.
"Vertigo" is not quite a masterpiece, and certainly Hitchcock, Stewart, and
Novak deserved a better script to back up their outstanding work in this film.
But, even in the absence of one, they follow through on what is, if nothing
else, a very intriguing premise, with enough force that the occasional
falterings of the script are almost forgotten in the face of the film's
powerful psychological impact.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading
